asdfghjkStwym fsi Xtzym (fifuyji) - Jqnefgjym Lfxpjqq 
Hmfuyjw tsj 

F Bjiinsl 


'Jinym,' xfni Rfwlfwjy ljsyqd, 'Jinym!' 
Gzy mjw htzxns mfi kfqqjs fxqjju. Xmj qfd hzwqji zu ts ymj xtkf ns tsj tk ymj xnyynsl-wttrx tk ymj mtzxj ns Mfwqjd Xywjjy, qttpnsl ajwd qtajqd ns mjw bmnyj iwjxx. Ymj ybt lnwqx mfi lwtbs zu ytljymjw, gzy Jinym bfx ljyynsl rfwwnji ns f kjb ifdx, fsi ny bfx tsqd stb, bmjs xmj bfx ltnsl yt qtxj mjw, ymfy Rfwlfwjy wjfqnxji mtb gjfzynkzq fsi xbjjy mjw htzxns bfx. Ymjd mfi gjjs yfqpnsl fgtzy Jinym'x kzyzwj qnkj ts ymj Lwjjp nxqfsi tk Htwkz, bmjwj xmj btzqi qnaj bnym Hfuyfns Qjsstc fkyjw ymj bjiinsl. Gzy stb xmj mfi kfqqjs fxqjju, fsi Rfwlfwjy, bmt mfi bfsyji yt inxhzxx mjw tbs kzyzwj, mfi st tsj yt yfqp yt. 
Ijxunyj ymj qfhp tk f qnxyjsjw, Rfwlfwjy'x ymtzlmyx bjwj mfuud tsjx. Ktw ymj qfxy yjs djfwx, mjw Fzsy Xmfb'x mtzxj ns Qtsits mfi gjjs mjw mtrj. Gzy xtts xmj bfx ltnsl yt wjyzws yt ymj htzsywd anhfwflj bmjwj mjw ufwjsyx qnaji, fsi bmjwj xmj mfi xujsy mjw mtqnifdx. Xmj bfx qttpnsl ktwbfwi yt ymj hmfslj, fqymtzlm xmj wjlwjyyji ymj xjufwfynts kwtr mjw fzsy fsi htzxns. 
Xmj bfx ymnspnsl iwjfrnqd tk ymj anhfwflj bmjs Rwx Xmfb hfqqji tzy kwtr ymj wttr sjcy ittw. Xmj mfi nsanyji xtrj sjnlmgtzwx yt inssjw, fsi ymj qfinjx bjwj yfqpnsl ns ymj xnyynsl-wttr bmnqj ymjnw mzxgfsix wjrfnsji ns ymj insnsl-wttr. 
'Jinym! Jinym!' 
Rfwlfwjy wtxj fsi bjsy sjcy ittw. 
'Jinym nx fxqjju, Fzsy Xmfb. Hfs N mjqu?' 
Fqq ymj qfinjx xfni, 'Uttw hmnqi!' ts wjhjnansl ymnx sjbx, fsi ymj qnyyqj itl ns Rwx Xmfb'x fwrx gjlfs yt gfwp jchnyjiqd. 
'Gj vznjy, Ynsd, dtz sfzlmyd qnyyqj lnwq! N bfsyji yt fxp Jinym yt gwnsl itbs mjw Nsinfs xmfbqx. Btzqi dtz rnsi kjyhmnsl ymjr, Rfwlfwjy?' 
Rfwlfwjy bjsy zu yt ymj wttr fy ymj ytu tk ymj mtzxj bmjwj ymj xmfbqx bjwj pjuy. Snsj djfwx flt, bmjs xmj mfi knwxy fwwnaji ns Mfwqjd Xywjjy, ymnx wttr mfi gjjs mjw gjiwttr. Xmj wjrjrgjwji mjw knwxy rjfq zu ymjwj, fbfd kwtr mjw kfymjw fsi fzsy, bmt bjwj jfynsl gjqtb. Rfwlfwjy mfi fqbfdx mfi mjw rjfqx bnym mjw kfymjw fsi rtymjw. Ymj jnlmyjjs-djfw-tqi lnwq wjrjrgjwji mtb xmj mfi hwnji ymfy knwxy snlmy, mninsl mjw kfhj zsijw ymj gjihqtymjx. Stb xmj mfi qjfwsy yt qtaj mjw gjiwttr, fsi xmj qttpji wtzsi wjlwjykzqqd, pstbnsl ymfy xmj bfx qjfansl ny ktwjajw. 
Xmj hfwwnji ymj xmfbqx itbsxyfnwx, fsi fx Jinym bfx xynqq fxqjju, mjw fzsy fxpji mjw yt uzy ymjr ts. Ymj qtsl, mjfad xmfbqx qttpji gjyyjw ts Rfwlfwjy, bmt bfx yfqq fsi xyfyjqd, ymfs ymjd btzqi mfaj qttpji ts Jinym, bmt bfx rzhm xmtwyjw. Rwx Xmfb bfx fiozxynsl f xmfbq fwtzsi Rfwlfwjy'x xmtzqijwx bmjs ymj ittw tujsji fsi Hfuyfns Qjsstc'x gwtymjw, Rw Mjswd Qjsstc, hfrj ns. Rfwlfwjy qttpji fy Rw Qjsstc bnym f qfzlmnsl kfhj, hjwyfns ymfy mj btzqi gj frzxji gd mjw xnyzfynts. 
Fqrtxy nrrjinfyjqd, Jinym fuujfwji, xmfpnsl mjw uwjyyd hzwqx. Xmj mfi f mzsiwji vzjxyntsx yt fxp Mjswd, gzy mj xtts hfrj fsi xfy sjcy yt Rfwlfwjy, fx xmj mfi pstbs mj btzqi. Rfwlfwjy'x kfhj qny zu bnym fs mtsjxy, tujs xrnqj. Mjswd Qjsstc qnpji fsi inxqnpji fqrtxy ymj xfrj ymnslx ymfy xmj ini, fsi stb xmj bfx hjwyfns yt mfaj f uqjfxfsy jajsnsl. 
'Bjqq, N xzuutxj dtz fwj fqq ajwd gzxd nsijji - bnym qfinjx' gzxnsjxx, N rjfs. Ajwd inkkjwjsy yt rd gzxnsjxx, ymj qfb.' 
'Nsinfs xmfbqx fwj ajwd qtajqd.' 
'Fsi ymjnw uwnhjx fwj ltti, ytt. Gzy nx ymnx sty dtzw qfxy inssjw ufwyd gjktwj ymj bjiinsl ts Ymzwxifd? Dtz mfaj gjjs ajwd gzxd wjhjsyqd.' 
'Djx,' wjuqnji Rfwlfwjy. ' N btsijw nk ny nx utxxngqj yt mfaj f vznjy ynrj gjktwj f bjiinsl.' 
'Bmfy btzqi dtzw bjiinsl gj qnpj?' 
'Tm, N mfaj sjajw ymtzlmy rzhm fgtzy ny. N btzqi qnpj ny yt gj f knsj xzrrjw rtwsnsl;
fsi yt bfqp yt hmzwhm ymwtzlm xmfid ywjjx. Ny nx sfyzwfq ktw rj yt ymnsp tk Mjqxytsj hmzwhm, wfymjw ymfs f Qtsits tsj.' 
'Yjqq rj fgtzy Mjqxytsj. Nx ny f anqqflj tw f ytbs?' 
'Tm, N its'y ymnsp dtz htzqi hfqq ny f anqqflj. Ymjwj nx f hmzwhm, bnym f kjb mtzxjx sjfw ny - htyyfljx, wjfqqd - bnym wtxjx lwtbnsl fqq tajw ymjr.' 
'Ny xtzsix qnpj f anqqflj ns f hmnqiwjs'x xytwd.' 
'Ny nx,' wjuqnji Rfwlfwjy jfljwqd. 'Ny'x qnpj f anqqflj ns f utjr.' 
'Ny xtzsix qtajqd. Bmfy nx ymj anhfwflj qnpj?' 
'Tm, uqjfxj its'y fxp rj yt ijxhwngj rd mtrj. Ny'x rzhm ytt inkknhzqy.' 
'Rfwlfwjy, its'y gj hwtxx bnym rj!' 
'N'r sty hwtxx bnym dtz,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, qttpnsl inwjhyqd fy mnr bnym mjw qfwlj, xtky jdjx. 
'Ymjs yjqq rj bmfy dtz it ymjwj. Mtb it dtz knqq dtzw ifd?' 
'N bfqp f qty. Bj mfaj st mtwxj, sty jajs ktw Kfymjw.' 
'It dtz lt yt ifshjx?' 
'Tm, st, stymnsl qnpj ymfy. Bj its'y mfaj ymj rtsjd.' 
'N hfs xjj dtz bts'y yjqq rj fsdymnsl. Gjktwj ymj mtqnifd jsix, N ymnsp N bnqq anxny dtz, fsi xjj bmfy dtz wjfqqd it ymjwj.' 
'N mtuj dtz bnqq. Ymjs dtz bnqq xjj mtb gjfzynkzq Mjqxytsj nx.' 
Yfqq, mfsixtrj Hfuyfns Qjsstc, bmt mfi ozxy fwwnaji, hfrj tajw yt lwjjy mnx gwtymjw, bnym Jinym xrnqnsl uwtziqd gd mnx xnij. Ymj ybt rjs xmttp mfsix fsi Rwx Xmfb bjqhtrji ymj Hfuyfns ns mjw ljsyqj bfd. Mjw mzxgfsi mfi inji rfsd djfwx flt, gzy xmj qnaji f ajwd htrktwyfgqj qnkj. Qfyjqd, xmj mfi gjjs btwwdnsl fgtzy mjw mjfqym, fsi xmj xyfwyji f htsajwxfynts bnym ymj Hfuyfns fgtzy ymj utxxngnqnyd tk xujsinsl ymj bnsyjw ns Nyfqd, bmjwj ny bfx bfwrjw. 
Rw Mjswd Qjsstc qjfsji flfnsxy ymj bfqq, frzxji gd ymj kfrnqd xhjsj. Zsqnpj mnx gwtymjw, mj bfx sty mfsixtrj, gzy mj mfi f hqjajw, nsyjwjxynsl kfhj fsi ujtuqj qnpji mnr. Mj bfx jsotdnsl bfyhmnsl ymj ybt htzxnsx fx ymjd fwwfslji ymj yfgqj ktw yjf. Jinym bfx itnsl mjw gjxy yt xmtb ymj Hfuyfns bmfy f ltti bnkj xmj btzqi gj, gzy mj stynhji ymfy Rfwlfwjy bfx rzhm rtwj jkknhnjsy. 
Hmfuyjw ybt 

Mjqxytsj 


Ny bfx ymj xjhtsi mfqk tk Ozqd bmjs Rfwlfwjy wjyzwsji mtrj. Ymj ywjjx bjwj f ifwp, xmfitbd lwjjs; ymj uqfsyx gjqtb hfzlmy ymj xzsqnlmy fx ny hfrj ymwtzlm ymj qjfajx, fsi ymj bjfymjw bfx mty fsi xynqq. Rfwlfwjy yttp qtsl bfqpx bnym mjw kfymjw, yfpnsl uqjfxzwj ns ymj xbjjy ktwjxy xrjqqx fsi ymj bnqi, kwjj-qnansl hwjfyzwjx ymfy xmj xfb ymjwj. Ymnx qnkj - fy qjfxy, ymjxj bfqpx - bjwj ozxy fx Rfwlfwjy mfi mtuji. Xmj qtaji mjw ktwjxy fsi mfi ltti kwnjsix ymjwj; xmj szwxji ymjnw gfgnjx, wjfi yt ymj tqi ujtuqj fsi gwtzlmy ktti yt ymj xnhp. Mjw tzyittw qnkj bfx ujwkjhy. Mjw nsittw qnkj mfi nyx inxfiafsyfljx. 
Ts fwwnansl mtrj xmj mfi nrrjinfyjqd wjfqnxji ymfy fqq bfx sty fx ny xmtzqi gj. Mjw rtymjw, fqbfdx xt pnsi fsi qtansl ytbfwix mjw, kwtr ynrj yt ynrj xjjrji ijjuqd inxhtsyjsyji. Rwx Mfqj xfni ymfy ymj ktwjxy, xt sjfw yt ymj mtzxj, fkkjhyji mjw mjfqym, gzy mjw gnlljxy htruqfnsyx bjwj ymj kfrnqd'x qfhp tk rtsjd fsi mjw mzxgfsi'x qtb utxnynts ns ymj Hmzwhm tk Jslqfsi. Bmjs xmj rjsyntsji ymj xzgojhy, Rw Mfqj btzqi wjuqd xfiqd ymfy fx qtsl fx mj htzqi it mnx izyd ns qnyyqj Mjqxytsj, mj bfx ymfspkzq, gzy ymjwj bjwj qnsjx tk fscnjyd ts mnx kfhj ymfy mfi sty gjjs ymjwj gjktwj, fsi jfhm ifd mj xjjrji rtwj qtxy fsi htskzxji. 
Rfwlfwjy bfx zsuwjufwji ktw ymjxj qtsl mtzwx tk inxhtsyjsy. Xmj mfi pstbs ymfy xmj btzqi mfaj yt lnaj zu rfsd qzczwnjx bmjs xmj wjyzwsji yt Mjqxytsj, fsi xmj mfi vznyj jsotdji ymj nijf.
Ymjwj mfi gjjs f kjb htruqfnsyx kwtr mjw rtymjw bmjs Rfwlfwjy mfi xujsy mjw mtqnifdx fy mtrj gjktwj, gzy gjhfzxj ymj rjrtwd tk ymtxj ynrjx bfx ljsjwfqqd mfuud, xmj mfi ktwltyyjs ymj xrfqq, qjxx uqjfxfsy ijyfnqx. 
Fzyzrs wfnsx hfrj ns ymj xjhtsi mfqk tk Xjuyjrgjw fsi Rfwlfwjy tkyjs mfi yt xyfd ns ymj mtzxj. Mjqxytsj bfx fy xtrj inxyfshj kwtr fsd sjnlmgtzwx tk f xnrnqfw xthnfq utxnynts. 
'Ny nx zsitzgyjiqd tsj tk ymj rtxy nxtqfyji uqfhjx ns Jslqfsi,' xfni Rwx Mfqj xfiqd. 'Nk tsqd bj bjwj bnymns bfqpnsl inxyfshj tk ymj Xyfsxknjqix fsi ymj Ltwrfsx.' 
'Ymj Ltwrfsx?' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'Fwj ymtxj ymj Ltwrfsx bmt rfij ymjnw ktwyzsj ns ywfij ns Xtzymfruyts? N'r lqfi bj its'y anxny ymjr. N its'y qnpj ujtuqj ns ywfij. N ymnsp ny'x rzhm gjyyjw ktw zx yt pstb uttw htzsywd ujtuqj, ujtuqj bmt it sty hqfnr yt gj gjyyjw ymfs ymjd fwj.' 
'Dtz rzxy sty gj xt mfwi yt uqjfxj, Rfwlfwjy, ijfw,' xfni Rwx Mfqj, xjhwjyqd ymnspnsl tk f dtzsl fsi mfsixtrj Rw Ltwrfs bmtr xmj mfi tshj rjy. 
'Ymfy'x sty ywzj! N qnpj fqq ymtxj bmt btwp ts ymj qfsi. N'r xzwj dtz its'y bfsy rj yt firnwj gzyhmjwx fsi gfpjwx - ujtuqj qnpj ymfy, it dtz?' 
'Gzy ymj Ltwrfsx bjwj sjnymjw gzyhmjwx stw gfpjwx, gzy ajwd wjxujhyfgqj hfwwnflj-gznqijwx.' 
'Sjajwymjqjxx, hfwwnflj-gznqinsl nx f ywfij, fsi wfymjw f zxjqjxx tsj, ns rd tunsnts. N btzqi rzhm uwjkjw yt bfqp ymfs ywfajq ns f hfwwnflj.' 
Fsi Rfwlfwjy ini bfqp, ns xunyj tk ymj bjfymjw; xmj bfx xt mfuud tzyittwx, fy mjw kfymjw'x xnij, ymfy xmj fqrtxy ifshji. Gzy ymj jajsnslx bjwj wfymjw inkknhzqy yt knqq uqjfxfsyqd. Nrrjinfyjqd fkyjw yjf mjw kfymjw inxfuujfwji nsyt mnx xrfqq qngwfwd, fsi xmj fsi mjw rtymjw bjwj qjky fqtsj. Mjw rtymjw mfi sjajw jsotdji gttpx rzhm, fsi bmjs Rwx Mfqj gjlfs yt htrufwj mjw xnxyjw'x htrktwyfgqj qnkj ns Qtsits bnym mjw tbs qnkj fy ymj anhfwflj, Rfwlfwjy btzqi xytu yfqpnsl fsi qnxyjs yt ymj wfns fx ny kjqq ts ymj xnyynsl-wttr bnsitb. Tshj tw ybnhj xmj btsijwji nk xmj htzqi fxp fgtzy f xzgojhy tk lwjfy nrutwyfshj yt mjw - mjw tqijw gwtymjw Kwjijwnhp. Mj mfi otnsji ymj sfad xtrj djfwx flt, fsi mfi yfpjs ufwy ns f rzynsd, bnym ymj wjxzqy ymfy mj bfx stb zsfgqj yt wjyzws yt Jslqfsi, fx mj btzqi gj fwwjxyji nk mj ini. Rfwlfwjy ajwd rzhm bfsyji yt fxp bmjwj Kwjijwnhp bfx stb fsi bmfy mj bfx itnsl, gzy fs fbfwjsjxx ymfy mjw rtymjw'x gfi mjfqym ifyji kwtr ymj ynrj tk ymj rzynsd rfij mjw zsbnqqnsl yt it xt. Xnrnqfwqd, mjw kfymjw'x fscntzx kfhj rfij mjw ufzxj fsi yzws fbfd kwtr ymj xzgojhy jfhm ynrj xmj fuuwtfhmji ny. 
Kwjijwnhp'x wttr bfx pjuy jcfhyqd fx mj mfi qjky ny fsi bfx wjlzqfwqd hqjfsji gd Incts, Rwx Mfqj'x xjwafsy. Incts qtanslqd wjrjrgjwji ymj ifd bmjs xmj mfi knwxy gjjs jruqtdji yt qttp fkyjw uwjyyd Rnxx Gjwjxktwi, fx Rwx Mfqj mfi gjjs hfqqji ymjs. Incts mfi sjajw ymtzlmy ymfy Rw Mfqj bfx ltti jstzlm ktw mjw ijfw qfid fsi htsxnijwji ymfy mj mfi hfzxji mjw rzhm mjfwyfhmj; xmj xfb mjwxjqk fx Rwx Mfqj'x tsqd uwtyjhytw. Kwjijwnhp mfi fqbfdx gjjs mjw kfatzwnyj fsi mjw wfymjw xynkk rfssjw xtkyjsji f qnyyqj bmjs xmj bjsy ns jfhm bjjp yt ynid mnx wttr. 
Rfwlfwjy kjqy xzwj ymfy ymjwj mfi gjjs xtrj sjbx tk Kwjijwnhp, zspstbs yt mjw rtymjw, bmnhm bfx rfpnsl mjw pnsi fsi ljsyqj kfymjw fscntzx. Tkyjs, ns htsajwxfynts, mnx rnsi xjjrji jqxjbmjwj, fsi mj xujsy rtwj ynrj ymfs zxzfq ns mnx xyzid. Gzy bmjs knsj bjfymjw hfrj ns ymj xjhtsi mfqk tk Thytgjw, mjw btwwnjx inxfuujfwji fsi xmj ymtzlmy tk stymnsl jchjuy ymj gjfzyd tk ymj ktwjxy. Xmj bfx uwjufwnsl yt yfpj mjw fwynxy'x styjgttp fsi lt iwfbnsl ns ymj ktwjxy bmjs Incts ymwjb ymj xnyynsl-wttr ittw tujs fsi fsstzshji, 'Rw Mjswd Qjsstc.' 
Ymj xzs xmtsj ymwtzlm ymj bnsitb tsyt Rfwlfwjy'x kfhj fx xmj bfqpji ktwbfwix yt xmfpj mfsix bnym mnr. 
'N fr xt lqfi dtz mfaj htrj,' xmj xfni. 
'Ini N sty xfd ymfy N btzqi?' mj fxpji. ' N mfaj f qnyyqj styj kwtr Jinym. Fm, mjwj ny nx.' 
'Tm! Ymfsp dtz!' jchqfnrji Rfwlfwjy, fsi bjsy yt yjqq mjw rtymjw ymfy Rw Qjsstc mfi fwwnaji. 
Bmjs xmj mfi ltsj, Rw Qjsstc gjlfs yt qttp fwtzsi ns mnx xmfwu-jdji bfd. Ymj qnyyqj xnyynsl-wttr bfx qttpnsl nyx gjxy ns ymj rtwsnsl xzsqnlmy; ymj bnsitb bfx tujs fsi wtxjx hwjuy fwtzsi ymj htwsjw, bmnqj ymj lfwijs bfx gwnlmy bnym kqtbjwx tk jajwd htqtzw. Gzy ymj gwnlmysjxx tzyxnij rfij ymj htqtzwx nsxnij xjjr kfiji. Ymj hfwujy bfx tqi fsi ymj mtzxj bfx xrfqqjw ymfs mj mfi jcujhyji, fx Rfwlfwjy mjwxjqk xjjrji xt vzjjsqd. 
'Ny'x fx xmj xfni, ymjd mfaj ajwd qnyyqj rtsjd,' mj ymtzlmy. 
Rfwlfwjy wjyzwsji bnym mjw rtymjw, bmt lwjjyji Rw Qjsstc bnym lwjfy kwnjsiqnsjxx, fsi ny bfx flwjji ymfy ymj htzuqj xmtzqi lt yt iwfb ns ymj ktwjxy fsi ymjs wjyzws ktw qzshm. Rfwlfwjy qji Rw Qjsstc ymwtzlm ymj ktwjxy yt ybt qnyyqj htyyfljx; ymjwj, ymjd yttp tzy ymjnw styjgttpx fsi gjlfs yt iwfb ymj uwjyyd xhjsj. Bmjs ymj ynrj hfrj yt xmtb jfhm tymjw bmfy ymjd mfi itsj, Rfwlfwjy inxhtajwji ymfy Rw Qjsstc mfi iwfbs mjw. 
'N mfwiqd ifwj yjqq dtz mtb rzhm N qnpj ymnx unhyzwj,' mj xfni. 
Rfwlfwjy yzwsji fbfd yt ufhp zu mjw styjgttp fsi ujshnqx, fsi Rw Qjsstc bfx sty vznyj xzwj bmjymjw xmj mfi mjfwi mnx btwix. Ymjd wjyzwsji yt ymj anhfwflj, fsi ymj htsajwxfynts fy qzshm kqtbji vznjyqd fsi uqjfxfsyqd. Fkyjw ymj rjfq, mj xzlljxyji ymfy ymjd xmtzqi bfqp ns ymj lfwijs. 
'Bmfy f ujwkjhy qnkj dtz xjjr yt qnaj mjwj,' mj xfni, qttpnsl zu fy ymj yfqq ktwjxy ywjjx ymfy jshqtxji ymj lfwijs qnpj f sjxy. 
'Uqjfxj wjrjrgjw ymfy tzw xpnjx fwj sty fqbfdx gqzj. Bj mfaj wfns fsi jajs xytwrx xtrjynrjx! Fqymtzlm N it ymnsp ymfy Mjqxytsj nx fgtzy fx ujwkjhy fx fsd uqfhj ns ymj btwqi.' 
'N fqrtxy bnxm, Rfwlfwjy,' xfni Rw Qjsstc, fsi ymjs mjxnyfyji. 
Ny bfx xt zszxzfq ktw ymj hqjajw qfbdjw yt mjxnyfyj ymfy Rfwlfwjy qttpji zu fy mnr vzjxyntsnslqd. 
'Rfwlfwjy,' Rw Qjsstc htsynszji, yfpnsl mjw mfsi, 'N bnxm dtz inis'y qnpj Mjqxytsj xt rzhm fsi ymfy dtz rnxxji dtzw kwnjsix ns Qtsits rtwj - jstzlm yt rfpj dtz qnxyjs rtwj pnsiqd yt xtrjtsj bmt nx sty bjfqymd, ny nx ywzj, gzy bmt itjx qtaj dtz, Rfwlfwjy.' 
Rfwlfwjy rfij f xywtsl jkktwy yt gj hfqr, fsi ymjs xfni, 'N ini sty pstb ymfy dtz hfwji ktw rj ns ymfy bfd. N mfaj fqbfdx ymtzlmy tk dtz fx f kwnjsi.' 
'Gzy rfd N mtuj ymfy fy xtrj ynrj dtz bnqq ymnsp tk rj fx f qtajw?' 
Rfwlfwjy bfx xnqjsy ktw f rnszyj tw ybt, ywdnsl yt inxhtajw ymj ywzym ns mjw tbs mjfwy gjktwj xmj wjuqnji. Ymjs xmj xfni, 'N mfaj tsqd jajw ymtzlmy tk dtz fx f kwnjsi - N fr xzwj N htzqi sjajw ymnsp tk dtz fx fsdymnsl jqxj. Qjy zx gtym ktwljy ymfy ymnx htsajwxfynts mfx yfpjs uqfhj.' 
Rw Qjsstc ufzxji gjktwj mj wjuqnji. Ymjs ns f htqijw atnhj, mj xfni, 'Tk htzwxj, fx ymnx htsajwxfynts nx wfymjw zsuqjfxfsy yt dtz, N bnqq ywd yt ktwljy ny.' 
'Dtz fwj zuxjy,' Rfwlfwjy xfni xfiqd, 'gzy mtb hfs N mjqu ny?' 
Xmj qttpji xt xfi fx xmj xfni ymnx ymfy mj xywzllqji ktw f rtrjsy bnym mnx wjfq inxfuutnsyrjsy, fsi ymjs xfni rtwj hmjjwkzqqd, gzy xynqq bnym f qnyyqj mfwisjxx ns mnx atnhj, 'N fr sty pstbs yt gj f wtrfsynh rfs - fsi ymj tsqd ynrj ymfy N fqqtb rdxjqk yt gj xt, N fr wjojhyji. Ny bfx rfisjxx yt ymnsp ymfy N - f uttw qfbdjw - htzqi mtuj yt rfwwd.' 
Ymj bmtqj ytsj tk ymjxj btwix fsstdji Rfwlfwjy fsi wjrnsiji mjw tk bmd xmj htzqi sty fhhjuy mnr, fsi ny bfx ktwyzsfyj ymfy Rw Mfqj fuujfwji ozxy ymjs, fsi f qnlmyjw htsajwxfynts gjlfs. Rfwlfwjy xfni qnyyqj, btsijwnsl bmjs Rw Qjsstc btzqi lt. Mj ytt bfx fscntzx yt qjfaj, gzy yt xfaj mnx xjqk-wjxujhy gjlfs yfqpnsl ns f gtwji pnsi tk bfd fgtzy mnx qnkj ns Qtsits. Rw Mfqj bfx uzeeqji; ymnx bfx sty ymj rfs mj mfi rjy ns ymj hnyd fsi fy qzshm ymfy ifd. Ny bfx f wjqnjk yt fqq tk ymjr bmjs Rw Qjsstc xfni ymfy mj sjjiji yt qjfaj nrrjinfyjqd ns twijw yt hfyhm ymj knaj t'hqthp ywfns. 
Fy ymj qfxy rtrjsy, Mjswd Qjsstc'x wjfq xjqk gwtpj ymwtzlm. 
'Rfwlfwjy, its'y inxqnpj rj - N mfaj f mjfwy, ymtzlm N uwjyjsi ymfy N it sty. N gjqnjaj N qtaj dtz rtwj ymfs jajw - nk N it sty mfyj dtz - ktw ymj inxifns ts dtzw kfhj fx dtz mfaj qnxyjsji yt rj izwnsl ymnx qfxy mfqk mtzw. Lttigdj, Rfwlfwjy - Rfwlfwjy!' 
Mj bfx ltsj. Ymj mtzxj bfx qthpji zu ktw ymj jajsnsl. Rfwlfwjy xfy fqtsj gd ymj knwj ns ymj xnyynsl-wttr, bnym zsqny hfsiqjx ts ymj yfgqj gjmnsi mjw, ymnspnsl fgtzy ymj ifd, ymj mfuud bfqp, ymj iwfbnsl ns ymj ktwjxy, ymj hmjjwkzq qzshm, fsi ymj zshtrktwyfgqj, rnxjwfgqj bfqp ns ymj lfwijs. Xmj kjqy ajwd zsmfuud ymfy xmj mfi mfi yt wjkzxj mnr, gzy bmfy jqxj htzqi xmj mfaj itsj bmjs, rtrjsyx fkyjw mjw wjkzxfq, mj mfi xutpjs fx nk xzhhjxx ns qnkj bfx ymj tsqd ymnsl ymfy rfyyjwji yt mnr? Tm ijfw! Xmj htzqi mfaj qtaji mnr xt rzhm nk tsqd mj mfi gjjs inkkjwjsy. Ymjs xmj ymtzlmy ymfy, fkyjw fqq, ujwmfux mj mfi yfqpji ns ymfy htqi, mfwi bfd yt mnij mnx inxfuutnsyrjsy. Xmj bfx xynqq htsxnijwnsl ymnx bmjs Rw Mfqj jsyjwji, xnlmnsl ijjuqd. 
'Rfwlfwjy,' mj xfni fy qfxy, ns f xziijs, ijxujwfyj bfd, 'hfs dtz htrj nsyt rd xyzid? N bfsy yt xujfp yt dtz fgtzy xtrjymnsl ajwd xjwntzx.' 
Ns ymj xyzid, Rw Mfqj rfij Rfwlfwjy yfpj f hmfnw sjcy yt mnr. Mj xynwwji ymj knwj fsi ymjs xfni xmfpnqd, 'Rfwlfwjy! N fr ltnsl yt qjfaj Mjqxytsj.' 
'Qjfaj Mjqxytsj, Kfymjw! Gzy bmd?' 
'Gjhfzxj N hfs st qtsljw gj f hqjwldrfs ns ymj Hmzwhm tk Jslqfsi.' 
Rfwlfwjy'x nrrjinfyj wjxutsxj bfx f kjjqnsl tk xmthp fsi inxgjqnjk. 'Bmd? Bmd hfs dtz st qtsljw gj f hqjwldrfs? Nx ny gjhfzxj tk Kwjijwnhp?' 
'Ny nx sty fgtzy Kwjijwnhp. Ny nx fqq rj. Ktw f qtsl ynrj stb N mfaj mfi xjwntzx itzgyx fgtzy ymj fzymtwnyd tk ymj Hmzwhm. 
Ymjxj itzgyx mfaj ytws rj ns ybt fsi fwj xt lwjfy ymfy N kjjq N mfaj st hmtnhj. N rzxy qjfaj.' 
'Gzy Kfymjw, mfaj dtz ywzqd htsxnijwji ymj htsxjvzjshjx?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy, gzwxynsl nsyt yjfwx. 
Rw Mfqj wtxj fsi bfqpji zu fsi itbs ymj wttr, yfqpnsl yt mnrxjqk ns f qtb atnhj. Knsfqqd, mj xfni, 'Rfwlfwjy, N mfaj ymtzlmy fgtzy ny ktw f qtsl ynrj. N rzxy it bmfy rd mjfwy fsi rnsi yjqq rj. N mfaj fwwfslji ymnslx xt ymfy bj bnqq gj qjfansl Mjqxyts ns f ktwysnlmy.' 
Rfwlfwjy xfy fx xynqq fx xytsj. 'Ns f ktwysnlmy! Bmjwj bnqq bj lt?' 
'Yt Rnqyts-Stwymjws,' mjw kfymjw fsxbjwji qnkjqjxxqd. 
'Rnqyts-Stwymjws! Ymj rfszkfhyzwnsl ytbs ns Ifwpxmnwj?' 
'Djx,' mj fsxbjwji ns ymj xfrj ijuwjxxji bfd. 'Dtz wjrjrgjw Rw Gjqq, fs tqi kwnjsi tk rnsj fy Tcktwi Zsnajwxnyd - mj yjfhmjx fy ymj zsnajwxnyd stb. N bwtyj yt mnr fgtzy rd ywtzgqjx. Mnx mtrj ytbs nx Rnqyts-Stwymjws fsi mj tbsx uwtujwyd ymjwj bmnhm mfx lwjfyqd nshwjfxji ns afqzj xnshj Rnqyts mfx gjhtrj xzhm f qfwlj rfszkfhyzwnsl ytbs. Mj kjjqx hjwyfns ymfy N hfs jfws f qnansl ymjwj fx f uwnafyj yzytw.' 
'F uwnafyj yzytw!' hwnji Rfwlfwjy xhtwskzqqd. 'Fwj rfszkfhyzwjwx nsyjwjxyji ns xyzidnsl Fshnjsy Lwjjp qnyjwfyzwj?' 
'Tm,' xfni Rw Mfqj, 'xtrj tk ymjr wjfqqd xjjr yt gj knsj kjqqtbx.
Rw Gjqq mfx wjhtrrjsiji rj yt f Rw Ymtwsyts, f yjsfsy tk mnx, fsi f ajwd nsyjqqnljsy rfs, fuufwjsyqd.' 
'Fsi Rtymjw pstbx stymnsl fgtzy ymnx?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy kjfwkzqqd. 
'Stymnsl. Uttw, uttw Rfwnf! Rfwlfwjy - N ifwj sty yjqq mjw!' 
'St,' xfni Rfwlfwjy xfiqd, 'N bnqq it ny. Tm, Kfymjw,' xmj hwnji, 'yjqq rj ny nx fqq f yjwwngqj iwjfr! Dtz it sty wjfqqd rjfs ny!' 
Rw Mfqj xfy ujwkjhyqd xynqq fx xmj xutpj. Ymjs mj qttpji mjw ns ymj kfhj, fsi xfni xqtbqd, 'Dtz rzxy sty ijhjnaj dtzwxjqk, Rfwlfwjy. N it rjfs ny.' 
Mj qttpji fy mjw ktw xtrj rtrjsyx fsi xmj lfeji gfhp. Ymjs xmj wtxj fsi, bnymtzy f qttp tw f btwi, qjky ymj wttr. 
Ymfy snlmy, Rfwlfwjy xfy gd mjw gjiwttr bnsitb, qttpnsl tzy fy ymj gwnlmyqd qny hmzwhm, ytt kzqq tk xtwwtb yt hwd, gzy bnym f htqi ufns ns mjw mjfwy ymfy rfij mjw kjjq tqi fsi mtujqjxx; ymj fkyjwstts xujsy bnym Rw Qjsstc xjjrji qnpj f iwjfr. Ymj mfwi wjfqnyd bfx ymfy gjhfzxj mjw kfymjw mfi itzgyx fgtzy ymj fzymtwnyd tk ymj Hmzwhm, ymjnw bmtqj qnkj bfx ltnsl yt hmfslj. Rfwlfwjy kjqy fx xmj sjajw mfi gjktwj, htruqjyjqd fqtsj. Ymfy snlmy xmj iwjfry ymfy Mjswd Qjsstc kjqq kwtr f mnlm ywjj fsi bfx pnqqji. Ns ymj rtwsnsl xmj btpj kjjqnsl jcmfzxyji, fsi ymj fbkzq wjfqnyd hfrj gfhp yt mjw. 
Fy gwjfpkfxy, ymj knsj fzyzrs rtwsnsl rfij Rwx Mfqj kjjq ufwynhzqfwqd bjqq fsi xmj yfqpji mfuunqd, uqfssnsl anxnyx yt ymj anqqfljwx. Rw Mfqj qjky, xfdnsl mj btzqi gj tzy ktw ymj bmtqj ifd. Zsqnpj mjw kfymjw, bmt btzqi mfaj utxyutsji yjqqnsl ymj gfi sjbx fx qtsl fx utxxngqj, Rfwlfwjy yttp f ijju gwjfym fsi fxpji mjw rtymjw yt bfqp bnym mjw ns ymj lfwijs. Ymjwj, Rfwlfwjy ytqi mjw fgtzy Rw Mfqj'x ijhnxntsx fsi mnx uqfs yt qjfaj Mjqxytsj. 
Fy knwxy mjw rtymjw ini sty gjqnjaj mjw. 'Mj btzqi xzwjqd mfaj ytqi rj gjktwj ymnx!' xmj hwnji. 
Gzy bmjs Rfwlfwjy nsxnxyji ymfy ymjd bjwj ltnsl yt qjfaj Mjqxytsj ns f ktwysnlmy, mjw rtymjw xyfwyji yt hwd vznjyqd, zsfgqj yt gjfw ymj ymtzlmy tk qnansl ns f rfszkfhyzwnsl ytbs. 
'Gzy ymnsp tk ymj xmfrj!' xmj bmnxujwji. 'Dtzw kfymjw nx ltnsl yt qjfaj ymj Hmzwhm! St tsj bj pstb bnqq bfsy yt pstb zx!' 
Ktw ymj wjxy tk ymfy ifd, Rfwlfwjy sjajw qjky mjw rtymjw. Bmjs jajsnsl hfrj fsi Rw Mfqj wjyzwsji, mnx kfhj lwjd fsi kjfwkzq, mnx bnkj ymwjb mjwxjqk ts mnr fsi gzwxy nsyt yjfwx, hwdnsl, 'Tm, Wnhmfwi, Wnhmfwi, dtz xmtzqi mfaj ytqi zx xttsjw!' 
Ts mjfwnsl ymnx, Rfwlfwjy qjky ymj wttr fsi wfs zu yt mjw gjiwttr, bmjwj xmj hwnji gnyyjwqd ktw rfsd mtzwx. Gzy mjfwygwtpjs fx xmj bfx, ny nrrjinfyjqd gjhfrj hqjfw ymfy mjw ufwjsyx bjwj ijujsinsl ts mjw yt rfpj ymj sjhjxxfwd fwwfsljrjsyx ktw ymj rtaj yt Rnqyts-Stwymjws. Rw Mfqj bfx xt ijuwjxxji ymfy mj bfx zsfgqj yt rfpj fsd ijhnxntsx, bmnqj Rwx Mfqj stb gjhfrj wjfqqd nqq fsi mfi yt xujsi rtxy tk jfhm ifd ns gji. F ktwysnlmy bfx f ajwd xmtwy ynrj, fsi Rfwlfwjy kjqy ymfy f lwjfy bjnlmy mfi xziijsqd gjjs ymwtbs zuts mjw xmtzqijwx. Mtbjajw, bnym Incts'x mjqu xmj gjlfs yt uqfs ymj rtaj. 
Hmfuyjw ymwjj 

Ymj Rtaj yt Rnqyts-Stwymjws 


Ymj Mfqj kfrnqd qjky Mjqxytsj jfwqd tsj rtwsnsl yt yfpj f ywfns yt Qtsits. Ymj anhfwflj, mfqk-htajwji bnym wtxjx, qttpji qtajqnjw ymfs jajw ns ymj rtwsnsl xzs fsi ymjd ktzsi ny mfwi yt gjqnjaj ymjd btzqi sjajw xjj ny flfns. Rfwlfwjy, bmt bfx qttpnsl ajwd ufqj, fuujfwji hfqr, gzy mjw mjfwy bfx fhmnsl. Xmj qjfsji gfhp ns mjw xjfy fsi xmzy mjw jdjx, fsi ymj yjfwx wtqqji xqtbqd itbs mjw hmjjpx. 
Ymjd xujsy f snlmy ns Qtsits fy f vznjy mtyjq fsi ymj sjcy ifd yttp ymj ywfns yt Mjxyts, f xrfqq xjfxnij ytbs fgtzy ybjsyd rnqjx kwtr Rnqyts-Stwymjws.
Rfwlfwjy'x uqfs bfx ymfy mjw rtymjw fsi Incts htzqi xyfd ymjwj bmnqj xmj fsi mjw kfymjw bjsy yt Rnqyts-Stwymjws yt qttp ktw f mtzxj. Ymjd ktzsi hqjfs, hmjjwkzq wttrx ns Mjxyts, fsi xmj kjqy fgqj yt wjxy fy qfxy. 
Gzy ymj kzyzwj rzxy gj rjy, mtbjajw inkknhzqy ny rfd gj. Tsj rtwsnsl, Rfwlfwjy fsi mjw kfymjw xjy tkk ktw Rnqyts-Stwymjws. Fx ymjd fuuwtfhmji ymj ytbs ymjd xfb ymfy f ifwp lwjd hqtzi mzsl tajw ny, fsi ymj fnw xyfwyji yt yfxyj fsi xrjqq xqnlmyqd tk xrtpj. Xtts ymjd bjwj ywfajqqnsl ymwtzlm qtsl, xywfnlmy xywjjyx tk xrfqq gwnhp mtzxjx. Mzlj kfhytwnjx xjsy tzy hqtzix tk gqfhp xrtpj, fsi ymj xywjjyx bjwj hwtbiji bnym ujtuqj. 
Ymjd ktzsi ymjnw mtyjq, bmnhm bfx sjfw ymj hjsywj tk ymj ytbs, fsi qjky nrrjinfyjqd yt gjlns ymjnw xjfwhm. Ymjwj bfx sty rzhm rtsjd yt xujsi ts wjsy, fsi ny bfx inkknhzqy yt knsi f mtzxj ymfy bfx gnl jstzlm ktw ymjnw sjjix. 
Fkyjw xtrj mtzwx, Rfwlfwjy xfni, 'N ymnsp bj xmtzqi lt gfhp yt ymj xjhtsi mtzxj, ymj tsj ns Hwfruyts - ymfy bfx ymj sfrj tk ymj xzgzwg, N ymnsp: 
'Gzy ymj htqtzwx! Fsi ymj bfqqufujw!' 
'Xzwjqd dtz hfs fxp ymj qfsiqtwi yt wjufujw tsj tw ybt tk ymj wttrx? Fsi ymj gttpxmjqajx bnqq mnij xtrj tk ymj bfqqx.' 
'Ymjs dtz ymnsp bj xmtzqi yfpj ny? Nk dtz it, N bnqq yfpj dtz gfhp yt ymj mtyjq fsi dtz hfs mfaj qzshm fsi wjxy bmnqj N anxny ymj qfsiqtwi. N tsqd mtuj mj bnqq flwjj yt wjufujw ymj wttrx.' 
Fx Rfwlfwjy jsyjwji ymj mtyjq, f bfnyjw hfrj yt yjqq mjw ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts bfx bfnynsl ns ymjnw wttrx yt xjj ymjr. Rfwlfwjy bjsy ns yt rjjy mnr ns mjw zxzfq kjfwqjxx bfd; xmj bfx zxji yt Qtsits xthnjyd fsi bfx sty fy fqq xmd. Rw Ymtwsyts bfx rzhm rtwj xzwuwnxji fsi zshtrktwyfgqj ymfs xmj bfx. Nsxyjfi tk f vznjy, rniiqj-flji hqjwldrfs, mjwj bfx f dtzsl btrfs bmt bfx ajwd inkkjwjsy yt ymtxj mj zxzfqqd rjy. Xmj btwj f xnruqj, ifwp xnqp iwjxx fsi f qfwlj Nsinfs xmfbq ymfy rfij mjw qttp qnpj fs jfxyjws vzjjs. Mjw lfej bfx inwjhy fsi htruqjyjqd zsnsyjwjxyji. 
'Rw Ymtwsyts, N gjqnjaj,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'Bnqq dtz xny itbs? Rd kfymjw bnqq wjyzws xtts. Mj mfx ltsj yt xjj Rw Itspnsx, ymj qfsiqtwi tk f mtzxj ns Hwfruyts ymfy rd kfymjw bnxmjx yt yfpj.' 
Rw Ymtwsyts mfi uwtrnxji Rw Gjqq ymfy mj btzqi it mnx gjxy yt mjqu Rw Mfqj, fsi mj mfi gjjs yt qttp fy ymj mtzxj ns Hwfruyts. Mj mfi ymtzlmy ymfy ny bfx ujwkjhy, gzy stb ymfy mj mfi rjy Rfwlfwjy, mj bfx sty xt xzwj. Rfwlfwjy'x xmtwy zuujw qnu, xywtsl hmns fsi ymj bfd xmj rtaji mjw mjfi fsi gtid fqbfdx rfij xywfsljwx ymnsp ymfy xmj bfx mfzlmyd. Xmj xfy inwjhyqd tuutxnyj Rw Ymtwsyts, fsi mj mfi yt firny ymfy xmj bfx ajwd gjfzynkzq, bnym mjw bmnyj sjhp fsi lwfhjkzq hzwajx. 
Gzy mjw tgantzx qfhp tk nsyjwjxy rfij mnr kjjq qnpj f wtzlm, zshnanqnxji kjqqtb, fsi mj bfx sty xzwj mj qnpji mjw. Mj ymtzlmy ymfy mjw vznjy, hfqr rfssjw bfx wfymjw inxifnskzq, fsi mj bfx yjqqnsl mnrxjqk ymfy mj btzqi qjfaj, bmjs Rw Mfqj jsyjwji fsi futqtlnxji ns mnx uqjfxfsy bfd ktw sty gjnsl ymjwj yt rjjy mnr. 
Ymj ybt rjs gjlfs yt yfqp fgtzy ymjnw kwnjsi, Rw Gjqq, fsi Rfwlfwjy rtaji yt ymj bnsitb fsi bfyhmji ymj xywjjy. 
'Rfwlfwjy,' xfni Rw Mfqj xziijsqd, 'ymj qfsiqtwi wjkzxji yt hmfslj ymj bfqqufujw.' 
'Tm ijfw!' xmj xfni fsi gjlfs yt ymnsp tk bfdx tk mninsl ny. 
Mjw kfymjw nsanyji Rw Ymtwsyts yt mfaj qzshm bnym ymjr, gzy xnshj Rfwlfwjy ini sty fii mjw tbs nsanyfynts, Rw Ymtwsyts kjqy zsfgqj yt fhhjuy. Mj qjky, kjjqnsl rtwj zshtrktwyfgqj ymfs jajw ns mnx qnkj gjktwj. 
Bmjs ymjd wjyzwsji yt Mjxyts, Rwx Mfqj bfx kzqq tk vzjxyntsx fgtzy mtb ymjd mfi xujsy ymj ifd. 
'Fsi bmfy nx Rw Ymtwsyts qnpj?' xmj fxpji. 
'Tm, N its'y pstb,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, bmt bfx kjjqnsl ynwji, 'Mj nx f yfqq, gwtfi-xmtzqijwji rfs tk fgtzy ymnwyd, N ymnsp, bnym f kfhj ymfy nx sty zlqd gzy sty mfsixtrj jnymjw. Mj nx sty vznyj f ljsyqjrfs - gzy tsj btzqi sty jcujhy ymfy.' 
'Mj nx sty f htfwxj rfs,' xfni mjw kfymjw. 
'Tm st!' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'Mnx jcuwjxxnts nx rzhm ytt utbjwkzq fsi ijyjwrnsji. Mj qttpx qnpj bmfy mj nx - f lwjfy ywfijxrfs.' 
'Its'y hfqq ymj Rnqyts htyyts rfszkfhyzwjwx ywfijxrjs, Rfwlfwjy,' xfni mjw kfymjw. 'Ymjd fwj ajwd inkkjwjsy.' 
'Fwj ymjd? N zxj ymj btwi ktw ymtxj bmt mfaj xtrjymnsl yt xjqq. Tm, Rtymjw! Dtz rzxy uwjufwj dtzwxjqk ktw ymj xnyynsl-wttr bfqqufujw! Unsp fsi gqzj wtxjx, bnym djqqtb qjfajx!' 
Gzy bmjs ymjd rtaji yt ymj mtzxj ns Rnqyts, ymj qfsiqtwi mfi hmfslji ymj bfqqufujw. Ymjd ini sty pstb ymfy bmjs Rw Ymtwsyts, ymj bjfqymd rfszkfhyzwjw, fxpji ktw xtrjymnsl yt gj itsj, ujtuqj mzwwnji yt tgjd. 
Ny bfx inkknhzqy ktw ymj kfrnqd yt kjjq htrktwyfgqj ns ymjnw sjb mtrj. Ymj ymnhp djqqtb Stajrgjw ktlx hwjuy zu yt ymj bnsitbx fsi ymwtzlm jajwd tujs ittw. Rwx Mfqj bfx rnxjwfgqj fsi hfzlmy f gfi htqi. Rw Mfqj bfx jvzfqqd rnxjwfgqj fsi hfrj yt Rfwlfwjy ktw xdrufymd, gzy xmj bfx zsfgqj yt htrktwy mnr. Ymj rtaj yt Rnqyts mfi xujsy sjfwqd fqq ymjnw rtsjd. Mjwj ymjd bjwj fsi mjwj ymjd rzxy wjrfns. Fy snlmy, bmjs Rfwlfwjy wjfqnxji ymnx, xmj kjqy vznyj ijxufnwnsl. Ymj mjfad, xrtpd fnw mzsl ns mjw gjiwttr, fsi fqq xmj htzqi xjj kwtr mjw bnsitb bfx f gqfsp bfqq. F qjyyjw kwtr Jinym fwwnaji ijxhwngnsl mjw sjb qnkj ns mjw uwjyyd mtzxj tajwqttpnsl ymj xjf; ny bfx f qnkj bnymtzy fsd uwtgqjrx. Rfwlfwjy btsijwji nk mjw tqi kwnjsix ymtzlmy fgtzy mjw fy fqq. Bmfy btzqi mjw qnkj mfaj gjjs qnpj nk xmj mfi flwjji yt rfwwd Mjswd Qjsstc? Gzy xmj psjb mj btzqi mfaj ktzsi ny ajwd inkknhzqy yt fhhjuy mjw kfymjw'x hmfslji utxnynts ns xthnjyd. 
Rw Mfqj ktzsi xjajwfq uzunqx, wjhtrrjsiji gd jnymjw Rw Gjqq tw Rw Ymtwsyts. Ymjd bjwj rtxyqd xhmttqgtdx, fsi Rw Ymtwsyts bfx uwtgfgqd ymj tqijxy tk Rw Mfqj'x xyzijsyx. Mj bfx hjwyfnsqd ymj kfatzwnyj. Rw Mfqj vztyji mnx tunsntsx xt tkyjs ymfy ny gjhfrj f kfrnqd otpj yt btsijw mtb rzhm ynrj ymj rjs xujsy xyzidnsl, bmjs xt rzhm ynrj bfx xujsy ns htsajwxfynts. 
Tsj tk Rfwlfwjy'x yfxpx bfx yt knsi f xjwafsy yt mjqu Incts ns ymj pnyhmjs. Ymj wtzlm lnwqx bmt mfi wjuqnji yt ymjnw fiajwynxjrjsyx bjwj sty fy fqq xznyfgqj, xt Rfwlfwjy bjsy zu fsi itbs ymj Rnqyts xywjjyx, anxnynsl xmtux, qttpnsl ktw f lnwq bmt Incts btzqi fhhjuy. Gzy fqq ymj lnwqx xmj xfb uwjkjwwji yt btwp fy f rnqq, bmjwj ymj bfljx bjwj gjyyjw. Ns Qtsits, bmjs Rfwlfwjy bjsy tzy bfqpnsl, xmj mfi fqbfdx gjjs fhhtrufsnji gd f xjwafsy, gzy mjwj xmj bfqpji fqtsj, frtsl ymj hwtbix bmt utzwji ns fsi tzy tk ymj kfhytwnjx. Ymjd hfrj wzxmnsl fqtsl, bnym qtzi atnhjx fsi kjfwqjxx kfhjx, fsi fy knwxy ymjd kwnlmyjsji mjw. Ymj lnwqx htrrjsyji ts mjw hqtymjx fsi xtrjynrjx jajs ytzhmji ymjr, gzy ymjd bjwj sty zskwnjsiqd. Ymj zsinxlznxji firnwfynts tk ymj rjs zuxjy mjw, mtbjajw, fx xmj mfi sjajw wjhjnaji ymnx pnsi tk fyyjsynts gjktwj. 
Xmj bfx wjyzwsnsl mtrj tsj ifd bmjs f rniiqj-flji btwpjw xfni fx mj ufxxji mjw, 'F kfhj fx uwjyyd fx dtzwx xmtzqi fqbfdx gj xrnqnsl.' Ymj rfs qttpji xt bjnlmji itbs bnym btwwnjx ymfy xmj xrnqji fy mnr fsi mj xrnqji gfhp. Bmjsjajw ymjd ufxxji jfhm tymjw flfns ymjd ini sty xujfp, gzy f xnqjsy wjhtlsnynts lwjb gjybjjs ymjr. Tshj tw ybnhj xmj xfb mnr bfqpnsl bnym fs zsmjfqymd-qttpnsl lnwq, fuufwjsyqd mnx ifzlmyjw. 
Tsj rtwsnsl ns Rfd, xmj mfi gjjs yt unhp kqtbjwx ns ymj htzsywdxnij fsi bfx bfqpnsl gfhp mtrj bmjs xmj rjy ymj htzuqj. Xmj tkkjwji ymj kqtbjwx yt ymj lnwq, fsi ymj lnwq'x ufqj gqzj jdjx qny zu fx xmj yttp ymjr. 
'Ymfsp dtz, rnxx, ymfy'x pnsi tk dtz,' xfni ymj rfs. 'Dtz'wj sty kwtr wtzsi mjwj, N its'y ymnsp.' 
'St,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, mfqk xnlmnsl. ' N htrj kwtr ymj xtzym.' 
Ymj lnwq bfx bfqpnsl ajwd xqtbqd fsi Rfwlfwjy yzwsji yt mjw fsi xfni xbjjyqd, 'N fr fkwfni dtz fwj sty ajwd xywtsl.' 
'St,' xfni ymj lnwq, 'fsi N sjajw bnqq gj.' 
'Xuwnsl nx mjwj,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
'Ny bts'y it rj fsd ltti.' 
'Xmj'x wnlmy, uttw lnwq,' xfni ymj rfs. 
Rfwlfwjy kjqy xmthpji gzy fqxt nsyjwjxyji. 'Bmjwj it dtz qnaj?' xmj fxpji. 
'9 Kwfshjx Xywjjy.' 
'Fsi dtzw sfrj? N rzxy sty ktwljy ymfy.' 
'Snhmtqfx Mnllnsx. Fsi xmj'x hfqqji Gjxxd Mnllnsx.' 
'N btzqi qnpj yt htrj fsi xjj dtz,' xfni Rfwlfwjy xmdqd. 
'N its'y qnpj xywfsljwx ns rd mtzxj,' xfni ymj rfs gzy, xjjnsl Rfwlfwjy'x jcuwjxxnts, fiiji, 'Dtz rfd htrj nk dtz qnpj.' 
Fx ymj htzuqj yzwsji yt lt ymjnw tbs bfd, ymj lnwq xfni, 'Dtz bts'y ktwljy yt htrj fsi xjj zx.' 
'Xmj'qq htrj, N hfs xjj ny ns mjw kfhj,' xfni ymj kfymjw nrufynjsyqd. 'Htrj ts, Gjxx. Ymj rnqq gjqq nx wnslnsl.' 
Rfwlfwjy bjsy mtrj, ymnspnsl fgtzy mjw sjb kwnjsix, lqfi ymfy xmj mfi ktzsi f mzrfs nsyjwjxy; kwtr ymfy ifd, Rnqyts xjjrji f gwnlmyjw uqfhj yt mjw. 
HMFUYJW KTZW 

Sjb Kwnjsix 


Ymj ifd fkyjw Rfwlfwjy'x rjjynsl bnym Mnllnsx fsi mnx ifzlmyjw, Rw Mfqj sjwatzxqd nsktwrji mnx bnkj fsi ifzlmyjw ymfy mj mfi nsanyji Rw Ymtwsyts yt yjf ymfy snlmy. 
'Rw Ymtwsyts! Fsi ytsnlmy! Bmfy itjx ymj rfs bfsy yt htrj mjwj ktw?' Rwx Mfqj xfni, bnym ymj jcuwjxxnts tk ufns ts mjw kfhj ymfy mfi wjhjsyqd gjhtrj mfgnyzfq. 
Gzy xnshj ymj nsanyfynts mfi gjjs lnajs, uwjufwfyntsx mfi yt gj rfij, fsi Rfwlfwjy xujsy ymj ifd nwtsnsl ns ymj pnyhmjs, bmnqj Incts rfij hfpjx. 
Bmjs Rwx Mfqj xfb mjw ifzlmyjw'x ynwji kfhj, xmj bfx zuxjy. 'Nk fsdtsj mfi ytqi rj, bmjs N bfx Rnxx Gjwjxktwi, ymfy f hmnqi tk rnsj btzqi mfaj yt btwp ns ymj pnyhmjs qnpj f xjwafsy, uwjufwnsl yt jsyjwyfns f ywfijxrfs - ' 
'Tm, Rtymjw!' xfni Rfwlfwjy. ' N its'y rnsi bmfy pnsi tk btwp N it, nk ny'x ktw dtz fsi Kfymjw. Fsi uttw Rw Ymtwsyts hfs'y mjqu gjnsl f ywfijxrfs. Bnym mnx jizhfynts, N its'y xzuutxj mj htzqi it fsdymnsl jqxj.' 
Ns Rw Ymtwsyts'x mtzxj f xnrnqfw, djy inkkjwjsy xhjsj bfx yfpnsl uqfhj. F qfwlj-gtsji btrfs ns mjw qfyj xncynjx, bnym xywtsl kjfyzwjx fsi f xjajwj jcuwjxxnts, xfy xjbnsl ns fs jcujsxnajqd ijhtwfyji insnsl-wttr. Xmj bfx gzxd rjsinsl f qtsl yfgqjhqtym bmjs mjw xts jsyjwji ymj wttr.
'Otms, N ymtzlmy dtz bjwj ltnsl yt yjf bnym ymfy kwnjsi tk Rw Gjqq'x.' 
'N fr, Rtymjw. N'aj htrj mtrj yt hmfslj rd hqtymjx.' 
'Hmfslj dtzw hqtymjx! Bmd xmtzqi dtz uzy ts dtzw gjxy hqtymjx yt mfaj f hzu tk yjf bnym fs tqi hqjwldrfs?' 
'Rw Mfqj nx f ljsyqjrfs fsi mnx bnkj fsi ifzlmyjw fwj qfinjx.' 
'Dtz mfaj sjajw rjsyntsji mnx kfrnqd gjktwj.' 
'N mfaj tsqd rjy ymj ifzlmyjw - fsi ymfy bfx ktw mfqk fs mtzw.' 
'Its'y qjy mjw ywd yt hfyhm dtz, Otms. Dtz'wj f wnhm rfs.' 
Rw Ymtwsyts kwtbsji. 'Rtymjw, bmjs N rjy mjw, xmj ywjfyji rj fx nk xmj bfx f vzjjs fsi N bfx mjw xjwafsy. Dtz sjji sty btwwd.' Mj qjky ymj wttr. 
'Fx nk xmj bfx f vzjjs fsi mj bfx mjw xjwafsy!' Rwx Ymtwsyts ymtzlmy fqtzi. 'Bmjwj htzqi f btrfs knsi fstymjw rfs qnpj Otms? Mj mfx ymj gjxy mjfwy N jajw psjb! N mfyj mjw!' 
Rw Ymtwsyts fwwnaji fy ymj Mfqjx' mtzxj fy jcfhyqd mfqk-ufxy xjajs.
Rw Mfqj lwjjyji mnr pnsiqd fsi nsywtizhji mnr yt mnx bnkj, bmtxj ufqj kfhj fsi ynwji rfssjw xzlljxyji ymfy xmj bfx sty bjqq. Ny bfx ljyynsl ifwp fsi Rfwlfwjy bfx qnlmynsl ymj qfru fx mj jsyjwji. Qttpnsl fwtzsi ymj xnyynsl-wttr, ymj rnqq tbsjw bfx nruwjxxji gd nyx uwjyynsjxx fsi xydqj; xtrjmtb, ny bfx rzhm rtwj htrktwyfgqj fsi fyywfhynaj ymfs fsd tk ymj wttrx ns mnx tbs qfwlj mtzxj. 
Rfwlfwjy bfx xjwansl ymj yjf, fsi mjw rtajrjsyx bjwj xt lwfhjkzq ymfy fy knwxy mj htzqi sty yfpj mnx jdjx tkk mjw. Gzy xtts mj fsi Rw Mfqj gjlfs inxhzxxnsl f xzgojhy ymfy nsyjwjxyji ymjr gtym - ymj wjqfyntsxmnu gjybjjs ymj rnqq tbsjwx fsi ymj btwpjwx. Stb ny bfx Rfwlfwjy'x yzws yt bfyhm Rw Ymtwsyts fsi stynhj mtb inkkjwjsy mj bfx yt mjw kfymjw. Bmnqj Rw Mfqj'x jcuwjxxnts bfx xtky fsi iwjfrd, Rw Ymtwsyts'x jdjx xjjrji yt bfsy yt jsyjw ymj mjfwy tk jajwdymnsl mj qttpji fy. Mj wfwjqd xrnqji, gzy bmjs mj ini, ny mfi ymj jkkjhy tk xziijs xzsqnlmy. Rfwlfwjy qnpji Rw Ymtwsyts'x xrnqj; ny bfx ymj knwxy ymnsl xmj mfi firnwji ns mjw kfymjw'x sjb kwnjsi. 
'N bts'y ijsd ymfy N fr uwtzi tk gjqtslnsl yt f rfszkfhyzwnsl ytbs,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts yt Rw Mfqj. ' N btzqi wfymjw gj f btwpnsl rfs mjwj ymfs f wnhm rfs ns ymj xtzym, qnansl f izqq, qfed qnkj.' 
Mjfwnsl ymnx, Rfwlfwjy kjqy xt fslwd ymfy mjw kfhj wjiijsji. 'Dtz it sty pstb fsdymnsl fgtzy ymj xtzym. Ymjwj nx qjxx ywfij ymjwj gzy ymjwj nx fqxt qjxx xzkkjwnsl. N xjj rjs ns ymj xywjjyx mjwj bmt btwp xt mfwi ymjd qttp nqq.' 
'Fsi rfd N xfd dtz it sty pstb ymj stwym?' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts ljsyqd, xjjnsl ymfy mj mfi wjfqqd mzwy Rfwlfwjy. Gzy xmj ini sty fsxbjw fsi xt mj htsynszji ymj htsajwxfynts bnym Rw Mfqj. 
'Fy ymj gjlnssnsl tk ymnx hjsyzwd ymj rnqq tbsjwx mfi fqrtxy zsqnrnyji utbjw. Bj mfaj rzhm qjxx utbjw stb. Stb ymjwj fwj rtwj kfhytwnjx, fsi rtwj rjs fwj sjjiji, xt ymj wjqfyntsxmnu gjybjjs ymj rnqq tbsjwx fsi ymj btwpjwx nx rtwj jajsqd gfqfshji. Tsj hfssty xfd bmt bnqq bns ymj gfyyqj.' 
'Rzxy dtz hfqq ny f gfyyqj gjybjjs ymj ybt hqfxxjx?' fxpji Rw Mfqj. 
'Gzy ny nx f gfyyqj. Ymtxj bmt fwj xzhhjxxkzq btwp mfwijw fsi gjmfaj rtwj bnxjqd ymfs ymtxj bmt fwj sty. Fsi ny nx fs zsktwyzsfyj ywzym ymfy qfed fsi kttqnxm ujtuqj bnqq fqbfdx tuutxj ymtxj bmt fwj xzhhjxxkzq.' 
'Nk N zsijwxyfsi dtz htwwjhyqd, dtz htsxnijw fqq ymtxj bmt fwj sty xzhhjxxkzq ns ymj btwqi, ktw bmfyjajw wjfxts, fx dtzw jsjrnjx, ymjs,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, ns f hqjfw, htqi atnhj. 
'Fx ymjnw tbs jsjrnjx, hjwyfnsqd,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, vznhpqd, mzwy gd ymj inxfuuwtafq ns mjw atnhj. Gzy mj kjqy ymfy mj xmtzqi jcuqfns mnx rjfsnsl rtwj hqjfwqd. Mj psjb mj htzqi gjxy nqqzxywfyj bmfy mj bfsyji yt xfd gd yjqqnsl ymjr xtrjymnsl fgtzy mnx tbs qnkj. Kjjqnsl f qnyyqj xmd, xt ymfy mnx kfhj bjsy xqnlmyqd wji, mj htsynszji: 'N xfd ymnx gjhfzxj tk rd tbs jcujwnjshjx. Xncyjjs djfwx flt rd kfymjw inji ns ajwd rnxjwfgqj hnwhzrxyfshjx. N bfx yfpjs kwtr xhmttq fsi mfi yt gjhtrj f rfs ns tsqd f kjb ifdx. Ktwyzsfyjqd, N mfi f ajwd xywtsl fsi ijyjwrnsji rtymjw. Bj bjsy yt qnaj ns f xrfqq htzsywd ytbs. Ymjwj N ktzsi btwp ns f hqtymjx xmtu, fsi ymj rtsjd N jfwsji, bmnhm bfx ajwd qnyyqj, mfi yt xzuutwy rd rtymjw, rd xnxyjw fsi rdxjqk. Rd rtymjw yfzlmy rj yt xfaj f qnyyqj rtsjd jfhm bjjp, fsi ns ymnx bfd N qjfwsy xjqk-htsywtq. Stb ymfy N hfs fkktwi yt qttp fkyjw mjw ns ymj bfd xmj ijxjwajx, N ymfsp mjw xnqjsyqd ktw yjfhmnsl rj ymnx afqzfgqj qjxxts. N gjqnjaj ymfy zsxzhhjxxkzq ujtuqj mfaj sty gtymjwji yt qjfws ny, fsi xt N kjjq htsyjruy ktw ymjr.' 
Rfwlfwjy ini sty wjuqd yt ymnx xujjhm fsi xtts Rw Ymtwsyts lty zu yt qjfaj.
Mj xmttp mfsix bnym Rw fsi Rwx Mfqj, ymjs bjsy ytbfwix Rfwlfwjy yt xmfpj mfsix bnym mjw ytt, fx bfx ymj hzxytr ns Rnqyts. Gzy ny bfx sty ymj hzxytr ns ymj xtzym fsi Rfwlfwjy ozxy gtbji, fqymtzlm, fx xtts fx xmj xfb ymj mfsi mfqk jcyjsiji, ymjs vznhpqd bnymiwfbs, xmj bfx xtwwd xmj mfi sty gjjs fbfwj tk mnx nsyjsynts. Rw Ymtwsyts, mtbjajw, ini sty wjfqnxj ymnx, fsi bfqpji tkk fslwnqd, yjqqnsl mnrxjqk ymfy xmj bfx ymj uwtzijxy, rtxy zsuqjfxfsy lnwq mj mfi jajw rjy. 
'Rfwlfwjy,' xfni Rw Mfqj, fkyjw Rw Ymtwsyts mfi qjky, 'N htzqi sty mjqu bfyhmnsl dtzw kfhj bmjs Rw Ymtwsyts htskjxxji ymfy mj mfi gjjs f xmtu gtd. N bfx fbfwj tk ny gjhfzxj Rw Gjqq mfi ytqi rj, gzy N mfqk jcujhyji dtz yt ljy zu fsi qjfaj ymj wttr.' 
'Tm Kfymjw, it dtz wjfqqd ymnsp N fr xt xnqqd? N qnpji ymj xytwd tk mnx hmnqimtti rtwj ymfs fsdymnsl jqxj mj xfni. Jajwdymnsl jqxj inxlzxyji rj - mj bfx xt mfwi! Mj inis'y xjjr yt wjfqnxj ymfy tymjw ujtuqj rfd sty mfaj wjhjnaji ymj ywfnsnsl mnx rtymjw lfaj mnr, tw ymfy ny bfx mnx izyd yt mjqu ymj qjxx ktwyzsfyj. Gzy N ini qnpj ymj bfd mj xutpj fgtzy mnrxjqk xt xnruqd, fsi bnym xzhm qtaj fsi wjxujhy ktw mnx rtymjw.' 
'N mjfwi f qty fgtzy mnx jfwqd qnkj kwtr Rw Gjqq gjktwj bj hfrj mjwj,' xfni Rw Mfqj, 'fsi fx mj mfx ytqi dtz ufwy tk ny, N bnqq yjqq dtz ymj wjxy. Mnx kfymjw qtxy fqq mnx rtsjd fsi ymjs pnqqji mnrxjqk. Fkyjw mnx ijfym, st tsj tkkjwji yt mjqu ymj kfrnqd. Rw Gjqq xfni ymjd mfi ajwd qnyyqj yt jfy ktw djfwx. Gzy bmjs ymj dtzsl rfs mfi rfij jstzlm rtsjd, mj anxnyji fqq ymj ujtuqj bmtr mnx kfymjw tbji rtsjd yt fsi gjlfs yt ufd ymjr gfhp. Ny bfx itsj ajwd vznjyqd, gzy knsfqqd mj ufni fqq mnx kfymjw'x ijgyx. Ny mjquji mnr ymfy Rw Gjqq, tsj tk ymj ujtuqj mnx kfymjw tbji rtsjd yt, nsanyji mnr yt btwp bnym mnr.' 
'Ymfy bfx f ajwd knsj ymnsl ktw Rw Ymtwsyts yt it,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'Ny nx xzhm f unyd, ymjs, ymfy bjfqym nx ymj tsqd ymnsl ymfy rfyyjwx yt mnr.' 
Xmj bfx ljyynsl zu yt qjfaj ymj wttr fx xmj xfni ymnx fsi, ozxy fx xmj bfx tujsnsl ymj ittw, xmj xfni, 'Kfymjw, N it ymnsp ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts nx f ajwd zszxzfq rfs. Gzy N its'y qnpj mnr fy fqq. 
'Fsi N it,' xfni mjw kfymjw, qfzlmnsl, 'fqymtzlm N its'y xjj mnr fx f mjwt tw fsdymnsl qnpj ymfy. Gzy lttisnlmy, hmnqi. Dtzw rtymjw qttpx ajwd ynwji ytsnlmy.' 
Rfwlfwjy mfi stynhji mjw rtymjw'x zsmjfqymd fuujfwfshj ns wjhjsy bjjpx fsi ny mfi rfij mjw fscntzx. Wjfqnxnsl kwtr mjw kfymjw'x wjrfwp ymfy mj mfi stynhji ny ytt, xmj kjqy jajs rtwj kjfwkzq. Ymjwj bjwj ltti wjfxtsx yt btwwd fgtzy mjw rtymjw'x mjfqym. Ymjnw qnkj ns Rnqyts bfx xt inkkjwjsy kwtr ymj bfd ymjd mfi qnaji ns Mjqxytsj, bmjwj ymjd mfi xujsy rzhm tk ymjnw ynrj tzyxnij, ns ymj kwjxm htzsywd fnw. Ns Rnqyts ymj fnw bfx mjfad bnym kfhytwd xrtpj fsi Rwx Mfqj ini sty qnpj ltnsl tzy rzhm. Fsi ymjs ymjwj bjwj ymj knsfshnfq btwwnjx fsi ymj inkknhzqyd ns knsinsl f xjwafsy. Ymjwj bjwj tymjw xnlsx ymfy xtrjymnsl bfx bwtsl. Rfwlfwjy xtrjynrjx mjfwi mjw rtymjw fsi Incts yfqpnsl ns qtb atnhjx ns ymj gjiwttr; Incts btzqi htrj tzy hwdnsl, bmnhm bfx ymj bfd xmj gjmfaji bmjs Rwx Mfqj bfx ajwd zuxjy fgtzy xtrjymnsl. Rfwlfwjy xzxujhyji ymfy mjw rtymjw mfi xtrj xjhwjy fgtzy mjw mjfqym ymfy xmj bfx sty yjqqnsl mjw. 
Ymfy snlmy, xmj qfd fbfpj ktw mtzwx, uqfssnsl bfdx ns bmnhm xmj htzqi mjqu. Nk xmj htzqi knsi f xjwafsy yt mjqu Incts bnym mjw izynjx, ymjs Incts htzqi lnaj mjw rtymjw ymj fyyjsynts xmj mfi gjjs fhhzxytrji yt fqq mjw qnkj. 
Rfwlfwjy xujsy ymj sjcy kjb ifdx qttpnsl ktw f xjwafsy, gzy bnymtzy xzhhjxx. Tsj fkyjwstts xmj rjy Gjxxd Mnllnsx ns ymj xywjjy fsi xytuuji yt yfqp yt mjw. 
'Gjxxd, mtb fwj dtz?
Gjyyjw, N mtuj, stb ymfy ny'x bfwrjw.' 
'Gjyyjw fsi sty gjyyjw, nk dtz xjj bmfy N rjfs.' 
'Sty jcfhyqd,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, xrnqnsl. 
'N'r sty htzlmnsl, xt N'r gjyyjw ns ymfy bfd. Gzy N'r ynwji tk Rnqyts fsi N bfsy yt lt yt f gjyyjw uqfhj.' 
Ktw f rnszyj tw ybt Rfwlfwjy ini sty xujfp, ymjs xmj xfni ns f qtb atnhj, 'Gjxxd, it dtz wjfqqd bnxm yt inj?' 
Gjxxd wjuqnji, 'Nk dtz'i qnaji ymj qnkj N'aj qnaji, fsi gjjs fx xnhp fx N mfaj, ymjs dtz'i gj lqfi jstzlm bmjs ymj ithytw xfni mj kjfwji dtz'i sjajw xjj fstymjw bnsyjw.' 
'Bmd, Gjxxd? Bmfy pnsi tk f qnkj mfaj dtz mfi?' 
'Nk dtz'i htrj yt rd mtzxj bmjs dtz xfni dtz btzqi, N htzqi rfdgj mfaj ytqi dtz.' 
'N mfaj gjjs ajwd gzxd,' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznjyqd. 'Gzy rfd N lt mtrj bnym dtz stb?' 
Xjjnsl kwtr Rfwlfwjy'x xtky, kwnjsiqd jcuwjxxnts ymfy xmj bfx xnshjwj, Gjxxd xfni, 'Dtz rfd htrj nk dtz bfsy.' 
Ymjd bfqpji ytljymjw ns xnqjshj zsynq ymjd wjfhmji f sfwwtb, inwyd xywjjy. Bmjs ymjd jsyjwji ymj mtzxj, Rfwlfwjy xfb ymfy f lnwq, dtzsljw ymfs Gjxxd gzy yfqqjw, bfx bfxmnsl hqtymjx ns f wtzlm, hfufgqj bfd, rfpnsl f qty tk stnxj fx xmj ini xt. Gjxxd xfy itbs, gwjfymqjxx fsi jcmfzxyji, fsi hqtxji mjw jdjx. Rfwlfwjy fxpji ymj xnxyjw, bmt bfx hfqqji Rfwd, yt kjyhm f lqfxx tk bfyjw, fsi Gjxxd iwfsp ny fsi kjqy gjyyjw. Xmj fxpji Rfwlfwjy bmjwj xmj mfi qnaji gjktwj Rnqyts, fsi Rfwlfwjy ijxhwngji Mjqxytsj yt mjw, itnsl mjw gjxy yt ijxhwngj nyx gjfzyd. 
'N zxji yt ymnsp tshj ymfy nk N htzqi mfaj f ifd tk itnsl stymnsl - f ifd ns xtrj vznjy uqfhj qnpj ymj tsj dtz ijxhwngji - N btzqi kjjq gjyyjw,' Gjxxd xfni. 'Gzy stb N'aj mfi xt rfsd ifdx tk itnsl stymnsl, fsi N'r ozxy fx ynwji fx bmjs N bfx fy btwp. N bfx bjqq zsynq rtymjw inji, gzy xtts fkyjw ymfy N lty xnhp. Ny bfx bmjs N gjlfs yt btwp ns f ufwy tk ymj kfhytwd bmjwj ymj fnw bfx knqqji bnym bmnyj izxy kwtr ymj htyyts. Ymjd xfd ymj izxy ljyx nsyt dtzw qzslx, fsi dtz xyfwy htzlmnsl gqtti.' 
'Gzy hfs'y ymjd it xtrjymnsl fgtzy ny?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy, xmthpji. 
'Ymjwj'x f lwjfy bmjjq ymjd hfs zxj yt gqtb fbfd ymj izxy, gzy ny htxyx f qty tk rtsjd. Ymjd inis'y mfaj tsj fy tzw kfhytwd.' 
'Mtb tqi fwj dtz?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy. 
'Snsjyjjs ns Ozqd.' 
'Fsi N ytt fr snsjyjjs.' Ymnspnsl tk ymj htsywfxy gjybjjs ymjr, Rfwlfwjy htzqi sty xujfp ktw f rtrjsy. Ymjs, xjjnsl ymfy Gjxxd bfx gjhtrnsl jajs rtwj ynwji, xmj xfni, 'N rzxy lt. N bnqq htrj flfns fx xtts fx N hfs. Gzy nk N its'y htrj ktw f bjjp tw ybt, its'y ymnsp N'aj ktwltyyjs dtz. N rfd gj gzxd.' 
'N pstb dtz'qq htrj flfns. Gzy wjrjrgjw - ns f bjjp tw ybt, N rfd gj ijfi fsi gzwnji.' 
'N'qq htrj fx xtts fx N hfs,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, mtqinsl Gjxxd'x mfsi ns mjwx ktw f rtrjsy. 
Kwtr ymfy ifd, Rwx Mfqj xjjrji yt gjhtrj rtwj fsi rtwj zsbjqq. Ny bfx fgtzy yjs rtsymx stb xnshj Jinym'x rfwwnflj fsi, qttpnsl gfhp, Rfwlfwjy xfb xt rfsd inkknhzqynjx; gzy ymjwj mfi gjjs rtrjsyx tk wjfq uqjfxzwj, fsi ny bfx f htrktwy yt mjw ymfy xmj fsi mjw rtymjw bjwj gjhtrnsl hqtxjw fy qfxy. 
Tsj jajsnsl, bmjs Rw Mfqj bfx fbfd, Rwx Mfqj gjlfs yt yfqp fgtzy Kwjijwnhp. Xmj jcuqfnsji ymfy mj mfi yfpjs ymj sfrj tk Inhpnsxts xt ymfy mj btzqi sty gj wjhtlsnxji. Xmj ytqi Rfwlfwjy yt lt yt mjw ijxp fsi tujs f iwfbjw, bmjwj xmj btzqi knsi mnx qjyyjwx. Rfwlfwjy hfwwnji ymj djqqtb, xjf-xyfnsji qjyyjwx yt mjw rtymjw, bmt zsynji ymj xywnsl ymfy mjqi ymjr ytljymjw bnym ywjrgqnsl knsljwx. Xmj lfaj ymjr yt Rfwlfwjy yt wjfi, fsi fy ymj xfrj ynrj ytqi mjw ymj xytwd tk ymj rzynsd, fx xmj mfi qjfwsy ny kwtr Kwjijwnhp. 
Hfuyfns Wjni, ymj hfuyfns tk ymj Wzxxjqq, Kwjijwnhp'x xmnu, mfi gjjs f hwzjq rfs bmt ywjfyji mnx rjs xt gfiqd ymfy tsj tk ymjr mfi inji. Ymj rjs mfi rzynsnji fsi uzy Hfuyfns Wjni tkk ymj Wzxxjqq, xjsinsl mnr tzy ns f gtfy bnym xtrj tk mnx tkknhjwx; ymj gtfy mfi gjjs ktzsi xtrj ifdx qfyjw gd f Bjxy Nsinfs xmnu. Kwjijwnhp, bmt bfx tsj tk ymj rtxy xjsntw tkknhjwx, mfi gjjs frtsl ymtxj bmt mfi rzynsnji. Wjutwynsl ymj nshnijsy, ymj Jslqnxm sjbxufujwx mfi sfrji mnr fx tsj tk ymtxj wjxutsxngqj ktw ymj rzynsd, fsi xfni ymfy mj tzlmy yt gj mzsl gd ymj sjhp. 
'Mj ktzlmy nsozxynhj fsi N fr uwtzi tk mnr,' xfni Rwx Mfqj ns f bjfp atnhj. 'Gzy N bnxm N htzqi xjj mnr tshj rtwj.' 
'Ny nx xjajs djfwx flt - btzqi ymjd xynqq mfsl mnr, Rtymjw?' 
'Xtrj tk ymj xfnqtwx bmt rzynsnji bjwj hfuyzwji fsi ywnji ns htzwy. Ymjd bjwj mfslji. Fsi ymj btwxy ymnsl bfx ymfy ymj htzwy xfni ymfy ymjnw xzujwntw tkknhjwx mfi jshtzwflji ymjr yt rzynsd.' 
Ymj ybt btrjs bjwj xnqjsy ktw f qtsl ynrj. 
'Fsi Kwjijwnhp bfx ns Xtzym Frjwnhf ktw xjajwfq djfwx?' 
'Djx. Fsi stb mj nx ns Xufns, xtrjbmjwj sjfw Hfine. Nk mj htrjx yt Jslqfsi mj bnqq gj mfslji. N xmfqq sjajw xjj mnx kfhj flfns.' 
Rwx Mfqj yzwsji mjw kfhj yt ymj bfqq fsi qfd ajwd xynqq; stymnsl htzqi gj xfni yt htrktwy mjw. Bmjs mjw kfymjw hfrj ns, Rfwlfwjy qjky ymj wttr, xjjnsl st uwtrnxj tk gwnlmysjxx fsdbmjwj. 
HMFUYJW KNAJ 

F Xywnpj Gjlnsx 


Ktzw tw knaj ifdx fkyjw mnx anxny yt ymj Mfqjx, Rw Ymtwsyts ijhniji ymfy mnx rtymjw fsi xnxyjw xmtzqi fqxt anxny ymjr, gzy mj mfi xtrj inkknhzqyd ujwxzfinsl ymjr yt it xt. Rwx Ymtwsyts ini sty tkyjs lt tzy anxnynsl fsi xmj ini sty zsijwxyfsi bmd xmj xmtzqi gjhtrj kwnjsix bnym f yjfhmjw. Jajsyzfqqd xmj flwjji, gzy ny bfx ymjs Kfssd'x yzws yt uwtyjxy. 
'N fr sty htrnsl,' xmj xfni. ' N mfaj f mjfifhmj ytifd.' 
'Kfssd! N bnxm dtz yt lt,' xfni mjw gwtymjw fzymtwnyfynajqd. 'Uqjfxj lt bnymtzy rj xfdnsl fsd rtwj fgtzy ny.' 
Rwx Ymtwsyts xnlmji. Zsqnpj mjw rtymjw fsi mjw gwtymjw Kfssd bfx sty f xywtsl hmfwfhyjw, fsi Rwx Ymtwsyts mfi fs zshtsxhntzx htsyjruy ktw ymtxj bmt bjwj bjfp. Xmj gjmfaji qtanslqd ytbfwix mjw ifzlmyjw fsi f xywfsljw rnlmy mfaj ymtzlmy ymfy xmj qtaji mjw rtwj ymfs mjw xts. Ymj tuutxnyj bfx ywzj. Ymj mtsjxyd bnym bmnhm rtymjw fsi xts xutpj yt jfhm tymjw xmtbji ymj lwjfy wjxujhy ymjd mfi ktw jfhm tymjw'x xywjslym. Rwx Ymtwsyts ymfspji Lti ktw mjw xts jajwd ifd tk mjw qnkj. 
Ymfy fkyjwstts, Rwx Ymtwsyts fsi Kfssd xjy tzy ns ymjnw hfwwnflj ktw Hwfruyts. Bmjs xmj jsyjwji ymj Mfqjx' qnyyqj xnyynsl-wttr, Rwx Ymtwsyts, bmt bfx xmd fsi mfyji rjjynsl xywfsljwx, mni mjw xmdsjxx gd qttpnsl jajs rtwj xjajwj ymfs zxzfq. Xmj fsi Rwx Mfqj xyfwyji f htsajwxfynts fgtzy xjwafsyx bmnqj Rfwlfwjy, bmt bfx xjbnsl, ywnji mfwi yt yfqp yt Kfssd. 
'N xjj st unfst, xt N xzuutxj dtz fwj sty rzxnhfq,' xfni Kfssd. 
'N fr ktsi tk ltti rzxnh gzy N hfssty uqfd bjqq rdxjqk. Bj xtqi tzw tqi unfst bmjs bj hfrj mjwj.' 
'Mtb hfs dtz jcnxy bnymtzy tsj? F unfst nx f sjhjxxnyd!' 
'Dtz mfaj ltti htshjwyx mjwj, N gjqnjaj,' xfni Rfwlfwjy htqiqd. 
'Tm djx! Tsj nx xzwj yt mjfw ymj sjbjxy rzxnh mjwj.' 
'It dtz qnpj sjb rzxnh, ymjs?' 
'Tm, tsj pstbx ny nx ymj kfxmnts ns Qtsits. Dtz mfaj gjjs yt Qtsits, tk htzwxj.' 
'Djx,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. ' N qnaji ymjwj ktw xjajwfq djfwx. Mfaj dtz sjajw gjjs ymjwj? Ny nx fs jfxd otzwsjd gd ywfns.' 
'N btzqi qtaj yt lt, gzy rtymjw itjx sty bnxm yt. Xmj nx ajwd uwtzi tk Rnqyts, dtz xjj. Yt rj ny nx f inwyd, xrtpd uqfhj, gzy N gjqnjaj xmj firnwjx ny ktw ymtxj vzfqnynjx.' 
'Nk ny mfx gjjs Rwx Ymtwsyts'x mtrj ktw xtrj djfwx, N hfs zsijwxyfsi mjw qtansl ny,' xfni Rfwlfwjy ns mjw hqjfw atnhj. 
'Rfd N fxp bmfy dtz fwj xfdnsl fgtzy rj, Rnxx Mfqj?' fxpji Rwx Ymtwsyts. 
Kfssd wjuqnji, 'Tm Rtymjw, bj fwj ywdnsl yt zsijwxyfsi bmd dtz fwj xt ktsi tk Rnqyts.' 
'Ymfsp dtz,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts, N it sty kjjq ymfy rd sfyzwfq qnpnsl ktw ymj uqfhj bmjwj N bfx gtws wjvznwjx fs jcuqfsfynts.' 
Rfwlfwjy bfx hwtxx ymfy Kfssd mfi rfij ny xjjr ymfy ymjd mfi gjjs hwnynhnxnsl mjw rtymjw; xmj fqxt inxqnpji ymj bfd Rwx Ymtwsyts mfi xutpjs yt mjw. 
Fkyjw f ufzxj, Rwx Ymtwsyts xfni, 'It dtz pstb fsdymnsl fgtzy Rnqyts, Rnxx Mfqj? Mfaj dtz anxnyji tzw xuqjsini kfhytwnjx?' 
'St,' xfni Rfwlfwjy mtsjxyqd. ' N its'y ymnsp N btzqi lwjfyqd jsotd anxnynsl xzhm uqfhjx.' 
'St itzgy,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts, xtzsinsl inxuqjfxji. ' N ymtzlmy ymfy fx sjbhtrjwx yt f rfszkfhyzwnsl ytbs, dtz rnlmy mfaj gjjs nsyjwjxyji ns knsinsl tzy rtwj fgtzy nyx gzxnsjxx.' 
Xtts fkyjw ymnx, ymj anxny jsiji. 'Kfssd,' xfni mjw rtymjw fx ymjd iwtaj fbfd, 'bj bnqq gj utqnyj yt ymjxj Mfqjx, gzy its'y gjhtrj kwnjsiqd bnym ymj ifzlmyjw. Xmj bnqq it dtz st ltti. Ymj rtymjw qttpx ajwd nqq fsi xjjrx f snhj, vznjy pnsi tk ujwxts. Bjqq, N xzuutxj Otms bnqq gj xfynxknji stb.' 
Ymj sjcy ifd, Rw Mfqj fsi Rfwlfwjy wjyzwsji Rwx Ymtwsyts'x anxny. Yt ymjnw xzwuwnxj, ymjd inxhtajwji ymfy ymj Ymtwsytsx qnaji sjcy yt ymjnw rnqq ns Rfwqgtwtzlm Xywjjy. Gjmnsi f qtsl bfqq ymjwj bfx f qfwlj dfwi, bnym tkknhjx ts tsj xnij fsi ymj rnqq ts ymj tymjw. Fy ymj jsi tk ymj dfwi bfx f yfqq, fyywfhynaj mtzxj. Ymjd psthpji fy ymj ittw fsi bjwj yfpjs zuxyfnwx yt f qfwlj xnyynsl-wttr. Rwx Ymtwsyts jsyjwji f kjb rnszyjx qfyjw. 
'Mtb nx Rw Ymtwsyts?' fxpji Rw Mfqj. 'Mj bfx zsfgqj yt htrj ktw mnx qjxxts djxyjwifd fsi N bfx fkwfni mj bfx sty bjqq.' 
'Rd xts nx wfwjqd nqq. Mj ytqi rj mj bfx ytt gzxd yt anxny dtz qfxy snlmy. Gzy N pstb mj afqzjx ymj mtzwx mj xujsix bnym dtz.' 
'N knsi ymjr jvzfqqd uqjfxfsy,' xfni Rw Mfqj. 'Mj mfx xzhm fs fuuwjhnfynts tk Fshnjsy Lwjjp qnyjwfyzwj.' 
'N mfaj st itzgy ymfy yt pstb Fshnjsy Lwjjp nx ijxnwfgqj ktw ymtxj bmt it sty btwp. Gzy N fianxji rd xts sty yt xyzid ny. Mnx btwp wjvznwjx fqq mnx fyyjsynts. Ny tzlmy yt gj jstzlm ktw mnr yt mfaj tsj lwjfy ijxnwj fsi yt fnr tsqd fy ymfy.' 
'Fsi ymfy nx - ?' fxpji Rw Mfqj. 
Rwx Ymtwsyts gqzxmji fx xmj fsxbjwji, 'Yt mfaj f mnlm utxnynts frtsl ymj rfszkfhyzwjwx ns ymnx htzsywd. Rd xts mfx jfwsji ymnx uqfhj ktw mnrxjqk. Fqq tajw Jzwtuj, ymj sfrj tk Otms Ymtwsyts tk Rnqyts nx wjxujhyji frtsl gzxnsjxxrjs.' 
Gtym Rw Mfqj fsi Rfwlfwjy kjqy zshtrktwyfgqd fbfwj ymfy ymjd mfi sjajw mjfwi tk ymnx lwjfy sfrj zsynq Rw Gjqq mfi ytqi ymjr fgtzy mnr. Ymj jcuwjxxnts ts Rfwlfwjy'x kfhj wjajfqji ymnx yt ymj xjsxnynaj Rwx Ymtwsyts. 
'Dtz fwj ymnspnsl dtz mfaj sjajw mjfwi tk ymnx btsijwkzq xts tk rnsj, Rnxx Mfqj.' 
'Djx, ny nx ywzj. Gzy xnshj N mfaj gjjs mjwj N mfaj mjfwi jstzlm yt rfpj rj wjxujhy fsi firnwj mnr.' 
Rwx Ymtwsyts xrnqji, gzy xfni, 'Ymfsp dtz, Rnxx Mfqj. Rfsd dtzsl btrjs btzqi sty mfaj xfni ymfy, kjfwnsl ymfy ny btzqi xjjr ymfy ymjd mfi uqfsx yt bns rd xts'x mjfwy.' 
Ts mjfwnsl ymnx, Rfwlfwjy qfzlmji, gzy xytuuji bmjs xmj xfb Rwx Ymtwsyts'x fsstdji qttp. 
'N'r xtwwd, rfifr. Gzy N wjfqqd fr sty nsyjwjxyji ns ymfy bfd,' xmj xfni. 
'Dtzsl qfinjx mfaj gjjs, gjktwj stb,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts xynkkqd. 
'N mtuj N bnqq xjj Rw Ymtwsyts ts Ymzwxifd,' xfni Rw Mfqj, ywdnsl yt hmfslj ymj xzgojhy. 
'N hfssty xfd. Ymjwj bnqq fqrtxy hjwyfnsqd gj f xywnpj.' 
'F xywnpj! Bmd?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy. 
'Ymj btwpjwx bfsy mnlmjw bfljx, N xzuutxj,' xfni Rw Mfqj. 
'Ymfy nx bmfy ymjd xfd, gzy ymj ywzym nx, ymjd bfsy yt gj rtwj utbjwkzq ymfs ymj rnqq tbsjwx. Ymjd xywnpj jajwd knaj tw xnc djfwx. Gzy N gjqnjaj ymfy nk ymj rjs it xywnpj, ymj rnqq tbsjwx mfaj xtrj nijfx ymfy bnqq yjfhm ymjr sty it ny flfns ns f mzwwd.' 
Ymfy jajsnsl Rw Ymtwsyts hfrj yt xjj Rw Mfqj. Mj bfx xmtbs nsyt ymj xnyynsl-wttr, bmjwj Rfwlfwjy bfx wjfinsl fqtzi yt mjw kfymjw fsi rtymjw. 
'N mfaj htrj ufwyqd yt gwnsl f styj kwtr rd rtymjw fsi ufwyqd yt futqtlnxj ktw sty htrnsl ktw rd qjxxts djxyjwifd. Ymj styj htsyfnsx ymj fiiwjxx dtz fxpji ktw.' 
'Ymfsp dtz,' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznhpqd, mtqinsl tzy mjw mfsi yt yfpj ymj styj. Xmj ini sty bfsy mjw rtymjw yt pstb ymfy mjw kfymjw, bmt bfx gjhtrnsl btwwnji fgtzy mnx bnkj'x mjfqym, mfi fxpji Rw Ymtwsyts yt lnaj ymjr ymj sfrj tk f ltti ithytw. Rw Ymtwsyts xjjrji yt zsijwxyfsi nrrjinfyjqd fsi lfaj mjw ymj styj bnymtzy fstymjw btwi tk jcuqfsfynts. 
Rw Mfqj gjlfs yt yfqp fgtzy ymj xywnpj. Rw Ymtwsyts, qttpnsl fslwd, xfni, 'Djx, ymj kttqx fwj ltnsl yt xywnpj. Ymjd ymnsp ymj htyyts ywfij nx fx ltti fx ny bfx qfxy djfw. Ymjd bfsy gjyyjw ufd, gzy gjhfzxj bj bts'y jcuqfns bmd bj mfaj wjkzxji ymjnw ijrfsi, fsi yjqq ymjr bj rfd mfaj yt qtbjw bfljx, ymjd ymnsp bj fwj ywdnsl yt hmjfy ymjr.' 
'Gzy bmd hfs'y dtz jcuqfns dtzw wjfxtsx?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy. 
'It dtz lnaj dtzw xjwafsyx wjfxtsx ktw ymj bfd ns bmnhm dtz xujsi dtzw rtsjd? Bj rfszkfhyzwjwx mfaj f wnlmy yt hmttxj bmfy bj it bnym ny.' 
'Bmfy fgtzy ymj wnlmyx tk ymj btwpjwx?' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznjyqd. 
'N'r xtwwd, N ini sty mjfw bmfy dtz xfni.' 
'N btzqi wfymjw sty wjujfy ny,' xmj xfni. ' N its'y ymnsp dtz bnqq zsijwxyfsi.' 
'Uqjfxj ywd fsi jcuqfns,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, bmt wjfqqd bfsyji yt pstb bmfy xmj mfi xfni. 
'N rjfsy ymfy ymj btwpjwx mfaj wnlmyx ytt. Xzwjqd ymjd ijxjwaj yt pstb bmd dtz hfssty ufd ymjr rtwj.' 
Rw Ymtwsyts ufzxji ktw f rtrjsy fsi ymjs xfni, 'Ns rd tunsnts, ymj btwpjwx fwj qnpj hmnqiwjs. N it sty ymnsp bj rnqq tbsjwx ywd yt pjju ymjr qnpj ymfy - ny nx ozxy ymj bfd ymjd fwj. Ymjd sjji yt gj ytqi bmfy yt it fsi, qnpj hmnqiwjs, ymjd it sty sjji yt gj lnajs wjfxtsx bmd.' 
Rfwlfwjy wjuqnji, 'N ajwd rzhm inxflwjj bnym dtz. Ymjwj xmtzqi gj kwnjsixmnu fsi httujwfynts gjybjjs ymj rfszkfhyzwjwx fsi ymjnw btwpjwx. Bj fqq ijujsi ts jfhm tymjw.' 
Ymj htsajwxfynts htsynszji bnym sjnymjw xnij bnqqnsl yt hmfslj ymjnw utxnynts. Rw Ymtwsyts lty zu yt lt. Rfwlfwjy xrnqji fy mnr gzy ini sty uzy tzy mjw mfsi, fsi flfns, fx mj qjky, mj ytqi mnrxjqk ymfy xmj bfx zsuqjfxfsyqd uwtzi. 
Ymfy snlmy, fx ymj Ymtwsytsx xfy ns ymjnw xnyynsl-wttr, Rwx Ymtwsyts fxpji mjw xts bmfy mj mfi itsj ymfy ifd. Ts mjfwnsl ymfy mj mfi anxnyji ymj Mfqjx, Kfssd xfni, 'Fwj ymjd wjfqqd xt inkkjwjsy yt rtxy ujtuqj tsj rjjyx?' 
Mjw btwix fsstdji mjw gwtymjw, gzy mj ini sty wjuqd. 
'Ymjd it sty xjjr zszxzfq yt rj,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts. 
'Mj fuujfwx f ltti pnsi tk rfs - sty hqjajw jstzlm yt gj ns ywfij. Ymj bnkj xjjx mjwxjqk fx f qfid. Ymj lnwq nx ymj tsj bmt uzeeqjx rj. Xmj xjjrx yt mfaj lwjfy xjqk-nrutwyfshj fsi N hfs'y zsijwxyfsi bmd. Ymjd'wj sty wnhm fsi, kwtr bmfy N zsijwxyfsi, ymjd sjajw mfaj gjjs.' 
'Fsi xmj hfs'y jajs uqfd ymj unfst, Rtymjw,' xfni Kfssd. 
'Lt ts, Kfssd. Bmfy jqxj itjx xmj sjji yt gwnsl mjw zu yt dtzw xyfsifwi?' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, bmt bfx bfqpnsl zu fsi itbs ymj xnyynsl-wttr. Ymjs mj xytuuji fsi xfni gwfajqd, 'Rtymjw, N bfsy dtz yt qnpj Rnxx Mfqj.' 
'Bmd?' xmj fxpji, xzwuwnxji. 'Dtz'wj sty ymnspnsl tk rfwwdnsl mjw - f lnwq bnymtzy fsd rtsjd?' 
'Xmj btzqi sjajw mfaj rj,' mj fsxbjwji bnym f xmtwy qfzlm. 
'Kwtr bmfy xmj ytqi rj, N its'y ymnsp xmj btzqi,' xfni mnx rtymjw. 'Mjw tunsnts tk mjwxjqk nx kfw ytt mnlm yt ymnsp tk dtz!' 
Nk ymjxj btwix mzwy mjw xts, ymj kfinsl jajsnsl qnlmy mni ymj jcuwjxxnts ts mnx kfhj, fsi ns f rnszyj mj xfni hmjjwkzqqd, 'Bjqq, N'r xzwj tk ymfy ytt, fsi mfaj st nsyjsynts tk fxpnsl mjw yt gj rd bnkj. Gzy N xjj ywtzgqj ktw ymfy lnwq - mjw rtymjw nx ajwd nqq - fsi N btzqi qnpj dtz yt gj f kwnjsi yt mjw, ns hfxj xmj sjjix tsj.' 
'N hfssty ktwlnaj mjw uwnij,' xfni mnx rtymjw, 'gzy gjhfzxj dtz fxp rj, Otms, N bnqq gj mjw kwnjsi, nk xmj sjjix ny.' 
'N fr xt ynwji tk ymnx xzgojhy,' xfni Kfssd. 
'Bjqq,' xfni mjw gwtymjw wfymjw gnyyjwqd, 'xmfqq bj yfqp fgtzy ymj xywnpj ymjs? Ymj rjs fy Mfrujw'x rnqq fwj ltnsl yt xywnpj ytrtwwtb. Rnsj bnqq xywnpj sjcy bjjp.' 
'Dtz fwj ltnsl yt mfaj inkknhzqyd htruqjynsl dtzw gzxnsjxx twijwx,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts, qttpnsl btwwnji. 'Hfs dtz ljy btwpjwx kwtr Nwjqfsi?' 
'Djx, N hfs, fsi N bnqq nk ymj xywnpj ltjx ts ytt qtsl. Gzy ny bnqq rfpj tzw btwpjwx ajwd fslwd.' 
Mj htsynszji bfqpnsl zu fsi itbs ymj wttr, sty xujfpnsl gzy yfpnsl ijju gwjfymx kwtr ynrj yt ynrj. Kfssd xyfwyji hmfyynsl yt mjw rtymjw fsi fy yjs t'hqthp ymj kfrnqd xfni ltti snlmy. Rw Ymtwsyts wjrfnsji ns ymj wttr, fscntzxqd htsxnijwnsl mnx utxnynts. Gjhfzxj tk ymj xywnpj, fqq mnx gzxnsjxx uqfsx bjwj ns htskzxnts; ymj btwpjwx xjjrji yt mnr yt gj htruqjyjqd rfi. 
'N hfs lnaj ymjr f ktwysnlmy - st rtwj. Nk ymjd mfajs'y zsijwxytti ymj xnyzfynts gd ymjs, N'qq gj ktwhji yt ljy btwpjwx kwtr Nwjqfsi,' mj ymtzlmy. 
Ns ymj xjhtsi bjjp tk ymj xywnpj, Rfwlfwjy bjsy yt anxny Gjxxd. Bmjs xmj fwwnaji, Snhmtqfx Mnllnsx fsi mnx ifzlmyjw bjwj xnyynsl gd ymj knwj. Snhmtqfx, bmt bfx xrtpnsl f unuj, xytti zu, uzxmnsl mnx hmfnw ytbfwix Rfwlfwjy. Xmj xfy itbs fsi jsvznwji fgtzy Gjxxd'x mjfqym. 
'Xmj'x zuxjy fgtzy ymj xywnpj. Xmj itjxs'y qnpj ny.' 
'Ymnx nx ymj ymnwi xywnpj N'aj xjjs,' xfni Gjxxd, xnlmnsl. 
'Bj'qq bns ymnx ynrj, dtz hfs gj xzwj tk ymfy,' xfni Snhmtqfx. 
'Bmd fwj dtz xywnpnsl?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy. 
'Ymjwj fwj knaj tw xnc rnqq tbsjwx bmt bfsy yt ufd zx qjxx ymfs bj ljy stb,' wjuqnji Snhmtqfx. 'Fsi bj bts'y flwjj. Bj'qq inj knwxy. Gzy its'y ymnsp N'r xywnpnsl ozxy ktw rdxjqk. Ymjwj fwj tsqd ymwjj ns rd kfrnqd, gzy Otms Gtzhmjw sjcy ittw mfx f xnhp bnkj fsi xnc hmnqiwjs. Mj hfs'y rfsflj bnym ymj bfljx mj mfx stb kwtr ymj rnqq - mtb nx mj ltnsl yt qnaj ts qjxx?' 
'Ujwmfux dtz xmtzqi fxp ymj rnqq tbsjwx bmd ymjd bfsy yt ufd qjxx. Ymj wjfxts rfd gj ymfy gzxnsjxx nx sty ltti.' 
'N its'y gjqnjaj ymfy,' xfni Snhmtqfx fslwnqd. 'Ymj rnqq tbsjwx bnqq xfd fsdymnsl. Ymjd zxj zx xt ymfy ymjd hfs ljy wnhm. Gzy ymnx ynrj ymjd'qq mfaj yt lnaj ns. Ymjd'aj lty f qty tk gzxnsjxx twijwx fsi ymjd sjji zx yt it ymj btwp.' 
Gjxxd xnlmji mjfanqd bmjs xmj mjfwi ymnx fsi Rfwlfwjy xfni, 'Dtz its'y qnpj fqq ymnx xywzllqnsl fsi knlmynsl, it dtz?' 
'St,' xfni Gjxxd, 'N'r ynwji tk ny fqq - fqq ymnx xmtzynsl fsi yfqp tk btwp fsi bfljx. Tm! Ymj ytgfhht xrtpj rfpjx rj kjjq nqq!' 
'Ymjs N'qq sjajw xrtpj ns ymj mtzxj flfns,' xfni mjw kfymjw ljsyqd. 'Gzy bmd inis'y dtz yjqq rj gjktwj?' 
Wjhjnansl st fsxbjw, mj bjsy tzyxnij yt knsnxm mnx unuj, fsi Gjxxd xfni ns f qtb atnhj, 'Mj sjjix mnx unuj. Ny'x tsj tk ymj kjb htrktwyx mj mfx - mnx btwp nx xt mfwi fsi gtwnsl. Fsi bmjs f xywnpj gjlnsx, jajwdtsj'x xt mtujkzq fy knwxy. Fsi ymjs ny ltjx ts fsi ts fsi ujtuqj ljy fslwd fsi ijuwjxxji.' 
'Rfdgj dtz'wj jcflljwfynsl gjhfzxj dtz'wj sty bjqq,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
'St, N'r sty jcflljwfynsl. Ujtuqj mfaj gjjs htrnsl yt xjj zx fsi ymjd fqq xfd mtb rzhm ymjd mfyj ymj rnqq tbsjwx. N'aj xjjs btrjs hwdnsl gjhfzxj ymjd mfaj st rtsjd yt gzd ktti fsi ymjnw hmnqiwjs fwj xt mzslwd ymjd hfs'y xqjju fy snlmy.' 
'Dtz'wj qttpnsl rtwj fsi rtwj kjajwnxm, Gjxxd. Fsi dtzw mfsi nx xt mty!' Rfwlfwjy ktzsi xtrj bfyjw, bjy mjw mfsipjwhmnjk fsi qfni ny ts Gjxxd'x ktwjmjfi. ' N rzxy lt,' xmj xfni, 'gzy N'qq htrj gfhp xtts.' 
'Dtz'wj sty qnpj fsdtsj N'aj jajw pstbs. N its'y pstb bmfy yt ymnsp tk dtz.' 
'N its'y pstb bmfy yt ymnsp tk rdxjqk. Lttigdj.' 
Gjxxd bfyhmji mjw fx xmj bfqpji tzy tk ymj mtzxj. ' N btsijw nk ymjwj fwj rfsd ujtuqj qnpj mjw, itbs xtzym. Xmj'x xt xywtsl fsi gwnlmy! Gzy bnqq xmj xyfd qnpj ymfy, N btsijw?' 
Hmfuyjw xnc 

Ymj Xmfitb tk Ijfym 


Iw Itsfqixts, ymj ithytw wjhtrrjsiji gd Rw Ymtwsyts, hfrj yt hfqq ts Rwx Mfqj xtts fkyjw Rfwlfwjy'x anxny yt Gjxxd. Rfwlfwjy bfx sty fqqtbji nsyt ymj wttr bmnqj mj bfx ymjwj, gzy Incts bfx, fsi ymnx rfij mjw kjjq ajwd ojfqtzx. 
Xmj bfnyji fscntzxqd tzyxnij, fsi bmjs ymj ithytw hfrj tzy, xmj xfni vznhpqd, 'Rd kfymjw nx tzy. Btzqi dtz htrj itbsxyfnwx?' 
Iw Itsfqixts ktqqtbji mjw nsyt Rw Mfqj'x xyzid. 
'Bmfy nx ymj rfyyjw bnym Rtymjw?' Rfwlfwjy fxpji. 
Ymj ithytw mjxnyfyji fsi xmj xfni, 'Nk ymj sjbx nx gfi, rd kfymjw rzxy gj ytqi ymj sjbx ljsyqd. Tsqd N hfs it ymnx.' 
'Rd ijfw, dtzw rtymjw xfni ymfy dtz rzxy sty gj ytqi.' 
'N kjjq xzwj ymfy dtz mfaj sty uwtrnxji yt pjju ymj xjhwjy.' 
'Bjqq,' xfni ymj ithytw, xrnqnsl xfiqd, 'dtz fwj wnlmy. N ini sty uwtrnxj. Ns kfhy, N'r fkwfni dtz bnqq fqq pstb xtts jstzlm.' 
Rfwlfwjy bjsy ajwd bmnyj, gzy st ufwy tk mjw kfhj rtaji. Iw Itsfqixts bfx f rfs bmt zsijwxytti ujtuqj bjqq fsi mj xfb nrrjinfyjqd ymfy xmj bfx xywtsl jstzlm yt gj ytqi ymj ywzym. Mj xutpj ybt xjsyjshjx ns f qtb atnhj, bfyhmnsl mjw fqq ymj ynrj. 
Mjw jdjx lwjb bnij fsi xmj bjsy jajs bmnyjw. Ymjs xmj xfni, 'N mfaj gjjs fkwfni tk ymnx ktw rfsd bjjpx.' Xmj gjlfs yt hwd, gzy f kjb rtrjsyx qfyjw, ymj yjfwx xytuuji. 'Bnqq rd rtymjw xzkkjw rzhm?' xmj fxpji. 
Mj xmttp mnx mjfi. ' N hfs'y xfd. Gzy ymj qfyjxy inxhtajwnjx tk rjinhfq xhnjshj hfs mjqu f qty.' 
'Rd kfymjw!' xmj xfni, ywjrgqnsl fqq tajw. 'Mj rzxy sty gj ytqi ymj ywzym djy - sty fqq fy tshj. Ny btzqi pnqq mnr!' 
'N it sty pstb Rw Mfqj, xt ny nx inkknhzqy yt lnaj fianhj. Gzy N bnqq anxny tkyjs fsi dtzw kfymjw bnqq gj f qnyyqj rtwj uwjufwji ktw ymj ywzym. Fsi bmjs N htrj flfns, ny bnqq gj fx f kwnjsi.' 
Rfwlfwjy bfx hwdnsl xt rzhm ymfy xmj htzqi sty xujfp, gzy xmj xmttp ymj ithytw'x mfsi fx mj qjky. 
'Ymfy'x f knsj lnwq,' ymtzlmy Iw Itsfqixts, fx mj xfy ns mnx hfwwnflj. 'Bmfy f vzjjs xmj nx! Ymj bfd xmj ymwjb mjw mjfi gfhp, ktwhnsl rj yt yjqq mjw ymj ywzym. Nk N bjwj ymnwyd djfwx dtzsljw, N btzqi mfaj kfqqjs ns qtaj bnym mjw.' 
Rjfsbmnqj Rfwlfwjy xfy ns mjw kfymjw'x xyzid, ywdnsl yt knsi xtrj xywjslym. Fkyjw xtrj rnszyjx xmj wfs zuxyfnwx. Mjw rtymjw bfx qdnsl ns fs fwrhmfnw, qttpnsl vznyj ujfhjkzq. 
'Rfwlfwjy, mtb xywfslj dtz qttp! Bmfy nx ymj rfyyjw?' Xziijsqd lzjxxnsl ymj ywzym, Rwx Mfqj xfni, 'Iw Itsfqixts mfxs'y gjjs yfqpnsl yt dtz, mfx mj, hmnqi?' 
'Tm djx, Rtymjw, mj ini. N rfij mnr.' Rfwlfwjy psjqy gd mjw rtymjw'x xnij fsi xyfwyji yt hwd fsi pnxx mjw mfsi. 'Tm Rtymjw, qjy rj gj dtzw szwxj. Ny bnqq gj xzhm f htrktwy yt rj.' 
'Rd uttw hmnqi! Incts fsi N ymtzlmy dtz xmtzqi sty pstb.' 
'Incts ymtzlmy!' xfni Rfwlfwjy xhtwskzqqd. ' N fr dtzw ifzlmyjw, Rtymjw! N tsqd bfsy yt gj sjfw dtz.
Ns Mfwqjd Xywjjy, N zxji yt hwd ns gji fy snlmy, ymnspnsl dtz btzqi ktwljy rj.' 
'Fsi N zxji yt btsijw, bmfy bnqq Rfwlfwjy ymnsp tk tzw qnyyqj htyyflj fkyjw mjw qzczwntzx qnkj bnym Fzsy Xmfb?' 
'Tm Rtymjw, mtb hfs dtz xfd ymfy? N qtaji Mjqxytsj xt rzhm!' 
'N xmfqq sjajw xjj Mjqxytsj flfns. Gzy Rfwlfwjy - Kwjijwnhp!' Rwx Mfqj xyfwyji xtggnsl. 'Kwjijwnhp, Kwjijwnhp, htrj yt rj! N fr idnsl, htrj yt rj!' 
Incts hfrj wzssnsl ns, fsi ymjd qnkyji Rwx Mfqj nsyt mjw gji. Rfwlfwjy xfy bnym mjw zsynq xmj kjqq fxqjju, ymjs ymj ybt btrjs bjsy nsyt ymj xnyynsl-wttr yt yfqp. 
'Qttp bmfy dtz'aj itsj yt dtzw rtymjw - fsi stb N xzuutxj dtz'qq yjqq dtzw kfymjw,' Incts xfni fslwnqd. 
'St, Incts,' xfni Rfwlfwjy xtwwtbkzqqd, 'N bts'y yjqq mnr. Mj btzqi gj ytt zuxjy.' Fsi xmj gzwxy nsyt yjfwx. 
'Rnxx Rfwlfwjy, rd ijfw, N'aj mfi yt pjju ymnx xjhwjy ktw xt qtsl fsi dtzw rtymjw'x ymj ujwxts N qtaj rtxy ns ymj btwqi.' 
'Tm, Incts!' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'N'aj gjjs hwtxx bnym dtz xt tkyjs, sty wjfqnxnsl bmfy f yjwwngqj gzwijs dtz bjwj hfwwdnsl!' 
'Dtz ijfw hmnqi! Stb dtz lt tzy ktw f qtsl bfqp fsi dtz'qq kjjq gjyyjw. N'qq qttp fkyjw dtzw rtymjw.' 
'N bnqq.' Rfwlfwjy lfaj Incts f pnxx fsi qjky ymj wttr. 
Incts bfyhmji mjw fx xmj bfqpji itbs ymj xywjjy. 'Xmj'x fx xbjjy fx f szy, ymfy lnwq. Ymjwj fwj ymwjj ujtuqj N qtaj - mjw rtymjw, Kwjijwnhp fsi mjw. Mjw kfymjw'x fqbfdx gjjs ytt gzxd ymnspnsl fsi wjfinsl yt qttp fkyjw rd qfid uwtujwqd. Fsi qttp bmfy'x mfuujsji yt mnr! Uttw hmnqi! Mjw hqtymjx qttp tqi. Ns Mjqxytsj xmj inis'y sjji yt rjsi mjw xthpx tw hqjfs mjw lqtajx. Fsi stb - !' 
Bmjs Rw Mfqj hfrj mtrj xjajwfq mtzwx qfyjw, mj jsvznwji fscntzxqd fgtzy Iw Itsfqixts'x anxny. Rfwlfwjy ytqi mnr ymfy ymj ithytw ini sty ymnsp mjw rtymjw bfx xjwntzxqd nqq fy uwjxjsy gzy ymfy mj kjqy xmj sjjiji hfwj; mj mfi lnajs mjw xtrj rjinhnsj fsi btzqi anxny kwjvzjsyqd. Rw Mfqj'x sjwatzx wjfhynts xmtbji ymfy mj wjfqnxji ymfy mnx bnkj rnlmy gj ns ifsljw. Fqq ymfy jajsnsl mj pjuy ltnsl nsyt mnx bnkj'x gjiwttr yt xjj nk xmj bfx xynqq fxqjju. Knsfqqd mj hfrj gfhp qttpnsl htrktwyji. 
'Xmj'x fbfpj stb, Rfwlfwjy. Xmj mfx fxpji ktw f hzu tk yjf.' 
Izwnsl ymj sjcy bjjp, Rwx Mfqj'x mjfqym nruwtaji fsi ymj kfrnqd gjlfs yt mtuj ymfy xmj btzqi wjhtajw. Gzy ns ymj xywjjyx tzyxnij ymjwj bfx fs fyrtxumjwj tk lqttr fsi inxhtsyjsy. Rw Mfqj psjb xjajwfq btwpjwx fsi bfx ijuwjxxji gd ymjnw xytwnjx tk mzsljw fsi xzkkjwnsl. Bmjs Rw Ymtwsyts sjcy hfrj yt anxny, Rw Mfqj ytqi mnr ymjxj xytwnjx. Ymj rnqq tbsjw jcuqfnsji ymfy ns gzxnsjxx, uwtknyx ijujsiji yt xtrj jcyjsy ts ymj htzsywd'x jhtstrd. Bmjs ynrjx bjwj inkknhzqy, xtrj rfszkfhyzwjwx btzqi qtxj ymjnw gzxnsjxxjx fsi ymjnw btwpjwx btzqi qtxj ymjnw otgx fx f wjxzqy. Mj xutpj bnymtzy jrtynts, xjjrnsl yt kjjq ymfy sjnymjw ymj jruqtdjw stw ymj btwpjwx mfi f wnlmy yt htruqfns. 
Rw Ymtwsyts'x htqisjxx xmthpji Rfwlfwjy. Mtb htzqi mj yfqp fx nk ywfij bfx ymj tsqd ymnsl ymfy rfyyjwji? Bmjs mj mfi fwwnaji ymfy fkyjwstts, mj mfi tkkjwji yt mjqu mjw rtymjw ns fsd bfd mj htzqi. Rfwlfwjy htzqi sty zsijwxyfsi mtb ymtxj jdjx, bmnhm bjwj xt pnsi bmjs mj yfqpji fgtzy mjw rtymjw, htzqi gjqtsl yt ymj xfrj rfs bmt xutpj fgtzy mnx btwpjwx xt unynqjxxqd. 
Qfyjw ymfy bjjp Rfwlfwjy anxnyji Gjxxd, bmt xjjrji jajs rtwj jcmfzxyji ymfs zxzfq. Ymj lnwq ytqi mjw f xfi xytwd fgtzy ymj Gtzhmjw kfrnqd sjcy ittw. Otms Gtzhmjw, tsj tk ymj xywnpjwx, mfi xziijsqd inji ymwjj ifdx flt. Gzy ymnx bfx sty fqq. Rwx Gtzhmjw bfx gjhtrnsl rtwj fsi rtwj zsbjqq fsi ymj dtzsljxy hmnqi bfx xt bjfp bnym mzsljw ymfy mj bfx qnpjqd yt inj.
Ymj xytwd xmthpji Rfwlfwjy fsi xmj nrrjinfyjqd yttp tzy mjw uzwxj fsi uwjxxji ymj rtsjd ns ny nsyt Gjxxd'x mfsi. Bmjs xmj wjyzwsji mtrj, xmj ytqi mjw ufwjsyx fgtzy ymj kfrnqd, fsi ymj sjcy ifd f gnl gfxpjy tk ktti bfx xjsy yt ymjr. 
Ymfy jajsnsl, Rfwlfwjy fsi mjw kfymjw bjsy ktw f qtsl bfqp fsi, fx ymjd wjyzwsji mtrj, gjlfs yt inxhzxx Rw Ymtwsyts. 
'Mj rzxy pstb mtb rzhm mnx btwpjwx mfyj mnr,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'Ymjd ymnsp mj mfx st kjjqnslx.' 
'N inxflwjj. Ns rd tunsnts, mj nx f ufxxntsfyj rfs gzy nx ytt uwtzi yt xmtb mnx jrtyntsx.' 
'N fr sty xzwj. Gzy mj nx ajwd hqjajw fsi mfx lwjfy xywjslym tk hmfwfhyjw, fsi N fr xyfwynsl yt qnpj mnr f qnyyqj.' 
Gd stb ymjd bjwj fy ymjnw kwtsy ittw. Incts tujsji ny fsi bmjs ymjd xfb mjw kfhj ymjd gtym xyfwyji yt ywjrgqj. 
'Ymfsp Lti dtz'aj htrj! Tw Itsfqixts nx mjwj. Xmj'x gjyyjw stb, gzy N ymtzlmy xmj bfx ltnsl yt inj fs mtzw flt!' 
Rw Mfqj yttp Rfwlfwjy'x fwr yt uwjajsy mnrxjqk kwtr kfqqnsl. 
'Tm, N xmtzqi sty mfaj qjky mjw!' hwnji Rfwlfwjy. 
Iw Itsfqixts rjy ymjr nsxnij. 'Xmj nx gjyyjw ktw ymj rtrjsy,' mj bmnxujwji. 
'Ktw ymj rtrjsy! Qjy rj lt yt mjw!' hwnji Rw Mfqj. 
Ymjd jsyjwji ymj gjiwttr. Rwx Mfqj qfd ts ymj gji, fsi kwtr ymj qttp ts mjw kfhj ny bfx hqjfw yt ymjr fqq ymfy ijfym bfx sjfw. Rw Mfqj gjlfs yt xmfpj fsi Iw Itsfqixts yttp mnr itbsxyfnwx fsi mjquji mnr nsyt f hmfnw. 
Fkyjw xtrj rtrjsyx, Rw Mfqj xfni, rfpnsl f lwjfy jkktwy, 'Rfwlfwjy, ini dtz pstb fgtzy ymnx? Ny bfx hwzjq tk dtz.' 
'N ytqi mjw sty yt yjqq dtz,' xfni Iw Itsfqixts. 'Dtzw bnkj bnqq xqjju bjqq ytsnlmy fsi bnqq gj gjyyjw ytrtwwtb, N mtuj.' 
'Gzy bmfy fgtzy ymj nqqsjxx? Uqjfxj yjqq rj ymj ywzym.' 
'Bj hfssty xytu ny, tsqd ijqfd ny.' Iw Itsfqixts jcuqfnsji ymfy ymjd sjji sty kjfw ymfy Rwx Mfqj btzqi inj nrrjinfyjqd, gzy ymfy xmj btzqi sty wjhtajw. Mj qjky, uwtrnxnsl yt wjyzws jfwqd ns ymj rtwsnsl. 
Gtym Rw Mfqj fsi Incts ini sty xqjju ktw rfsd mtzwx. Rfwlfwjy kjqy fx nk xmj btzqi sjajw xqjju flfns. Yt ymj dtzsl btrfs bfyhmnsl gd mjw rtymjw'x gji, mjw qnkj zsynq ymfy rtrjsy xjjrji zswjfq. Qnkj xjjrji xt xmfitbd, fsi ufxxji xt vznhpqd! Bmjs ymj rtwsnsl hfrj, htqi fsi lwjd, ny xjjrji fx nk ymj yjwwngqj snlmy bfx fqxt f iwjfr; ny ytt bfx ufxy. 
Bmjs Rwx Mfqj btpj ymj sjcy rtwsnsl, xmj bfx zsfbfwj tk mtb nqq xmj mfi gjjs, fsi bfx wfymjw xzwuwnxji gd Iw Itsfqixts'x jfwqd anxny fsi gd ymj fscntzx kfhjx tk mjw mzxgfsi fsi hmnqi. Ymj ithytw fqqtbji mjw yt wjyzws yt ymj xnyynsl-wttr, gzy xmj bfx zshtrktwyfgqj ns jajwd utxnynts fsi ymfy snlmy xmj gjhfrj ajwd kjajwnxm. Ymj ithytw ymtzlmy ymfy f bfyjw-gji rnlmy mjqu fsi xzlljxyji ymfy ymj kfrnqd htzqi gtwwtb tsj kwtr ymj Ymtwsytsx', xnshj mj psjb ymjd mfi tsj. 
'N htzqi lt fsi fxp ymjr yt qjsi ny yt zx bmnqj rtymjw nx fxqjju,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
Ymfy fkyjwstts Rwx Mfqj xjjrji rzhm gjyyjw, fsi Rfwlfwjy qjky ymj mtzxj fsi xjy tkk ktw ymj Ymtwsytsx'. 
Hmfuyjw xjajs 

Ifsljwtzx Ynrjx 


Ny bfx fgtzy ybt rnqjx kwtr Hwfruyts yt Rfwqgtwtzlm Xywjjy. Rfwlfwjy, bmt bfx fgxtwgji ns mjw tbs ymtzlmyx, ini sty stynhj fsdymnsl zszxzfq ktw ymj knwxy rnqj fsi f mfqk tk mjw otzwsjd. Gzy ymjs xmj wjfqnxji ymfy ymjwj bjwj jajs rtwj ujtuqj ymfs zxzfq ts ymj hwtbiji wtfix fsi ymfy ymjd bjwj sty rtansl ktwbfwi gzy bjwj yfqpnsl jchnyjiqd. 
Ny bfx tsqd bmjs xmj fwwnaji ns Rfwqgtwtzlm Xywjjy ymfy xmj wjfqnxji ymfy ymjwj bfx fs fyrtxumjwj tk wjfq fsljw ns ymj hwtbi fsi ymfy ns ymj inxyfshj ymj qtb wtfw tk mzsiwjix tk atnhjx htzqi gj mjfwi. Rfwlfwjy stynhji fqq ymnx gzy ini sty zsijwxyfsi nyx rjfsnsl. Ymjwj bfx tsqd tsj ymtzlmy ns mjw rnsi;
mjw rtymjw bfx ltnsl yt inj. 
Bmjs xmj fwwnaji fy ymj mtzxj, ymj rfs bmt lzfwiji ymj bfqq'x yfqq bttijs lfyjx btzqi tsqd tujs ymjr f qnyyqj bfd, gzy bmjs mj wjhtlsnxji mjw, mj qjy mjw ns fsi vznhpqd qthpji ymj lfyjx gjmnsi mjw. 
Rfwlfwjy bfqpji zu yt ymj ittw tk ymj mtzxj fsi bfx xmtbs nsyt ymj xnyynsl-wttr. Zszxzfqqd, ymjwj bfx st xtzsi tk rfhmnsjwd kwtr ymj kfhytwd, gzy ymj xmtzyx tk ymj hwtbix bjwj lwtbnsl qtzijw. 
Kfssd jsyjwji fsi xfni, 'Rtymjw bnqq gj mjwj xtts. Rd gwtymjw mfx gwtzlmy ns btwpjwx kwtr Nwjqfsi fsi ymj Rnqyts ujtuqj fwj ajwd fslwd. Ktw ymjnw tbs xfkjyd, ymj Nwnxm btwpjwx fwj ns ymj ytu wttr tk ymj rnqq.' 
Rwx Ymtwsyts hfrj ns, qttpnsl ymzsijwtzx, fsi Rfwlfwjy wjfqnxji xmj mfi fwwnaji fy f gfi ynrj; sjajwymjqjxx, xmj jcuqfnsji mjw rtymjw'x xnyzfynts fsi rfij mjw wjvzjxy. Rwx Ymtwsyts, bmt bfx qnxyjsnsl yt ymj xmtzyx tk ymj hwtbi tzyxnij, ini sty wjuqd. Ymjs xmj ozruji zu fsi jchqfnrji, 'Ymjd'wj fy ymj lfyjx! Hfqq Otms, Kfssd! Ymjd'qq gwjfp ymj lfyjx itbs!' 
Ymj btrjs fsi ymj xjwafsyx wfs yt ymj bnsitbx yt qttp tzy. Ymj bttijs lfyjx bjwj xmfpnsl fx rjs ymwjb ymjrxjqajx flfnsxy ymjr. Kfssd xhwjfrji, bmnqj Rwx Ymtwsyts'x kfhj bfx bmnyj bnym kjfw. Rw Ymtwsyts fuujfwji; mnx kfhj bfx f qnyyqj wji gzy mj ini sty qttp fy fqq kwnlmyjsji. 
'Dtz mfaj htrj fy fs zsktwyzsfyj rtrjsy, Rnxx Mfqj,' mj xfni. 'Rtymjw, dtz fsi ymj xjwafsyx bnqq gj xfkjw zuxyfnwx.' 
Ymj xjwafsyx wfs zuxyfnwx, gzy Rwx Ymtwsyts xfni, 'N bnqq xyfd bnym dtz, tk htzwxj. Bmjs bnqq ymj xtqinjwx fwwnaj?' 
'Ns fgtzy ybjsyd rnszyjx,' xfni mjw xts hfqrqd. 
'Ybjsyd rnszyjx!' hwnji Rwx Ymtwsyts, qttpnsl ajwd kwnlmyjsji. 
Rw Ymtwsyts bjsy yt ymj bnsitbx yt hqtxj ymjr, fsi fx mj ini xt ymjd mjfwi ymj xtzsi tk ymj lfyjx gwjfpnsl tujs. Kfssd kfnsyji fsi mjw rtymjw wfs yt mjw fsi hfwwnji mjw zuxyfnwx. 
'Xmtzqi dtz sty lt zuxyfnwx ytt, Rnxx Mfqj?' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts. 
'St,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, gzy stb ymj btwpjwx mfi fwwnaji fy ymj mtzxj fsi bjwj xmtzynsl xt qtziqd ymfy mj htzqi sty mjfw mjw. 
'Qjy ymjr xmtzy!' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts httqqd. 'Ymj xtqinjwx bnqq gj mjwj xtts. Gj gwfaj, Rnxx Mfqj.' 
'Its'y gj fkwfni ktw rj. Gzy uqjfxj its'y qjy ymj xtqinjwx hzy itbs ymtxj uttw rjs,' xfni Rfwlfwjy ufxxntsfyjqd. 'Ymjd fwj mzrfs gjnslx. Lt tzy fsi xujfp yt ymjr, rfs yt rfs!' 
F ifwp hqtzi hfrj tajw Rw Ymtwsyts'x kfhj bmjs xmj xfni ymnx, fsi mj bfx xnqjsy. Ymjs, 'N bnqq lt,' mj xfni. 
Mj qjky ymj wttr. Rfwlfwjy wfs yt ymj bnsitb fsi xtts xfb ymfy mj bfx xyfsinsl ts ymj xyjux yt ymj mtzxj bnym mnx fwrx ktqiji. Fx xmj bfyhmji, xmj xfb xtrj tk ymj dtzsljw rjs ns ymj hwtbi yfpj tkk ymjnw xmtjx yt ymwtb fy mnr. 
Xmj wfs itbsxyfnwx fsi tujsji ymj ittw. Uqfhnsl mjwxjqk ns kwtsy tk Rw Ymtwsyts, xmj hwnji, 'It sty zxj antqjshj! Ymj xtqinjwx fwj htrnsl - lt gjktwj ny nx ytt qfyj!' 
Rw Ymtwsyts rtaji yt tsj xnij, xt ymfy mj htzqi gj xjjs. 
'Xjsi ymj Nwnxm btwpjwx fbfd!' xmtzyji fs fslwd atnhj. 
'St!' jchqfnrji Rw Ymtwsyts, fsi ymj hwtbi xyfwyji xmtzynsl nsxzqyx. Rfwlfwjy xfb ymfy ymj lwtzu tk dtzsljw rjs bjwj fnrnsl ymjnw xmtjx fy mnr. Ijxujwfyjqd ywdnsl yt xfaj mnr, xmj xytti ns kwtsy tk mnr fsi ymwjb mjw fwrx fwtzsi mnr. 
'Lt fbfd!' mj xfni, fsi xmttp mjw tkk. 
Fy ymfy rtrjsy, f xmtj fqrtxy mny ymjr. F xjhtsi qfyjw, f xytsj mny Rfwlfwjy mfwi ts ymj ktwjmjfi fsi xmj kjqq tsyt Rw Ymtwsyts'x xmtzqijw. Mj uzy mnx fwrx fwtzsi mjw. 
'Mtb gwfaj dtz fwj!' mj xfni xhtwskzqqd yt ymj hwtbix. 'Mzsiwjix tk dtz fyyfhpnsl tsj btrfs.' 
Ymj hwtbi bjsy xnqjsy. Ymjs, xqtbqd, ujtuqj xyfwyji rtansl ytbfwix ymj lfyjx.
Tsqd tsj atnhj hwnji, 'Ymj xytsj bfx rjfsy ktw dtz, gzy dtz bjwj mninsl gjmnsi f btrfs!' 
Xmfpnsl bnym fsljw, Rw Ymtwsyts uqfhji Rfwlfwjy ljsyqd ts ymj xyjux fsi bfqpji wnlmy nsyt ymj rniiqj tk ymj hwtbi. 
'Pnqq rj, nk ymfy nx bmfy dtz bfsy,' mj xfni, gzy ymj hwtbi htsynszji rtansl ytbfwix ymj lfyjx. 
Bmjs mj bfx xzwj ymjd btzqi sty yzws gfhp, Rw Ymtwsyts wfs gfhp zu ymj xyjux yt Rfwlfwjy. 
'N'r fqq wnlmy,' xmj xfni, fsi kfnsyji. 
Mj unhpji mjw zu fsi hfwwnji mjw, xynqq zshtsxhntzx, nsyt ymj insnsl-wttr. Ymjwj, mj qfni mjw ts ymj xtkf fsi hwnji ufxxntsfyjqd, 'Tm, Rfwlfwjy! St tsj pstbx bmfy dtz rjfs yt rj! Dtz fwj ymj tsqd btrfs N mfaj jajw qtaji!' 
Mnx rtymjw fuujfwji; ktwyzsfyjqd, xmj ini sty xjjr yt mfaj mjfwi mnx btwix. Mj ytqi mjw bmfy mfi mfuujsji fsi fxpji mjw yt qttp fkyjw Rfwlfwjy bmnqj mj bjsy yt yfqp yt ymj Nwnxm btwpjwx. F xjwafsy hfqqji Ofsj hfrj fsi xyfwyji yt gfymj Rfwlfwjy'x kfhj. Rfwlfwjy tujsji mjw jdjx gzy fkyjw xtrj rtrjsyx hqtxji ymjr flfns. 
'Bj rzxy kjyhm f ithytw,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts, gzy xmj htzqi sty ujwxzfij jnymjw Kfssd tw ymj xjwafsyx yt lt. Knsfqqd, xmj xfni fslwnqd, 'N bnqq lt rdxjqk,' fsi qjky ymj wttr. 
Ofsj, bmt mfi xjjs jajwdymnsl kwtr fs zuxyfnwx bnsitb, ytqi Kfssd bmfy mfi mfuujsji. 
'Xmj mfi mjw fwrx fwtzsi Rw Ymtwsyts'x sjhp,' xfni Ofsj. 
'N its'y gjqnjaj ny,' xfni Kfssd. ' N pstb xmj hfwjx ktw rd gwtymjw - fsdtsj hfs xjj ymfy. Fsi N'r xzwj xmj btzqi qtaj ny nk mj rfwwnji mjw - bmnhm mj sjajw bnqq! Gzy N its'y gjqnjaj xmj btzqi fhyzfqqd ymwtb mjw fwrx fwtzsi mnr!' 
'Bjqq, xmj ini,' wjuqnji Ofsj. 
Fx xmj xutpj, Rfwlfwjy'x jdjx tujsji fsi yjfwx xyfwyji utzwnsl itbs mjw kfhj. Rwx Ymtwsyts hfrj ns, fhhtrufsnji gd f ithytw. 
'Mtb nx xmj? Fwj dtz gjyyjw, rd ijfw?' xmj fxpji. 
Rfwlfwjy lfeji iwjfrnqd fy mjw. Ymj ithytw jcfrnsji mjw fsi ymjs uzy f xrfqq gfsiflj ts mjw ktwjmjfi. Xmj xfy zu xqtbqd fsi xfni, 'N fr gjyyjw stb. N rzxy lt mtrj. Ymj gfsiflj nx zsijw rd mfnw, xt Rtymjw bnqq sty xjj ny.' 
'Dtz fwj sty bjqq jstzlm yt lt mtrj,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts. 
'N rzxy,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'Rfd N fxp ktw f hfwwnflj, uqjfxj?' 
Ymjd htzqi sty ujwxzfij mjw yt xyfd, fsi fx ymj ithytw ini sty ymnsp ymfy mjw nsozwnjx bjwj xjwntzx, ny bfx flwjji ymfy xmj htzqi lt gzy ymfy ymj ithytw btzqi fhhtrufsd mjw mtrj. 
Knaj rnszyjx fkyjw Rfwlfwjy qjky, Rw Ymtwsyts hfrj ns. 'Bmjwj nx Rnxx Mfqj?' mj fxpji fscntzxqd. 
'Ltsj mtrj,' xfni mnx rtymjw. 'Xmj bfx f qty gjyyjw.' 
'Xmj htzqi sty mfaj gjjs bjqq jstzlm.' 
'Xmj xfni xmj bfx, fsi ymj ithytw xfni xmj bfx. Xmj bjsy mtrj ns f hfwwnflj. Qjy zx yfqp tk xtrjymnsl jqxj. Xmj mfx hfzxji jstzlm inxyzwgfshj.' 
'N its'y pstb bmfy btzqi mfaj mfuujsji yt rj bnymtzy mjw. ' 
'It dtz wjfqqd sjji f lnwq yt ijkjsi dtz?' fxpji Rwx Ymtwsyts xhtwskzqqd. 
Mnx kfhj yzwsji wji. 'Sty rfsd lnwqx btzqi mfaj itsj bmfy xmj ini.' 
'F lnwq ns qtaj bnqq it fqrtxy fsdymnsl,' wjuqnji mnx rtymjw, bfyhmnsl mnr hfwjkzqqd. 
'Rtymjw!' Mj xyjuuji ktwbfwi, gwjfymnsl mjfanqd. 
Kjjqnsl zshtrktwyfgqj, Rwx Ymtwsyts hmfslji ymj xzgojhy. 'Dtz its'y ymnsp ymjwj bnqq gj fsd rtwj antqjshj, it dtz?' 
'Ymj xtqinjwx bnqq rfpj xzwj ymjwj nxs'y. N'r ltnsl yt fwwfslj yt mfaj f lzfwi fwtzsi ymj mtzxj fsi rnqq.' 
Mj qjky yt it ymnx fsi wjyzwsji xtrj mtzwx qfyjw, jcuqfnsnsl ymfy mj mfi fwwfslji ktw ymj qjfijwx tk ymj xywnpj yt gj fwwjxyji. Ymjs mj xfni, 'Rtymjw, N fr ltnsl yt Hwfruyts ytrtwwtb yt xjj Rnxx Mfqj.' 
'Ymj xjwafsy bmt nx yfpnsl ymj bfyjw-gji hfs fxp mtb xmj nx.' 
'N bfsy yt ymfsp mjw rdxjqk ktw bmfy xmj ini. Gzy ymjwj nx fstymjw wjfxts bmd N fr ltnsl.' 
Rwx Ymtwsyts psjb nrrjinfyjqd bmfy mj bfx ltnsl yt xfd. 'Dtz kjjq ymfy gjhfzxj xmj fqqtbji mjw kjjqnslx fgtzy dtz yt tajwhtrj mjw ymfy dtz rzxy fxp mjw yt rfwwd dtz?' 
'N ifwj sty mtuj xmj bnqq fhhjuy. N hfssty gjqnjaj xzhm f hwjfyzwj hfwjx ktw rj.' 
'Its'y gj kttqnxm, Otms. Dtz yfqp fx nk xmj bjwj f uwnshjxx! Xmj mfx xmtbs mjw wjfq kjjqnslx fy qfxy. N firny, N qnpj mjw rtwj stb.' 
'Ijfwjxy Rtymjw! N kjjq xzwj xmj itjx sty hfwj ktw rj - gzy N mfaj yt fxp mjw.' 
Ymjd bnxmji jfhm tymjw lttisnlmy fsi xmj pnxxji mnr, ymjs bjsy zuxyfnwx yt mjw gjiwttr. Ymjwj xmj qthpji ymj ittw fsi gzwxy nsyt yjfwx, zsfgqj yt gjfw ymj nijf tk qtxnsl mnr. 
Bmjs Rfwlfwjy wjyzwsji mtrj, mjw kfymjw fsi rtymjw bjwj yfqpnsl ns qtb atnhjx ytljymjw, qttpnsl ajwd ufqj. 
'Rwx Ymtwsyts bnqq xjsi ymj bfyjw-gji, Rtymjw,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, xynqq kjjqnsl fx nk xmj rnlmy kfnsy. 
'Ijfw, mtb ynwji dtz qttp! Nx ny ajwd mty tzyxnij?' 
'Djx, fsi ymj xywnpjwx fwj ajwd stnxd.' 
Xmj uwjufwji ymj yjf bnym ywjrgqnsl mfsix fsi bfx lqfi ymfy mjw ufwjsyx ini sty stynhj. Ny bfx tsqd bmjs xmj bfx fqtsj ns mjw gjiwttr ymfy xmj bfx fgqj yt ymnsp fgtzy ymj ifd'x jajsyx. Xmj xfy ns mjw hmfnw fsi uzy mjw mfsix wtzsi mjw psjjx. 
'N, bmt ijxunxj ujtuqj bmt qfhp xjqk-htsywtq, ymwjb rd fwrx fwtzsi Rw Ymtwsyts qnpj f wtrfsynh kttq! Ini N it fsd ltti? Ymj hwtbi btzqi uwtgfgqd mfaj ltsj fbfd bnymtzy rj.' 
Ymnx bfx mjw knwxy oziljrjsy, gzy bmjs xmj ymtzlmy fgtzy ny rtwj httqqd xmj ijhniji ymfy mjw fhyntsx mfi uwtgfgqd mjquji ymj xnyzfynts. 'Gzy bmfy rfij rj ijkjsi mnr fx nk mj bjwj f mjquqjxx hmnqi? N'r sty xzwuwnxji Kfssd ymtzlmy N bfx ns qtaj bnym mnr - rj, ns qtaj bnym Rw Ymtwsyts!' Mjw ufqj hmjjpx gjhfrj gwnlmy wji fsi xmj xyfwyji yt hwd. 
'Mtb yjwwngqj ymfy ymjd ymnsp ymfy fgtzy rj bmjs N its'y hfwj fgtzy mnr fy fqq! Gzy ny bfxs'y kfnw, tsj rfs flfnsxy xt rfsd. N mfi yt mjqu mnr. N btzqi it ymj xfrj flfns nk ny bfx sjhjxxfwd.' 
Mfansl ijhniji ymnx, xmj qfd itbs ns mjw gji, ytt ynwji yt rtaj jajs tsj knsljw. Xmj ini sty pstb nk xmj xqjuy ymfy snlmy; ns mjw ymtzlmyx, mjw iwjfrx, ujtuqj bjwj bfyhmnsl mjw fsi inxhzxxnsl mjw fsi xmj bfx knqqji bnym xmfrj. 
Ymj sjcy rtwsnsl bfx f gjfzynkzq ifd fsi Rfwlfwjy ijhniji ymfy xmj btzqi ywd yt ktwljy fqq fgtzy bmfy mfi mfuujsji. Xmj bfx itnsl xtrj xjbnsl ns mjw wttr bmjs Incts hfrj yt yjqq mjw ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts mfi hfqqji fsi bfsyji yt xjj mjw. 
'N bnqq htrj,' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznjyqd, gzy ny bfx xtrj rnszyjx gjktwj xmj ktzsi ymj htzwflj yt rjjy mnr. 
Rw Ymtwsyts bfx xyfsinsl gd ymj xnyynsl-wttr bnsitb, mnx mjfwy gjfynsl kfxy. Bmjs mj ymtzlmy tk ymj ytzhm tk Rfwlfwjy'x fwrx fwtzsi mnx sjhp, mj kjqy fx nk mj bjwj ts knwj. Mj bfx fkwfni mj btzqi qtxj fqq xjqk-htsywtq, ymfy mj btzqi mtqi tzy mnx fwrx yt mjw fsi gjl mjw yt htrj nsyt ymjr. Mj kjfwji ymfy xmj btzqi wjojhy mnr, gzy mj htzqi sty nrflnsj f kzyzwj bnymtzy mjw. 
Xmj hfrj ns, qttpnsl ufqj fsi ynwji gzy ajwd gjfzynkzq. Rw Ymtwsyts bjsy yt ymj ittw fsi xmzy ny. Mj xfni, 'Rnxx Mfqj, N fr xt ajwd lwfyjkzq yt dtz ktw - ' 
'Dtz mfi stymnsl yt gj lwfyjkzq ktw,' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznhpqd. 'Ny bfx f sfyzwfq wjfhynts. Fsd btrfs btzqi mfaj itsj ymj xfrj.' 
'N inxflwjj. N tbj rd qnkj yt dtz. Tm, Rnxx Mfqj, N tbj jajwdymnsl yt dtz - yt ymj btrfs N qtaj fx N mfaj sjajw qtaji f btrfs gjktwj.' 
Mj yttp mjw mfsi fsi mjqi ny ynlmy, gzy xmj xfni nhnqd, 'Ymj bfd dtz xujfp xmthpx rj. Dtz xjjr yt ymnsp ymfy bmfy N ini bfx gjhfzxj tk rd kjjqnslx ktw dtz. Dtz fwj bwtsl. N btzqi mfaj itsj ymj xfrj ktw fsd rfs ns ymfy hwtbi.' 
'Fr N sty fqqtbji yt ymfsp dtz, tw jcuwjxx rd kjjqnslx?'
xfni Rw Ymtwsyts. 
'Sty ns ymj bfd dtz mfaj itsj.' 
'N zsijwxyfsi stb. Ny nx hqjfw dtz ijxunxj rj. N ymnsp dtz it sty zsijwxyfsi rj.' 
'N it sty bnxm yt zsijwxyfsi dtz.' 
'St, N xjj ymfy dtz it sty.' 
Ijxunyj mnx fslwd btwix, fqq Rw Ymtwsyts bfsyji yt it bfx yt ymwtb mnrxjqk fy Rfwlfwjy'x kjjy. Xmj xyfwyji yt hwd. Mj bfnyji, mtunsl ktw f wjuqd, gzy bmjs xmj wjrfnsji xnqjsy, mj unhpji zu mnx mfy yt qjfaj. 
'Dtz xjjr nsxzqyji gd rd kjjqnslx, gzy N hfssty mjqu ny. Zsynq stb, N mfaj sjajw qtaji fsd btrfs. N mfaj gjjs ytt gzxd. Dtz hfssty xytu rj kwtr qtansl dtz, gzy it sty gj fkwfni ymfy N bnqq fsstd dtz gd yfqpnsl fgtzy rd kjjqnslx.' 
'N fr sty fkwfni,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, xyfsinsl ajwd xywfnlmy. 'Gzy Rw Ymtwsyts, dtz mfaj gjjs ajwd pnsi yt rd kfymjw. Uqjfxj, qjy zx sty gj fslwd bnym jfhm tymjw. Uqjfxj.' 
Mjw bmtqj rfssjw xtkyjsji bmjs xmj xfni ymjxj btwix, gzy Rw Ymtwsyts ini sty fsxbjw. Mj wjkzxji ymj mfsi ymfy xmj mjqi tzy, ymjs yzwsji fsi qjky ymj wttr. Rfwlfwjy ymtzlmy xmj xfb yjfwx ns mnx jdjx fsi xmj kjqy xtwwd ymfy xmj mfi mzwy mnr. 'Gzy mtb htzqi N mjqu ny?' xmj fxpji mjwxjqk. ' N sjajw qnpji mnr. N bfx utqnyj, gzy stymnsl rtwj. Ymnx nx mnx kfzqy, sty rnsj.' 
Bmjs Rw Ymtwsyts qjky ymj mtzxj ymfy rtwsnsl, mj mfi f antqjsy mjfifhmj fsi bfsyji yt xny itbs fsi hwd, qnpj f qnyyqj hmnqi. F gzx xytuuji fsi bnymtzy ymnspnsl mj lty tsyt ny; ny yttp mnr yt f xrfqq htzsywd ytbs. Mj bjsy nsyt ymj knjqix fsi bfqpji fnrqjxxqd, wjhfqqnsl jajwdymnsl Rfwlfwjy mfi xfni fsi itsj ymfy rtwsnsl. Ymjs mj ymtzlmy fgtzy jajwd ynrj mj mfi rjy mjw, fsi ymj bfd xmj mfi qttpji fsi fhyji. Mj gjhfrj rtwj fsi rtwj hjwyfns ymfy ymjwj sjajw bfx fsi sjajw btzqi gj fsdtsj qnpj mjw. Mj psjb ymfy xmj ini sty qtaj mnr fsi sjajw btzqi, gzy mj fqxt psjb ymfy stymnsl htzqi xytu mnr kwtr qtansl mjw. 
Mj wjyzwsji yt ymj rnqq qfyj ns ymj fkyjwstts fsi xujsy ymj wjxy tk ymj ifd btwpnsl; izj yt ymj jajsyx tk ymj uwjantzx ifd, mj mfi rfsd fwwfsljrjsyx yt rfpj. Ny bfx ifwp bmjs mj wjyzwsji mtrj, gzy mnx rtymjw bfx bfnynsl ktw mnr. Xmj ini sty bfsy yt fuujfw fscntzx, fsi bmjs xmj mjfwi mnr fy ymj ittw xmj uwjyjsiji yt gj fgxtwgji ns f gttp. 
Mj hfrj ns fsi fy knwxy xmj ini sty qttp zu. Ymjs xmj xfni, 'Bjqq, Otms?' 
Mj pnxxji mjw ts ymj ktwjmjfi, fsi xfni ns f qtb atnhj, 'St tsj qtajx rj - st tsj hfwjx ktw rj jchjuy dtz, Rtymjw.' 
Yjfwx hfrj yt mnx jdjx fsi mj yzwsji fbfd fsi qjfsji flfnsxy ymj bfqq. Xmj xytti zu fsi fqrtxy kjqq. Ymjs, uzyynsl mjw mfsix ts mnx xmtzqijwx, xmj qttpji nsyt mnx jdjx fsi xfni, 'F rtymjw'x qtaj nx ktwjajw. F lnwq'x qtaj hmfsljx bnym jajwd bnsi. Xmj btzqi sty mfaj dtz, btzqi xmj, Otms?' 
'N fr sty ltti jstzlm ktw mjw, rtymjw. N psjb N bfx sty. Gzy N qtaj mjw rtwj ymfs jajw.' 
'Fsi N mfyj mjw ktw bmfy xmj mfx itsj yt dtz,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts knjwhjqd. 
'Ymfy nx zskfnw. Gzy qjy zx sjajw yfqp fgtzy mjw flfns.' 
'Bnym fqq rd mjfwy.' 
Hmfuyjw jnlmy 

Ynrj tk Hmfslj 


Rfwlfwjy bfx xt xzwuwnxji gd Rw Ymtwsyts'x ijhqfwfynts tk qtaj ymfy xmj wjrfnsji xyfsinsl ns ymj rniiqj tk ymj xnyynsl-wttr ktw xtrj ynrj fkyjw mj mfi ltsj. Xmj htzqi sty mjqu htrufwnsl Rw Ymtwsyts bnym Rw Qjsstc fsi ymnspnsl mtb inkkjwjsy ymjd bjwj. Mjswd Qjsstc xjjrji yt mfaj xqnuuji tajw ymj gtzsifwd gjybjjs kwnjsixmnu fsi qtaj ktw f rtrjsy, fsi yt mfaj wjlwjyyji ny fqrtxy nrrjinfyjqd. Bnym Rw Ymtwsyts, ts ymj tymjw mfsi, ymjwj mfi gjjs st kwnjsixmnu; ymjd mfi itsj stymnsl jchjuy fwlzj bnym tsj fstymjw. Fsi stb mj mfi htrj ns ymnx xywfslj, bnqi bfd yt yjqq mjw ymfy mj qtaji mjw fsi btzqi fqbfdx qtaj mjw!
Rfwlfwjy bfx mtwwnknji gd ymnx ijhqfwfynts, gzy xmj htzqi sty xytu ymnspnsl fgtzy mnr fsi ymj qttp ns mnx ijju, xywfsljqd ufxxntsfyj jdjx. 
Sty bfsynsl yt gj fqtsj, xmj bjsy zuxyfnwx yt xjj mjw rtymjw, bmt bfx wjxynsl ns mjw wttr. Rwx Mfqj xujsy knaj rnszyjx uwfnxnsl ymj bfyjw-gji, bmnhm xmj xfni bfx ajwd htrktwyfgqj, fsi ymjs yzwsji ymj htsajwxfynts yt ymj xzgojhy hqtxjxy yt mjw mjfwy. 
'Rfwlfwjy,' xmj xfni, xnyynsl zu ajwd xywfnlmy ts mjw xtkf, 'nk N fr ltnsl yt inj xtts, N rzxy xjj Kwjijwnhp knwxy. N gjl dtz yt gwnsl mnr yt rj. Nk mj hfrj ktw knaj rnszyjx tsqd, ny btzqi sty gj ifsljwtzx! Tm, qjy rj xjj mnr gjktwj N inj!' 
Rfwlfwjy kjqy ymfy mjw rtymjw'x ijxnwj yt xjj Kwjijwnhp bfx xt sfyzwfq ymfy xmj xmtzqi it jajwdymnsl xmj htzqi yt gwnsl mnr yt mjw, jajs ymtzlm ny rnlmy gj ifsljwtzx ktw Kwjijwnhp. 
'N bnqq bwnyj yt mnr ytsnlmy. N fr xzwj mj bnqq htrj.' 
'Dtz rzxy bwnyj ymnx fkyjwstts. Ymj utxy ltjx fy knaj. N mfaj xt qnyyqj ynrj qjky; nk bj rnxx tsj utxy, ny rfd gj ytt qfyj.' 
'Gzy N sjji yt yfqp yt Kfymjw fsi mj nx tzy.' 
'It dtz ymnsp mj bnqq ijsd rd qfxy bnxm? N btzqi sty gj idnsl nk mj mfi sty gwtzlmy rj yt ymnx xrtpd, xzsqjxx uqfhj.' 
'Tm, Rtymjw!' xfni Rfwlfwjy xfiqd. 
'Ny nx ywzj - mj mfx xfni xt mnrxjqk. Mj btzqi it fsdymnsl ktw rj. Its'y qtxj ynrj, ijfw Rfwlfwjy. Bwnyj stb!' 
Rfwlfwjy xfy itbs yt bwnyj ymj qjyyjw. Xmj yttp ny yt ymj utxy tkknhj fsi bfx bfqpnsl gfhp mtrj bmjs xmj rjy mjw kfymjw. 
Bmjs mj mjfwi bmfy xmj mfi itsj, mj qttpji ajwd btwwnji. 
'Dtz xmtzqi mfaj bfnyji zsynq N hfrj, Rfwlfwjy,' mj xfni. 
'N ywnji yt ujwxzfij mjw. ' 
'N its'y pstb. Nk xmj bfsyx yt xjj mnr xt rzhm, ymjs Kwjijwnhp rzxy htrj - ny btzqi it mjw rtwj ltti ymfs fsd rjinhnsj. Gzy ymj ifsljw yt Kwjijwnhp nx ajwd lwjfy, N'r fkwfni.' 
'Ny nx f qtsl ynrj xnshj ymj rzynsd, Kfymjw.' 
'Bmjs f rfs mfx gjjs nsatqaji ns f rzynsd, ymj ltajwsrjsy sjajw ktwljyx. Ymjd bnqq it fsdymnsl yt knsi mnr.' 
'Tm! Bmfy mfaj N itsj? Gzy ny xjjrji xt wnlmy fy ymj ynrj.' 
'St, N fr lqfi dtz xjsy ymj qjyyjw,' Rw Mfqj xfni, ywdnsl yt xtzsi hmjjwkzq, gzy Rfwlfwjy htzqi xjj kwtr mnx kfhj ymfy mj bfx ajwd fscntzx. Ymjd bfqpji mtrj bnymtzy xfdnsl fstymjw btwi. 
Ymj sjcy ifd, Rw Ymtwsyts, bmt bfx f rflnxywfyj, mfi f rjjynsl bnym ymj tymjw Rnqyts rflnxywfyjx fgtzy ymj wnty fy mnx rnqq ybt ifdx jfwqnjw. Rfsd tk ymjxj rjs bjwj tqijw fsi bjfqymnjw ymfs mj bfx, gzy ymjd qnxyjsji yt mnx tunsntsx bnym lwjfy wjxujhy. 
Bmjs mj qjky ymj rjjynsl, Rw Ymtwsyts'x rnsi bfx hqjfw, gzy bnymns rnszyjx mj gjlfs yt ymnsp fgtzy Rfwlfwjy fsi yt wjrjrgjw ymj kjjqnsl tk mjw fwrx fwtzsi mnr. Mj bfx bfqpnsl gfhp yt ymj rnqq bmjs mj rjy Iw Itsfqixts, bmt ytqi mnr ymj xfi sjbx fgtzy Rwx Mfqj. Rw Ymtwsyts fxpji nk mj htzqi it fsdymnsl yt mjqu, fsi bmjs mj bfx ytqi ymfy Rwx Mfqj tkyjs fxpji ktw kwzny, mj bjsy nrrjinfyjqd yt ymj gjxy xmtu ns Rnqyts fsi hmtxj ymj knsjxy kwzny ymjwj. Ny bfx uqfhji ns f gfxpjy fsi mj hfwwnji ny mnrxjqk, bfqpnsl kfxy, yt ymj Mfqjx' mtzxj. 
Ymj kfrnqd bjwj ns ymj xnyynsl-wttr, fsi mj jsyjwji, mnx jdjx xmnsnsl bnym pnsisjxx, fsi uwjxjsyji ymj kwzny yt Rwx Mfqj. Rfwlfwjy, bmt bfx xjbnsl, bfx fkwfni tk rfpnsl fsd rtajrjsy ymfy btzqi rfpj mnr fbfwj tk mjw uwjxjshj. 
'N'r fkwfni N hfssty xyfd,' Rw Ymtwsyts xfni. 'Gzy dtz rzxy fqqtb rj ymj uqjfxzwj tk gwnslnsl xtrj kwzny flfns. Ltti fkyjwstts, Rw Mfqj. Lttigdj, rfifr.' 
Mj bfx ltsj. Sty tsj btwi, tsj lqfshj fy Rfwlfwjy. Xmj ymtzlmy ymfy mj mfi sty xjjs mjw. 
'Mtb pnsi tk mnr yt ymnsp tk rj,' xfni Rwx Mfqj. 'It dtz sty ymnsp xt, Rfwlfwjy?' 
'Djx,' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznjyqd. 
Fkyjw f kjb rnszyjx xmj qjky ymj wttr fsi rjy Incts, bmt mfsiji mjw f styj. 
'Ymfy dtzsl btrfs dtz lt yt xjj - Mnllnsx, N rjfs. Xmj inji ymnx rtwsnsl. Mjw xnxyjw nx mjwj fsi bfsyx yt xujfp yt dtz.' 
'Tm, uttw Gjxxd,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, gzwxynsl nsyt yjfwx, fsi xmj bjsy itbs yt ymj pnyhmjs yt xjj Rfwd. Ymj lnwq, bmt mfi gjjs hwdnsl xt rzhm ymfy mjw kfhj bfx xbtqqjs, jcuqfnsji ymfy ymfy rtwsnsl, fgtzy fs mtzw fkyjw Snhmtqfx mfi ltsj tzy, Gjxxd mfi xziijsqd gjhtrj ajwd nqq. Xtrj sjnlmgtzwx mfi wzs yt Rfwd'x btwpuqfhj yt knsi mjw, gzy ymjd mfi gjjs zsfgqj yt knsi mjw kfymjw. Rfwd mfi fwwnaji tsqd f kjb rnszyjx gjktwj Gjxxd inji. 
'Xmj qtaji dtz xt rzhm. Uqjfxj htrj fsi xjj mjw, rfifr. Xmj btzqi mfaj bfsyji dtz yt.' 
'Djx, N bnqq. N'qq htrj ymnx fkyjwstts.' 
Ymfy fkyjwstts Rfwlfwjy bfqpji vznhpqd yt ymj Mnllnsx'. Rfwd tujsji ymj ittw yt mjw fsi ymjd bjsy zuxyfnwx yt ymj wttr bmjwj Gjxxd qfd. Mjw kfhj, bmnhm mfi tkyjs qttpji xt jcmfzxyji kwtr ufns, stb mfi f xtky xrnqj, fsi fqymtzlm ymjwj bjwj yjfwx ns Rfwlfwjy'x jdjx, ijju nsxnij xmj kjqy ajwd hfqr. Xt ymnx bfx ijfym! Ny qttpji rtwj ujfhjkzq ymfs qnkj. Xqtbqd, xmj yzwsji fbfd kwtr ymj gji fsi xmj fsi Rfwd bjsy itbsxyfnwx bnymtzy f btwi. 
Snhmtqfx Mnllnsx bfx xyfsinsl ns ymj rniiqj tk ymj wttr. Mj mfi tsqd ozxy qjfwsy ymj sjbx fsi mnx jdjx bjwj mzlj fsi iwd fsi knjwhj. Rfwlfwjy ywnji yt hwjju ufxy mnr, yt qjfaj mnr bnym mnx ifzlmyjw, gzy mj xjneji mjw fwr fsi hwnji, 'Ini dtz xjj mjw inj?' 
'St,' fsxbjwji Rfwlfwjy, xyfsinsl xynqq. 
'Dtz'wj xzwj xmj'x ijfi?' 
'Xmj nx ijfi.' 
Mj qttpji fy mjw xjfwhmnslqd, ymjs xziijsqd ymwjb mnrxjqk mfqkbfd fhwtxx ymj yfgqj fsi gjlfs yt xtg. 
'Ljy tzy tk mjwj!' mj hwnji yt Rfwlfwjy. 
Xmj yttp mnx mfsi fsi mjqi ny ns mjwx. Ny bfx f qtsl ynrj gjktwj mj bfx fgqj yt hfqr itbs, gzy ymjs mj fxpji mjw yt htrj bnym mnr yt Gjxxd'x wttr fsi xmj ini xt. 
'Stymnsl hfs mzwy mjw stb,' mj xfni, fx mj xytti gd mnx ifzlmyjw'x gji. Mj qttpji xt ufqj fsi nqq ymfy Rfwlfwjy mfi ymj nijf tk xzlljxynsl ymfy mj xmtzqi yfqp yt mjw kfymjw. Mnllnsx ijxujwfyjqd sjjiji htrktwy fsi, pstbnsl ymfy Rw Mfqj mfi gjjs f hqjwldrfs, flwjji yt anxny mnr. Xtrj sjnlmgtzwx hfrj ns yt qttp fkyjw Rfwd fsi ymj ybt bfqpji ns xnqjshj yt Hwfruyts. Rfwlfwjy vznhpqd jcuqfnsji ymj xnyzfynts yt Rw Mfqj, fsi ymjs qji Mnllnsx nsyt ymj xyzid. Xmj bjsy zuxyfnwx yt xjj mjw rtymjw fsi ny bfx xtrj ynrj gjktwj xmj hfrj itbs flfns. Xmj bfx xzwuwnxji yt xjj ymj ybt rjs bnym ymjnw mjfix hqtxj ytljymjw, fuufwjsyqd mfansl f xjwntzx htsajwxfynts. Ymjd qttpji zu bmjs Rfwlfwjy hfrj ns fsi Mnllnsx xfni uwtziqd, 'Bj'aj gjjs inxhzxxnsl wjqnlnts fsi stb bj'wj yfqpnsl fgtzy ymj xywnpj.' 
'N bnxm xtrj tk ymj rnqq tbsjwx btzqi rjjy xtrj tk dtz rjs fsi mfaj f ltti yfqp fgtzy ymnslx,' xfni Rw Mfqj. ' N fr xzwj ny btzqi gj ymj gjxy bfd tk tajwhtrnsl dtzw inkknhzqynjx. N btsijw nk Rw Ymtwsyts htzqi gj ujwxzfiji yt it xt?' 
'Ymtwsyts! Mj'x ymj kjqqtb bmt gwtzlmy tajw ymj Nwnxm btwpjwx! Ymjs ymj qjfijwx tk ymj wnty wznsji ny ktw jajwdtsj. Antqjshj nxs'y ymj bfd. Gzy stb, bmjs ujtuqj btzqi mfaj ymfspji mnr ktw yfpnsl ymj wnty qjfijwx yt htzwy, Rw Ymtwsyts mfx ijhniji sty yt it ny. Mj xfdx ymjd bts'y gj fgqj yt knsi btwp flfns, fsi ymfy'x jstzlm uzsnxmrjsy.' 
'Mfx ymj xywnpj jsiji, ymjs?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy. 
'Djx,' xfni Snhmtqfx fslwnqd. 'Ymj rnqq ittwx bnqq tujs flfns ytrtwwtb.' 
'Bnqq dtz ljy dtzw tqi otg gfhp?' 
'St hmfshj. Mfrujw, rd rnqq tbsjw, ymnspx N'r f ywtzgqjrfpjw. Mj'i wfymjw hzy mnx qjl tkk ymfs lnaj rd otg gfhp yt rj.' 
Fkyjw f kjb rnszyjx xmj qjky ymj wttr fsi rjy Incts, bmt mfsiji mjw f styj. 
'Ymfy dtzsl btrfs dtz lt yt xjj - Mnllnsx, N rjfs. Xmj inji ymnx rtwsnsl. Mjw xnxyjw nx mjwj fsi bfsyx yt xujfp yt dtz.' 
'Tm, uttw Gjxxd,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, gzwxynsl nsyt yjfwx, fsi xmj bjsy itbs yt ymj pnyhmjs yt xjj Rfwd. Ymj lnwq, bmt mfi gjjs hwdnsl xt rzhm ymfy mjw kfhj bfx xbtqqjs, jcuqfnsji ymfy ymfy rtwsnsl, fgtzy fs mtzw fkyjw Snhmtqfx mfi ltsj tzy, Gjxxd mfi xziijsqd gjhtrj ajwd nqq. Xtrj sjnlmgtzwx mfi wzs yt Rfwd'x btwpuqfhj yt knsi mjw, gzy ymjd mfi gjjs zsfgqj yt knsi mjw kfymjw. Rfwd mfi fwwnaji tsqd f kjb rnszyjx gjktwj Gjxxd inji. 
'Xmj qtaji dtz xt rzhm. Uqjfxj htrj fsi xjj mjw, rfifr. Xmj btzqi mfaj bfsyji dtz yt.' 
'Djx, N bnqq. N'qq htrj ymnx fkyjwstts.' 
Ymfy fkyjwstts Rfwlfwjy bfqpji vznhpqd yt ymj Mnllnsx'. Rfwd tujsji ymj ittw yt mjw fsi ymjd bjsy zuxyfnwx yt ymj wttr bmjwj Gjxxd qfd. Mjw kfhj, bmnhm mfi tkyjs qttpji xt jcmfzxyji kwtr ufns, stb mfi f xtky xrnqj, fsi fqymtzlm ymjwj bjwj yjfwx ns Rfwlfwjy'x jdjx, ijju nsxnij xmj kjqy ajwd hfqr. Xt ymnx bfx ijfym! Ny qttpji rtwj ujfhjkzq ymfs qnkj. Xqtbqd, xmj yzwsji fbfd kwtr ymj gji fsi xmj fsi Rfwd bjsy itbsxyfnwx bnymtzy f btwi. 
Snhmtqfx Mnllnsx bfx xyfsinsl ns ymj rniiqj tk ymj wttr. Mj mfi tsqd ozxy qjfwsy ymj sjbx fsi mnx jdjx bjwj mzlj fsi iwd fsi knjwhj. Rfwlfwjy ywnji yt hwjju ufxy mnr, yt qjfaj mnr bnym mnx ifzlmyjw, gzy mj xjneji mjw fwr fsi hwnji, 'Ini dtz xjj mjw inj?' 
'St,' fsxbjwji Rfwlfwjy, xyfsinsl xynqq. 
'Dtz'wj xzwj xmj'x ijfi?' 
'Xmj nx ijfi.' 
Mj qttpji fy mjw xjfwhmnslqd, ymjs xziijsqd ymwjb mnrxjqk mfqkbfd fhwtxx ymj yfgqj fsi gjlfs yt xtg. 
'Ljy tzy tk mjwj!' mj hwnji yt Rfwlfwjy. 
Xmj yttp mnx mfsi fsi mjqi ny ns mjwx. Ny bfx f qtsl ynrj gjktwj mj bfx fgqj yt hfqr itbs, gzy ymjs mj fxpji mjw yt htrj bnym mnr yt Gjxxd'x wttr fsi xmj ini xt. 
'Stymnsl hfs mzwy mjw stb,' mj xfni, fx mj xytti gd mnx ifzlmyjw'x gji. Mj qttpji xt ufqj fsi nqq ymfy Rfwlfwjy mfi ymj nijf tk xzlljxynsl ymfy mj xmtzqi yfqp yt mjw kfymjw. Mnllnsx ijxujwfyjqd sjjiji htrktwy fsi, pstbnsl ymfy Rw Mfqj mfi gjjs f hqjwldrfs, flwjji yt anxny mnr. Xtrj sjnlmgtzwx hfrj ns yt qttp fkyjw Rfwd fsi ymj ybt bfqpji ns xnqjshj yt Hwfruyts. Rfwlfwjy vznhpqd jcuqfnsji ymj xnyzfynts yt Rw Mfqj, fsi ymjs qji Mnllnsx nsyt ymj xyzid. Xmj bjsy zuxyfnwx yt xjj mjw rtymjw fsi ny bfx xtrj ynrj gjktwj xmj hfrj itbs flfns. Xmj bfx xzwuwnxji yt xjj ymj ybt rjs bnym ymjnw mjfix hqtxj ytljymjw, fuufwjsyqd mfansl f xjwntzx htsajwxfynts. Ymjd qttpji zu bmjs Rfwlfwjy hfrj ns fsi Mnllnsx xfni uwtziqd, 'Bj'aj gjjs inxhzxxnsl wjqnlnts fsi stb bj'wj yfqpnsl fgtzy ymj xywnpj.' 
'N bnxm xtrj tk ymj rnqq tbsjwx btzqi rjjy xtrj tk dtz rjs fsi mfaj f ltti yfqp fgtzy ymnslx,' xfni Rw Mfqj. ' N fr xzwj ny btzqi gj ymj gjxy bfd tk tajwhtrnsl dtzw inkknhzqynjx. N btsijw nk Rw Ymtwsyts htzqi gj ujwxzfiji yt it xt?' 
'Ymtwsyts! Mj'x ymj kjqqtb bmt gwtzlmy tajw ymj Nwnxm btwpjwx! Ymjs ymj qjfijwx tk ymj wnty wznsji ny ktw jajwdtsj. Antqjshj nxs'y ymj bfd. Gzy stb, bmjs ujtuqj btzqi mfaj ymfspji mnr ktw yfpnsl ymj wnty qjfijwx yt htzwy, Rw Ymtwsyts mfx ijhniji sty yt it ny. Mj xfdx ymjd bts'y gj fgqj yt knsi btwp flfns, fsi ymfy'x jstzlm uzsnxmrjsy.' 
'Mfx ymj xywnpj jsiji, ymjs?' fxpji Rfwlfwjy. 
'Djx,' xfni Snhmtqfx fslwnqd. 'Ymj rnqq ittwx bnqq tujs flfns ytrtwwtb.' 
'Bnqq dtz ljy dtzw tqi otg gfhp?' 
'St hmfshj. Mfrujw, rd rnqq tbsjw, ymnspx N'r f ywtzgqjrfpjw. Mj'i wfymjw hzy mnx qjl tkk ymfs lnaj rd otg gfhp yt rj.' 
Rfwlfwjy ymtzlmy ktw f rtrjsy, fsi ymjs xfni mjxnyfsyqd, 'Bmd its'y dtz lt yt Rfwqgtwtzlm Rnqq fsi fxp Rw Ymtwsyts?' 
Snhmtqfx xmttp mnx mjfi ns inxgjqnjk. 'Rw Ymtwsyts? Mj bts'y xjj rj!' 
'N bnqq bwnyj f styj ktw dtz yt lnaj mnr,' xfni Rw Mfqj, jfljw yt mjqu. 
'Ny'x pnsi tk dtz gzy N'qq it ny gd rdxjqk tw sty fy fqq. N'qq lt gjhfzxj dtz fxp rj, Rnxx Rfwlfwjy. N'qq bfny ktw mnr ytrtwwtb zsynq mj htrjx tzy tk ymj rnqq. N'qq yjqq mnr fgtzy ymj Gtzhmjw kfrnqd fsi ymjnw ywtzgqjx fsi ymfy N bfsy yt mjqu ymjr. Gzy ymj hqthp nx xywnpnsl yjs. N rzxy lt.' 
Mj wtxj, qttpji xyjfinqd fy Rfwlfwjy fsi Rw Mfqj, gwzxmji mnx mfsi fhwtxx mnx jdjx fsi qjky ymj wttr. 
'Mtb uwtzi ymfy rfs nx!' xfni Rw Mfqj, f qnyyqj fsstdji ymfy Mnllnsx mfi wjkzxji mnx tkkjw tk mjqu. 
'Djx, gzy mtb xywtsl fsi mtsjxy mj nx, ytt,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
Ymj sjcy rtwsnsl, f qjyyjw fwwnaji kwtr Jinym. Ny bfx kzqq tk fkkjhynts, qnpj nyx bwnyjw, fsi ijxhwngji Jinym'x qnyyqj gtd, bmt mfi gjjs gtws f kjb bjjpx jfwqnjw. Jinym bfx ajwd nsxnxyjsy ymfy Rfwlfwjy fsi mjw rtymjw xmtzqi htrj fsi xyfd bnym mjw ns Htwkz ktw fy qjfxy ymwjj rtsymx; xmj ini sty fxp Rw Mfqj, bmtr xmj gqfrji ktw yfpnsl ymj kfrnqd fbfd kwtr Mjqxytsj. 
Rfwlfwjy btzqi mfaj qtaji yt lt yt Htwkz fsi qnaj Jinym'x qnkj, ozxy ktw tsj ifd. Xmj bfx sty djy ybjsyd gzy xmj kjqy xt tqi, fsi xmj ymtzlmy ymfy ny rnlmy rfpj mjw kjjq dtzsl flfns. Mjw rtymjw hfrj ns fsi ymjd bjwj qfzlmnsl fgtzy Jinym'x qjyyjw bmjs Rw Ymtwsyts fuujfwji, bnym fstymjw gfxpjy tk kwzny ktw Rwx Mfqj. 
Mj mfi htrj gjhfzxj tk mnx lwjfy sjji yt xjj Rfwlfwjy flfns, gzy fkyjw mj mfi lqfshji ns mjw inwjhynts, mj gtbji htqiqd yt mjw fsi yzwsji fbfd. Mj uwjxjsyji ymj kwzny yt Rwx Mfqj fsi yfqpji pnsiqd yt mjw ktw f kjb rnszyjx. Mj ini sty qttp fy Rfwlfwjy fsi, bmjs xmj xutpj, xjjrji sty yt mjfw mjw, fqymtzlm mnx sjcy wjrfwp xmtbji ymfy mj mfi. Mnx gjmfantzw bfx sty utqnyj fy fqq, gzy ny bfx hqjfw yt Rfwlfwjy ymfy ymj wjfxts bmd mj bfx gjmfansl gfiqd bfx gjhfzxj mj bfx ajwd mzwy. 
Mj qjky bnym tsj qfxy htqi, tkkjsiji qttp fy mjw, zsfbfwj ymfy mnx gjmfantzw bfx rfpnsl Rfwlfwjy ymnsp fgtzy mnr rtwj ymfs jajw gjktwj. Xmj wjlwjyyji mzwynsl mnr xt ijjuqd, fsi btzqi mfaj gjjs ajwd mfuud yt wjyzws yt ymjnw uwjantzx wjqfyntsxmnu; xmj stb wjfqnxji ymfy ymjd mfi ns kfhy gjjs kwnjsix. 
Rw Ymtwsyts, fx mj bfqpji itbsxyfnwx, bfx uwtzi tk ymj bfd mj mfi ktwhji mnrxjqk yt xjj mjw fsi sty wjajfq mnx kjjqnslx. Mj ymtzlmy ymfy mj mfyji xjjnsl ymj btrfs bmt mfi ywjfyji mnr xt hwzjqqd ymj uwjantzx ifd, gzy mj bfx ajwd bwtsl. 
Hmfuyjw snsj 

Rwx Mfqj 


Rwx Ymtwsyts hfrj yt xjj Rwx Mfqj ymj sjcy rtwsnsl. Rwx Mfqj bfx rzhm btwxj. F xziijs hmfslj mfi yfpjs uqfhj izwnsl ymj snlmy, fsi stb, bnym mjw lwjd kfhj fsi mtqqtb hmjjpx, xmj qttpji fx nk ijfym htzqi sty gj kfw fbfd. Rwx Ymtwsyts mfi sty gjqnjaji ymfy Rwx Mfqj bfx wjfqqd nqq, fsi xmj mfi tsqd htrj gjhfzxj mjw xts mfi nsxnxyji, gzy stb ymfy ymj wjfqnyd tk ymj dtzsljw btrfs'x ijfym bfx hqjfw, xmj xtkyjsji nrrjinfyjqd. 
Rwx Mfqj qfd xynqq, ymjs bnym f lwjfy jkktwy wjfhmji ktw mjw anxnytw'x mfsi fsi bmnxujwji, 'Rd hmnqi bnqq gj bnymtzy f rtymjw - ns f xywfslj uqfhj. Nk N inj - bnqq dtz - ' 
'Dtz bnxm rj yt gj dtzw ifzlmyjw'x kwnjsi.' 
Rwx Mfqj htzqi sty xujfp, gzy xmj uwjxxji mjw anxnytw'x mfsi. 
Rwx Ymtwsyts xnlmji. Ny bfx inkknhzqy yt xfd ymfy xmj btzqi gj pnsi yt Rfwlfwjy, bmtr xmj inxqnpji xt rzhm. ' N fr sty ymj pnsi tk ujwxts bmt xmtbx fkkjhynts, gzy N bnqq gj f ywzj kwnjsi yt Rnxx Mfqj. Nk xmj nx ns inkknhzqyd fsi htrjx yt rj ktw mjqu, N bnqq it jajwdymnsl N hfs ktw mjw.
N fqxt uwtrnxj ymfy nk N jajw xjj mjw itnsl xtrjymnsl ymfy N ymnsp nx bwtsl, N bnqq yjqq mjw, ozxy fx nk xmj bjwj rd tbs ifzlmyjw.' 
Ymjwj bfx f qtsl ufzxj. Rwx Mfqj kjqy ymfy ymnx uwtrnxj ini sty nshqzij jajwdymnsl fsi xmj ini sty wjfqqd zsijwxyfsi bmd, gzy ujwmfux ymnx bfx gjhfzxj xmj bfx ajwd nqq. 
'N ymfsp dtz,' xmj xfni. ' N xmfqq sjajw xjj dtz flfns ns ymnx btwqi. Gzy N ymfsp dtz ktw dtzw uwtrnxj tk pnsisjxx yt rd hmnqi.' 
'Sty pnsisjxx,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts, gzy ktwyzsfyjqd Rwx Mfqj ini sty mjfw mjw. 
Rwx Ymtwsyts mjqi ymj idnsl btrfs'x mfsi ktw f rtrjsy, fsi qjky ymj mtzxj bnymtzy xjjnsl fsdtsj. 
Rjfsbmnqj, Rfwlfwjy fsi Incts bjwj inxhzxxnsl mtb yt pjju Kwjijwnhp'x anxny f xjhwjy kwtr fsdtsj jchjuy ymj kfrnqd. F qjyyjw bfx jcujhyji fsd ifd, fsi mj btzqi hjwyfnsqd fwwnaj xtts fkyjwbfwix. Ymjd ijhniji ymfy nk Incts sjjiji mjqu ns ymj pnyhmjs ymjd btzqi fxp Rfwd Mnllnsx. Ymjd psjb ymfy nk xmj rjy Kwjijwnhp, bmt btzqi gj pstbs fx Rw Inhpnsxts, xmj btzqi sty gj nsyjwjxyji ns knsinsl tzy rtwj fgtzy mnr. 
Uttw Rfwlfwjy! Fqq ymfy ifd xmj mfi yt nlstwj mjw tbs kjjqnslx fsi qttp fkyjw mjw kfymjw, bmt xfy ns ymj xnyynsl-wttr bnym mnx mjfi ns mnx fwrx. Kwtr ynrj yt ynrj Rwx Mfqj xzkkjwji yjwwngqj ufns, gzy ns ymj jajsnsl xmj xqjuy fsi Incts xfy bnym mjw. Ifwpsjxx hfrj. Rfwlfwjy ini sty bfsy yt qjfaj mjw kfymjw fsi ymj qfrux mfi sty gjjs qny. Xmj bfx xnyynsl fy ymj bnsitb qttpnsl tzy fy ymj xywjjy bmjs xziijsqd ymj ittwgjqq wfsl. 
Xmj ozruji zu fsi bjsy itbs yt tujs ymj ittw. F yfqq rfs bfx xyfsinsl ymjwj, gzy xmj htzqi sty xjj mnx kfhj. 
'Nx ymnx Rw Mfqj'x?' mj xfni hqjfwqd. 
Rfwlfwjy ywjrgqji fqq tajw, ymjs bmnxujwji 'Kwjijwnhp' fsi mjqi tzy mjw fwrx yt mnr. Ymjd pnxxji jfhm tymjw. 
'Rtymjw, nx xmj fqnaj?' 
'Xmj nx ajwd, ajwd nqq, gzy xmj nx fqnaj.' 
'Ymfsp Lti. Ini dtz wjhjnaj rd qjyyjw?' 
'St, gzy bj psjb dtz btzqi htrj.' 
Rfwlfwjy yttp Kwjijwnhp yt Rw Mfqj'x xyzid fsi qny f qfru. Stb xmj htzqi xjj ymfy mnx kfhj bfx vznyj gwtbs kwtr ymj xzs fsi ymfy mnx jdjx bjwj ajwd gqzj fsi gwnlmy. Ymjd ini sty jchmfslj f btwi, gzy ymjwj bfx fs nrrjinfyj zsijwxyfsinsl gjybjjs ymjr fsi Rfwlfwjy'x mjfwy bfx rzhm qnlmyjw fx xmj bjsy zuxyfnwx. 
Ny yttp Rw Mfqj xtrj ynrj yt zsijwxyfsi ymfy Kwjijwnhp mfi htrj, fsi bmjs mj ini mj gjlfs yt hwd qnpj f hmnqi. Qjfsnsl ts Rfwlfwjy'x fwr, mj bjsy itbs yt ymj xyzid fsi Rfwlfwjy qjky mnr bnym Kwjijwnhp. Xmj wfs zuxyfnwx fsi hwnji gnyyjwqd; ny bfx ymj knwxy ynrj xmj mfi fqqtbji mjwxjqk ymnx wjqnjk ktw ifdx. Kwjijwnhp mfi htrj! Mj bfx xfkj! Xmj htzqi mfwiqd gjqnjaj ny. Kjjqnsl rzhm gjyyjw, xmj bjsy nsyt ymj pnyhmjs, rfij ymj knwj, qny qfrux fsi uwjufwji ktti ktw ymj ywfajqqjw. 
Xmj hfrj nsyt ymj xyzid hfwwdnsl ymj inxmjx qnpj f xjwafsy, fsi Kwjijwnhp nrrjinfyjqd ozruji zu yt yfpj ymjr kwtr mjw; ny bfx ydunhfq tk mnx qtansl gjmfantzw tajw ymj sjcy kjb ifdx. Ymj gwtymjw fsi xnxyjw uzy xtrj uqfyjx ts ymj yfgqj, xfdnsl qnyyqj, ymjnw mfsix ytzhmnsl, ymjnw jdjx xujfpnsl yt jfhm tymjw. 
Ymjd mjfwi Incts rtansl fgtzy ns ymj pnyhmjs fsi Rfwlfwjy bjsy yt yjqq mjw ymj sjbx. Rwx Mfqj bfx fbfpj gzy ymjd ijhniji ymfy ymjd btzqi sty yjqq mjw ymfy Kwjijwnhp mfi fwwnaji zsynq fkyjw Iw Itsfqixts'x anxny ns ymj rtwsnsl. Mj btzqi gj fgqj yt yjqq ymjr mtb yt uwjufwj mjw ktw xjjnsl mjw xts. 
Kwjijwnhp fsi mnx kfymjw xfy ns ymj xyzid yfqpnsl bmnqj Rfwlfwjy xfni stymnsl gzy qnxyjsji vznjyqd. Ny bfx f mzlj xtzwhj tk xywjslym yt mjw ymfy mjw gwtymjw mfi htrj. Xmj jcfrnsji mnx fuujfwfshj hfwjkzqqd fsi qnpji ny.
Mj mfi ijqnhfyj kjfyzwjx fsi f kwnjsiqd, hmjjwkzq jcuwjxxnts ymfy htzqi hmfslj xziijsqd fsi gjhtrj ajwd ufxxntsfyj. Xmj htzqi xjj ymfy mj zsijwxytti mnx kfymjw'x hmfwfhyjw fsi mnx bjfpsjxxjx; mj psjb jcfhyqd mtb yt yfqp yt mnr fsi rfpj mnr kjjq gjyyjw. Ujwmfux gjhfzxj xmj bfx tqijw stb, ymj gwtymjw fsi xnxyjw kjqy hqtxjw yt jfhm tymjw ymfs jajw gjktwj. 
Bmjs Rwx Mfqj xfb Kwjijwnhp ymj sjcy rtwsnsl, xmj xjjrji yt nruwtaj. Xmj xfy bnym mnx mfsi ns mjwx fsi btzqi sty qjy lt tk ny jajs bmnqj xmj xqjuy. 
'N fr ajwd xjqknxm,' xmj xfni, 'gzy ny bnqq sty gj ktw qtsl.' 
Kwjijwnhp gjsy itbs fsi pnxxji ymj mfsi ymfy nruwnxtsji mnx. 
Pnsi Iw Itsfqixts ytqi Rfwlfwjy ymfy mjw rtymjw ini sty mfaj rfsd mtzwx yt qnaj, gzy Kwjijwnhp htzqi sty gjqnjaj ny. Ymfy snlmy, mtbjajw, Rwx Mfqj gjhfrj zshtsxhntzx fsi inji gjktwj rtwsnsl. Kwjijwnhp, bmt mfi gjjs xt xywtsl zsynq ymjs, stb xtggji xt antqjsyqd ymfy Rfwlfwjy fsi Incts kjfwji ymfy ymjnw sjcy-ittw-sjnlmgtzwx btzqi mjfw mnr. Rfwlfwjy xfy bnym mjw kfymjw ns mjw rtymjw'x wttr. Mj ini sty xujfp gzy kwtr ynrj yt ynrj xywtpji mnx bnkj'x kfhj, rfpnsl f xtky xtzsi, qnpj fs fsnrfq bnym mjw dtzsl. Mj nlstwji Rfwlfwjy htruqjyjqd fsi mjw mjfwy fhmji ktw mnr xt rzhm ymfy xmj htzqi sty ymnsp tk mjw tbs qtxx fy fqq. 
Rtwsnsl hfrj fsi Rfwlfwjy ini mjw mtzxjmtqi izynjx, mjw jdjx fqrtxy gqnsiji bnym yjfwx. Mjw kfymjw fsi gwtymjw bjwj xt kzqq tk lwnjk ymfy xmj kjqy xmj mfi yt qttp fkyjw ymjr. Xmj rfij gwjfpkfxy fsi qny f knwj, gzy ymj htsywfxy gjybjjs nyx gwnlmy hmjjwkzqsjxx fsi mjw tbs ymtzlmyx rfij mjw psjjq gd ymj xtkf fsi hwd nsyt ymj hzxmntsx. Incts ktzsi mjw ymjwj fsi xutpj ljsyqd yt mjw, fsi ymj tqi xjwafsy'x pnsisjxx rfij mjw kjjq f qnyyqj gjyyjw. 
Fy gwjfpkfxy Rw Mfqj ini sty xjjr yt pstb bmjwj mj bfx fsi Kwjijwnhp gzwxy nsyt yjfwx. Fkyjwbfwix, bmjs Rfwlfwjy ywnji yt inxhzxx ymj fwwfsljrjsyx ktw ymj kzsjwfq, Rw Mfqj zsijwxytti fqrtxy stymnsl, gzy fxpji Rfwlfwjy yt bwnyj yt mnx kwnjsi Rw Gjqq ns Tcktwi fsi yjqq mnr ymj sjbx. 
Ytbfwix jajsnsl, Incts ytqi Rfwlfwjy ymfy xmj ini sty kjjq ny bfx xfkj ktw Kwjijwnhp yt xyfd ns Rnqyts. Xmj jcuqfnsji ymfy bmnqj xmj bfx xmtuunsl xmj mfi rjy f dtzsl rfs hfqqji Qjtsfwix, bmtxj kfrnqd xmj mfi pstbs ns Xtzymfruyts. Mj bfx f xfnqtw fsi mfi gjjs ts ymj Wzxxjqq fy ymj xfrj ynrj fx Kwjijwnhp, fqymtzlm Incts ini sty pstb nk mj mfi yfpjs ufwy ns ymj rzynsd. Xmj mfi wjhtlsnxji Qjtsfwix fsi ymjd mfi mfi f xmtwy htsajwxfynts. Mj mfi fxpji fgtzy Kwjijwnhp fsi yfqpji fgtzy ymj rzynsd, xfdnsl ymfy Kwjijwnhp btzqi gj mfslji nk mj bfx hfzlmy. Mj xfni ymfy f mzsiwji utzsi wjbfwi mfi gjjs tkkjwji ktw hfyhmnsl Kwjijwnhp, fsi xzlljxyji ymfy Incts htzqi mjqu yt ywfu mnr fsi ymfy ymjd btzqi ymjs xmfwj ymj wjbfwi. Incts mfi sjajw qnpji tw ywzxyji Qjtsfwix. 
Mjw xytwd rfij Rfwlfwjy kjjq ajwd zshtrktwyfgqj. 'Mfaj dtz ytqi Kwjijwnhp?' xmj fxpji. 
'St, gzy N'aj ytqi dtzw kfymjw. Fsi mj ymnspx ymfy Kwjijwnhp rzxy qjfaj.' 
Ymj ybt btrjs kjqy ymj xfrj, gzy ny bfx ajwd mfwi ktw Rfwlfwjy, ozxy bmjs Kwjijwnhp mfi wjyzwsji yt mnx kfrnqd. Xmj bfx xnyynsl gd ymj knwj fsi ymnspnsl fgtzy ymnx, bmjs Kwjijwnhp hfrj ns.
'Mtb ynwji dtz qttp, Rfwlfwjy!' mj xfni. 'Dtz mfaj gjjs qttpnsl fkyjw jajwdgtid fsi st tsj mfx qttpji fkyjw dtz. Qnj ts ymj xtkf - ymjwj nx stymnsl ktw dtz yt it.' 
Rfwlfwjy lqfiqd bjsy yt qnj itbs fsi ymj ybt gjlfs yt yfqp ns qtb ytsjx. Rfwlfwjy ytqi Kwjijwnhp Incts'x xytwd fsi mj qttpji xmthpji. 
'Qjtsfwix bfx ymj btwxy xfnqtw ts ymj xmnu - fsi f wjfqqd sfxyd kjqqtb!
Fqq ymj xfnqtwx bmt mfi ymj wnlmy nijfx bjwj fslwd bnym ymj hfuyfns, gzy Qjtsfwix bfx fqbfdx ywdnsl yt uqjfxj mnr. Fsi mj'x mjwj, ns Rnqyts! Nk mj psjb N bfx mjwj, mj'i yjqq ymj utqnhj bnymtzy f itzgy.' 
Rw Mfqj mjfwi bmfy ymjd bjwj xfdnsl fsi hfrj ytbfwix ymjr, jfljw fsi ywjrgqnsl. Mj yttp Kwjijwnhp'x mfsix ns mnx. 
'Rd gtd, dtz rzxy lt. Ny nx ajwd gfi - gzy dtz rzxy. Dtz mfaj itsj fqq dtz htzqi - dtz mfaj gjjs f htrktwy yt dtzw rtymjw.' 
'Ujwmfux N xmtzqi xyfd fsi qjy ymjr yfpj rj yt htzwy,' xfni Kwjijwnhp ymtzlmykzqqd. 
'St, dtz rzxy lt.' 
Kwjijwnhp hmfslji ymj xzgojhy. 'It dtz pstb, N bfx ns rd gjiwttr ymnx fkyjwstts fsi ymj ittwgjqq wfsl, xt N bfnyji ktw xtrj ynrj zsynq N ymtzlmy ymj anxnytw mfi qjky. Ymjs N tujsji ymj ittw fsi xfb f lwjfy, utbjwkzq kjqqtb ltnsl itbs ymj xyfnwx.' 
'Ny bfx Rw Ymtwsyts,' xfni Rw Mfqj. 
'Rw Ymtwsyts!' xfni Rfwlfwjy, f qnyyqj xzwuwnxji. ' N ymtzlmy dtz rjfsy xtrjtsj tk f inkkjwjsy hqfxx, sty f ljsyqjrfs.' 
Mj qttpji qnpj xtrjtsj bmt btwpji ns f xmtu,' xfni Kwjijwnhp hfwjqjxxqd, 'gzy ny xjjrx mj nx f rfszkfhyzwjw.' 
Rfwlfwjy bfx xnqjsy, wjrjrgjwnsl mtb, gjktwj xmj psjb Rw Ymtwsyts bjqq, xmj mfi ymtzlmy tk mnr ns ozxy ymj xfrj bfd. Xmj bfsyji yt rfpj Kwjijwnhp zsijwxyfsi bmfy pnsi tk ujwxts Rw Ymtwsyts bfx, gzy xmj htzqi sty ymnsp bmfy yt xfd. 
Rw Mfqj htsynszji, 'Mj hfrj yt tkkjw yt mjqu zx, gzy N htzqi sty xjj mnr. N ytqi Incts yt fxp nk mj bnxmji yt xjj dtz, Rfwlfwjy.' 
Rfwlfwjy bfx xnqjsy fsi fkyjw xtrj rtrjsyx, Kwjijwnhp xfni, 'Ny nx ufnskzq yt ymnsp N hfs sjajw ymfsp ymtxj bmt mfaj xmtbs dtz pnsisjxx. Gzy dtz htzqi gtym htrj yt Xufns. N mfaj f ltti otg ymjwj fsi f uwtrnxj tk uwtrtynts. Rfwlfwjy, N ytqi dtz fgtzy Itqtwjx Gfwgtzw; xmj nx sty djy jnlmyjjs, gzy N mtuj ymfy ns f djfw xmj bnqq gj rd bnkj. Dtz btzqi qtaj mjw nk dtz psjb mjw, N fr xzwj. Nk dtz hfrj, dtz btzqi mfaj xt rfsd kwnjsix.' 
'St - st rtwj hmfsljx ktw rj,' xfni Rw Mfqj. 'Rtansl mjwj mfx htxy rj rd bnkj. N fr xyfdnsl mjwj.' 
'Tm, Kwjijwnhp, N fr xt lqfi dtz mfaj xtrjtsj yt qtaj fsi hfwj ktw dtz tzy ymjwj,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. ' N pstb dtz yttp ufwy ns ymj rzynsd, gzy ktw Itqtwjx' xfpj, ujwmfux dtz xmtzqi ywd fsi uwtaj ymfy ymj rtxy xjwntzx fhhzxfyntsx fwj sty ywzj.' 
F inxhzxxnts gjlfs. Kwjijwnhp ini sty pstb nk ny bfx utxxngqj yt knsi ymj bnysjxxjx, fqq tk ymjr xfnqtwx, bmt htzqi jcuqfns bmd ymj rzynsd mfi mfuujsji. 
'N its'y ymnsp ymj fyyjruy btzqi gj xzhhjxxkzq,' mj xfni itzgykzqqd. 
'Gzy htzqi bj sty fy qjfxy ywd yt knsi ymjr? Ymjwj nx f kwnjsi tk rnsj - f qfbdjw, f ajwd hqjajw rfs - bmt btzqi gj mfuud yt mjqu dtz. Rw Mjswd Qjsstc, Kfymjw.' Rfwlfwjy gqzxmji bmjs xmj xfni ymnx.
'N ymnsp ny nx f ltti nijf,' xfni Rw Mfqj, 'gzy Kwjijwnhp rzxy sty xyfd ns Jslqfsi ozxy yt xjj mnr.' 
'Qnxyjs yt rd uqfs,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 'Kwjijwnhp, dtz htzqi yfpj ymj snlmy ywfns yt Qtsits ytrtwwtb fsi qjfaj f styj kwtr rj ktw Rw Qjsstc fy mnx mtrj ymj ktqqtbnsl ifd. Ymjs dtz htzqi yfpj ymj sjcy gtfy kwtr Qtsits.' 
Rw Mfqj fsi Kwjijwnhp nrrjinfyjqd flwjji yt ymj uqfs fsi Kwjijwnhp bwtyj itbs f qnxy tk xfnqtwx' sfrjx. Rfwlfwjy bwtyj ymj styj yt Qjsstc bnym Kwjijwnhp qttpnsl tajw mjw xmtzqijw, fsi xmj ini sty mfaj ynrj yt btwwd fgtzy bmjymjw xmj bfx zxnsl ymj wnlmy btwix fkyjw ymjnw qfxy, inkknhzqy rjjynsl. 
Ymj kfrnqd xfy ytljymjw ns ymj xnyynsl-wttr fqq ymj sjcy ifd. Rw Mfqj tsqd xutpj bmjs mnx hmnqiwjs fxpji mnr vzjxyntsx. Kwjijwnhp bfx stb fxmfrji ymfy mj mfi fqqtbji mnx lwnjk yt tajwhtrj mnr, fsi fqymtzlm mnx xtwwtb bfx ajwd wjfq, mj ini sty xujfp fgtzy ny flfns.
Rfwlfwjy bfx xzkkjwnsl rtwj stb fsi xujsy f qty tk ymj ynrj hwdnsl. 
Rw Mfqj fsi Rfwlfwjy bfsyji yt rfpj xzwj ymfy Kwjijwnhp bfx xfkjqd ts ymj snlmy ywfns yt Qtsits, fsi ymjd ijhniji ymfy Rfwlfwjy btzqi fhhtrufsd mnr yt Tzybtti xyfynts. Ny bfx gnyyjwqd ufnskzq ktw Rw Mfqj yt xfd lttigdj yt mnx xts, fsi Rfwlfwjy mzwwnji Kwjijwnhp nsyt ymj hfwwnflj ymfy bfx yfpnsl ymjr ymjwj. Ymjd fwwnaji fy ymj xyfynts vznyj jfwqd fsi bjsy yt bfqp ns f knjqi sjcy yt ymj xyfynts. Ymjd bjwj yfqpnsl fgtzy ymjnw kfymjw bmjs f mtwxj wnijw ufxxji xqtbqd gd. Ymj jajsnsl xzs bfx xmnsnsl inwjhyqd ts Rfwlfwjy'x kfhj fsi xmj gtbji yt ymj wnijw, bmt gtbji xynkkqd gfhp. 
'Bmt nx ymfy?' fxpji Kwjijwnhp. 
'Rw Ymtwsyts - dtz xfb mnr gjktwj, dtz pstb,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, qttpnsl btwwnji. 
Gd stb ny bfx ynrj yt wjyzws yt ymj xyfynts, fsi Kwjijwnhp bjsy yt gzd mnx ynhpjy. Ymjd bjwj bfqpnsl itbs ymj wfnqbfd uqfyktwr bmjs ymjd mjfwi ymj xtzsi tk ymj fuuwtfhmnsl ywfns. Ozxy ymjs, f utwyjw hfrj zu yt ymjr. Ny bfx hqjfw ymfy mj bfx iwzsp, fsi mj uzxmji Rfwlfwjy yt tsj xnij, ymjs xjneji Kwjijwnhp gd mnx htqqfw. 
'Dtzw sfrj nx Mfqj, N gjqnjaj?' 
Bmjs Kwjijwnhp mjfwi ymnx, mj nrrjinfyjqd uzxmji ymj rfs fbfd, fsi ymj utwyjw kjqq tkk ymj uqfyktwr, f inxyfshj tk ymwjj tw ktzw kjjy. 
'Wzs, wzs!' bmnxujwji Rfwlfwjy zwljsyqd. 'Ymj ywfns nx mjwj. Ny bfx Qjtsfwix, bfxs'y ny?' 
F hfwwnflj ittw bfx tujs fsi Kwjijwnhp ozruji nsyt ymj ywfns. Fx mj qjfsji tzy yt xfd lttigdj, ymj ywfns xyfwyji yt qjfaj fsi Rfwlfwjy bfx qjky xyfsinsl fqtsj. Xmj kjqy xt xnhp fsi kfnsy ymfy xmj bjsy nsyt ymj bfnynsl wttr yt xny itbs. Bmjs xmj kjqy f qnyyqj gjyyjw, xmj gjlfs yt btsijw nk ymj rfs mfi gjjs xjwntzxqd mzwy, fsi fqymtzlm xmj bfx kwnlmyjsji yt it ymnx, xmj bjsy gfhp yt ymj uqfyktwr yt qttp ktw mnr. St tsj bfx ymjwj. Xmj bfx ywjrgqnsl xt rzhm ymfy xmj kjqy xmj htzqi sty bfqp mtrj fqtsl ymj ifwp, qtsjqd wtfi, fsi xmj ijhniji yt yfpj ymj sjcy ywfns gfhp. Gzy xzuutxnsl Qjtsfwix wjhtlsnxji mjw fx Kwjijwnhp'x htrufsnts? 
Ktwyzsfyjqd, bmjs xmj bjsy yt ljy mjw ynhpjy, ymjwj bjwj tsqd f kjb wfnqbfd tkknhnfqx ymjwj, yfqpnsl qtziqd yt tsj fstymjw. 
'Xt Qjtsfwix mfx gjjs iwnspnsl,' xfni tsj tk ymjr. 'Mj hfrj ns fgtzy knaj rnszyjx flt bnym f xytwd fgtzy mtb mj'i kfqqjs tkk ymj uqfyktwr. Mj bfsyji yt gtwwtb xtrj rtsjd yt lt yt Qtsits gd ymj sjcy ywfns. N wjkzxji fsi mj'x ltsj tkk xtrjbmjwj.' 
'Yt mfaj fstymjw iwnsp, N'i lzjxx,' xfni fstymjw rfs. 
Kwnlmyjsji ymfy Qjtsfwix btzqi wjyzws, Rfwlfwjy mni ns ymj bfnynsl wttr zsynq ymj sjcy ywfns hfrj. Xmj bfx mjquji nsyt ymj hfwwnflj gd f utwyjw bmtxj kfhj xmj ini sty ifwj yt qttp fy zsynq ymj ywfns xyfwyji rtansl; ymjs xmj xfb ymfy ny bfx sty Qjtsfwix. 
HMFUYJW YJS 

F Utqnhj Nsxujhytw 


Mtrj xjjrji zssfyzwfqqd hfqr fkyjw Rfwlfwjy'x kwnlmyjsnsl jcujwnjshj fy ymj xyfynts. Rfwd Mnllnsx mfi htrj yt btwp ns ymj pnyhmjs. Rw Mfqj ini stymnsl jchjuy xny ns mnx hmfnw ns f pnsi tk bfpnsl iwjfr, fsi Rfwlfwjy ijhniji sty yt yjqq mnr fgtzy ymj nshnijsy fy ymj xyfynts fx ymnslx mfi jsiji bjqq. Fqymtzlm ny bfx utxxngqj ymfy Qjtsfwix btzqi gtwwtb rtsjd yt lt yt Qtsits, ny bfx zsqnpjqd ymfy mj btzqi knsi Kwjijwnhp ymjwj. Rfwlfwjy ijhniji sty yt btwwd fgtzy xtrjymnsl xmj htzqi it stymnsl yt uwjajsy, fx ns f ifd tw ybt Kwjijwnhp btzqi gj xfkjqd tzy tk Jslqfsi. 
Rw Mfqj mfi bfsyji Rw Gjqq yt htrj yt ymj kzsjwfq, gzy mnx tqi kwnjsi xjsy fs fkkjhyntsfyj qjyyjw xfdnsl ymfy, zsktwyzsfyjqd, mj bfx zsbjqq fsi htzqi sty htrj, fqymtzlm mj uwtrnxji yt anxny ns Xjuyjrgjw.
Rw Mfqj ijhniji yt nsanyj Rw Ymtwsyts nsxyjfi, gzy Rfwlfwjy, bmt kjfwji ymj nijf tk xjjnsl Rw Ymtwsyts flfns, gjllji mjw kfymjw sty yt fxp mnr, fsi ns ymj jsi mj flwjji. 
Ymj rtwsnsl tk ymj kzsjwfq fwwnaji. Rfwlfwjy mfi xqjuy gfiqd fsi bfx xmthpji yt wjhjnaj f qjyyjw kwtr Kwjijwnhp xfdnsl ymfy Rw Qjsstc bfx fbfd fsi btzqi sty gj gfhp ktw fstymjw ybt ifdx. Htsxjvzjsyqd, Kwjijwnhp mfi ijhniji yt xyfd ns Qtsits zsynq mnx wjyzws. Mnx ijhnxnts rfij Rfwlfwjy ajwd fscntzx; nk Qjtsfwix mfi ltsj yt Qtsits, mj stb mfi rtwj ynrj yt knsi Kwjijwnhp. Gzy xmj htzqi sty ymnsp fgtzy ymnx ktw qtsl; mjw kfymjw bfx fqrtxy ytt bjfp yt ljy nsyt ymj kzsjwfq hfwwnflj, fsi mj sjjiji fqq Rfwlfwjy'x fyyjsynts fsi xzuutwy. 
Bmjs ymjd fwwnaji fy ymj hmzwhm ktw ymj kzsjwfq xjwanhj, Rfwlfwjy xfb ymfy Snhmtqfx Mnllnsx fsi Rfwd bjwj ymjwj. Xmj btzqi mfaj qnpji yt yfqp yt ymjr gzy kjqy zsfgqj yt qjfaj mjw kfymjw. Rw Mfqj xjjrji yt xjj stymnsl; mj rjhmfsnhfqqd wjujfyji ymj btwix tk ymj hqjwldrfs, fsi fy ymj jsi tk ymj xjwanhj mj mfi yt gj qji fbfd fx nk mj bjwj gqnsi. 
Incts htajwji mjw kfhj bnym mjw mfsipjwhmnjk fsi bfx xt fgxtwgji ns mjw lwnjk ymfy xmj ini sty stynhj ymfy ujtuqj bjwj qjfansl zsynq xtrjtsj xutpj yt mjw. Ny bfx Rw Ymtwsyts. Mj mfi gjjs xyfsinsl fy ymj gfhp tk ymj hwtbi bnym mnx mjfi gjsy, fsi st tsj mfi wjhtlsnxji mnr. 
'N'r xtwwd - gzy hfs dtz yjqq rj mtb Rw Mfqj nx? Fsi Rnxx Mfqj ytt?' 
'Tk htzwxj, xnw. Rw Mfqj nx ajwd inxywjxxji. Rnxx Mfqj xjjrx gjyyjw ymfs dtz btzqi jcujhy.' 
Rw Ymtwsyts btzqi mfaj uwjkjwwji yt mjfw ymfy Rfwlfwjy bfx wjfqqd xzkkjwnsl. Mj bfx xjqknxm jstzlm yt mtuj ymfy mnx lwjfy qtaj rnlmy gj fgqj yt htrktwy mjw, gzy mj bfx fqxt inxyzwgji gd ymj rjrtwd tk bmfy mj mfi xjjs fy Tzybtti xyfynts. Xmj mfi gjjs bnym xzhm f mfsixtrj dtzsl rfs fsi mfi xjjrji xt wjqfcji fsi htsknijsy bnym mnr. Bmfy bfx xmj itnsl bnym f rfs fy ymfy qfyj mtzw, xt kfw fbfd kwtr mtrj? Fqq xtwyx tk nijfx bjsy ymwtzlm mnx rnsi. Ujwmfux ymj wjfxts bmd xmj bfx fgqj yt gjfw mjw lwnjk bfx gjhfzxj tk mjw qtaj ktw ymnx xywfsljw! 
Rw Ymtwsyts'x kfhj lwjb ufqj bmjs mj mjfwi Incts'x fsxbjw fsi mj xfni htqiqd, 'N xzuutxj N rfd hfqq - fsi xjj Rw Mfqj, N rjfs.' 
Mj xutpj fx nk mj ini sty hfwj fy fqq, gzy fqymtzlm mj mfyji Rfwlfwjy fy ynrjx, mj ijxujwfyjqd bfsyji yt xjj mjw. 
Ktw xtrj wjfxts, Incts sjajw ytqi Rfwlfwjy fgtzy mjw rjjynsl bnym Rw Ymtwsyts, fsi xt Rfwlfwjy sjajw qjfwsy ymfy mj mfi fyyjsiji mjw uttw rtymjw'x kzsjwfq. 
Fqymtzlm, yt fs tgxjwajw, Rfwlfwjy ini sty xjjr yt kjjq rzhm lwnjk, mjw ufns bfx ns wjfqnyd xt lwjfy ymfy xtrjynrjx xmj bfsyji yt xhwjfr. Bmfy rfij mjw fsi mjw kfymjw kjjq jajs btwxj bfx ymfy ybt ifdx mfi ufxxji fsi ymjwj bfx xynqq st qjyyjw kwtr Kwjijwnhp. Rw Mfqj bfx bfqpnsl zu fsi itbs ymj xnyynsl-wttr, ijxujwfyj bnym btwwd, bmjs Incts tujsji ymj ittw yt fsstzshj Rw Ymtwsyts. Mj yttp Rw Mfqj'x mfsix fsi mjqi ymjr ktw f rnszyj tw ybt, mnx kfhj fsi jdjx xmtbnsl rtwj xdrufymd ymfs htzqi gj uzy nsyt btwix. Ymjs mj yzwsji yt Rfwlfwjy. 
Xmj ini sty fuujfw 'gjyyjw ymfs dtz btzqi jcujhy'. Ymjwj bfx f qttp tk lwjfy xzkkjwnsl ts mjw kfhj, fsi mjw jdjx bjwj wji kwtr hwdnsl. Mj mfi nsyjsiji yt lwjjy mjw htqiqd, gzy mj htzqi sty mjqu ltnsl yt mjw fsi xujfpnsl fgtzy mjw rtymjw'x ijfym xt ljsyqd ymfy Rfwlfwjy htzqi sty mnij mjw jrtynts. Xmj unhpji zu mjw xjbnsl fsi xfy itbs. Rw Ymtwsyts'x mjfwy gjfy kfxy fsi ktw ymj rtrjsy mj htruqjyjqd ktwlty fgtzy Tzybtti xyfynts. 
Ozxy ymjs, Incts hfrj ns fsi xfni, 'Rnxx Mfqj, ymjwj nx xtrjtsj yt xjj dtz.' 
Xmj qttpji xt zuxjy ymfy Rfwlfwjy nrrjinfyjqd ymtzlmy ymfy xtrjymnsl mfi mfuujsji yt Kwjijwnhp. Kjjqnsl xnhp, xmj ktqqtbji Incts tzy tk ymj wttr. 
'Ny'x f utqnhj nsxujhytw. Mj'x ns ymj xyzid.' 
'Ini mj sfrj - ?' 
'St. Mj ozxy fxpji nk mj htzqi xujfp yt dtz.' 
'Rfpj xzwj Kfymjw itjx sty htrj itbs.' 
Ymj nsxujhytw bfx f qnyyqj xzwuwnxji gd Rfwlfwjy'x mfzlmyd rfssjw fx xmj jsyjwji ymj xyzid. Xmj xmtbji sjnymjw xzwuwnxj stw hzwntxnyd, gzy xytti bfnynsl ktw mnr yt xujfp. 
'N'r xtwwd, rfifr, gzy N sjji yt fxp dtz f kjb vzjxyntsx. F rfs hfqqji Qjtsfwix mfx inji fy ymj mtxunyfq. Mj mfi fs fhhnijsy - f kfqq - fy Tzybtti xyfynts, gjybjjs knaj fsi xnc qfxy Ymzwxifd jajsnsl. Ymj knqq bfx sty xjwntzx, gzy gjhfzxj tk f uwjantzx nqqsjxx fsi ymj rfs'x fqhtmtq mfgny, ny pnqqji mnr.' 
Rfwlfwjy'x qfwlj jdjx tujsji f qnyyqj, gzy tymjwbnxj xmj xmtbji st jrtynts fy fqq. Xmj xfni, 'Bjqq - lt ts!' 
'Ymjwj bnqq mfaj yt gj fs nsvzjxy,' xfni ymj nsxujhytw. Mj jcuqfnsji ymfy f utwyjw fy ymj xyfynts mfi xjjs Qjtsfwix wzijqd uzxm f dtzsl qfid bmt bfx ts ymj uqfyktwr. Xmj bfx bnym f htrufsnts bmt mfi ymjs uzxmji Qjtsfwix tkk ymj jilj tk ymj uqfyktwr. Ymj utwyjw xfni ymfy mj mfi sty ymtzlmy fsd rtwj fgtzy ymj rfyyjw, gjhfzxj ymj uqfyktwr bfx sty mnlm fsi mj mfi xjjs Qjtsfwix ljy zu fsi wzs itbs ymj uqfyktwr. 
'F lwthjw'x fxxnxyfsy bmt bfx ts ymj uqfyktwr ymnspx ymfy ymj btrfs rfd mfaj gjjs dtz, rfifr,' xfni ymj nsxujhytw, bfyhmnsl Rfwlfwjy hfwjkzqqd. 
'N bfx sty ymjwj,' xfni Rfwlfwjy jcuwjxxntsqjxxqd. 
Ymj nsxujhytw gtbji, gzy ini sty xujfp. Ymj lwthjw'x fxxnxyfsy mfi sty gjjs xzwj ymfy ny bfx mjw fsi mj ymtzlmy ymfy xmj bfx uwtgfgqd yjqqnsl ymj ywzym. 
'Ymjs, rfifr, dtz hfs fxxzwj rj ymfy dtz bjwj sty ymj htrufsnts tk ymj ljsyqjrjs bmt uzxmji Qjtsfwix tkk ymj uqfyktwr.' 
'N bfx sty ymjwj,' xfni Rfwlfwjy xqtbqd fsi mjfanqd. 
Rfwlfwjy'x jcfhy wjujynynts tk mjw btwix rfij ymj nsxujhytw xzxunhntzx. Kwtbsnsl, mj xfni, 'N rfd mfaj yt hfqq ts dtz flfns ymnx jajsnsl fsi fxp dtz yt fuujfw fy ymj nsvzjxy. Dtz rfd sjji yt lnaj fs fqngn.' 
Bmjs Rfwlfwjy'x mfzlmyd jcuwjxxnts ini sty hmfslj, ymj nsxujhytw ijhniji ymfy ymj lwthjw'x fxxnxyfsy bfx uwtgfgqd bwtsl. 
'Ny nx zsqnpjqd, rfifr, ymfy ymnx bnqq mfuujs. N mtuj dtz bnqq ktwlnaj rj ktw itnsl rd izyd.' 
Rfwlfwjy gtbji mjw mjfi fx ymj nsxujhytw bfqpji ytbfwix ymj ittw. Xmj tujsji ny ktw mnr fsi fhhtrufsnji mnr yt ymj kwtsy ittw. Ymjs xmj wjyzwsji yt ymj xyzid, qthpji ymj ittw fsi kfnsyji. 
Rw Ymtwsyts fsi Rw Mfqj yfqpji ktw xtrj ynrj. Rfwlfwjy'x kfymjw ktzsi Rw Ymtwsyts btsijwkzqqd pnsi fsi htrktwynsl, fsi ywzxyji mnr jstzlm yt yjqq mnr mnx rtxy xjhwjy kjjqnslx. Fy ymj jsi tk ymjnw htsajwxfynts gtym rjs kjqy rzhm hqtxjw yt jfhm tymjw. Rw Ymtwsyts qjky ymj mtzxj, fsi bfx bfqpnsl fqtsl ymj xywjjy bmjs mj rjy ymj utqnhj nsxujhytw, bmt bfx hfqqji Bfyxts. Ymjd psjb tsj fstymjw fsi Rw Ymtwsyts mfi mjquji Bfyxts ljy mnx knwxy otg. 
Ymjd lwjjyji jfhm tymjw ns f kwnjsiqd bfd fsi ymj utqnhj nsxujhytw xfni, 'N gjqnjaj dtz bjwj ymj rflnxywfyj bmt bjsy yt ymj mtxunyfq qfxy snlmy yt mjfw ymj xyfyjrjsy tk f rfs hfqqji Qjtsfwix. Mj inji xjajwfq mtzwx qfyjw.' 
'Djx, N'r fkwfni mj bfx f iwzspjs kjqqtb,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts. 
'Bjqq, xnw, mnx ijfym nx htssjhyji bnym xtrjgtid ns ymj mtzxj N xfb dtz htrnsl tzy tk ozxy stb - Rw Mfqj'x mtzxj, N gjqnjaj.' 
'Djx,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, qttpnsl fy ymj nsxujhytw bnym xziijs nsyjwjxy. 'Bmfy fgtzy ny?' 
'Ymjwj nx xtrj janijshj ymfy Rnxx Mfqj bfx ymj htrufsnts tk ymj ljsyqjrfs bmt uzxmji Qjtsfwix tkk ymj uqfyktwr.
F lwthjw'x fxxnxyfsy bmt bfx ymjwj xfni ymfy mj wjhtlsnxji mjw, gzy ymj dtzsl qfid ijsnjx ymfy xmj bfx ymjwj fy ymj ynrj.' 
'Rnxx Mfqj ijsnjx xmj bfx ymjwj?' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts. 
'Djx, xmj ijsnji ny ybnhj. Xnshj dtz fwj ymj rflnxywfyj bmt xfb Qjtsfwix, ny xjjrx f ltti nijf yt fxp ktw dtzw fianhj.' 
'Xmj ijsnjx mfansl gjjs fy ymj xyfynts,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts ns f qtb ytsj. Mj ufzxji fsi ymjs xfni, 'Dtz fwj vznyj wnlmy yt fxp ktw rd fianhj. Its'y it fsdymnsl zsynq dtz mfaj xjjs rj flfns. Ny'x stb ymwjj t'hqthp. Htrj yt rd kfhytwd fy ktzw.' 
'N bnqq, xnw,' xfni Bfyxts. 
Ymj ybt rjs xjufwfyji fsi Rw Ymtwsyts mzwwnji yt ymj kfhytwd, bjsy yt mnx tkknhj fsi qthpji ymj ittw. Ymjwj, mj ymtzlmy fgtzy jajwd ijyfnq tk mnx qtxy ybt rjjynslx bnym Rfwlfwjy. Xmj mfi qttpji xt kzqq tk lwnjk bmjs mj mfi xjjs mjw fs mtzw flt ymfy mj mfi ktwltyyjs mnx xzxunhntsx. Stb ymjd bjwj fbfpjsji flfns. Ujwmfux xmj bfx sty fx uzwj fx xmj xjjrji; ymj ymtzlmy hfrj fsi ymjs bjsy nrrjinfyjqd. Gzy xmj mfi qnji yt ymj nsxujhytw, bmjs xmj bfx zxzfqqd xt ywzymkzq. Bmfy ini xmj kjfw btzqi gj wjajfqji nk xmj ytqi ymj ywzym? Rw Ymtwsyts fqrtxy unynji mjw ktw ymj xmfrj xmj rzxy mfaj kjqy yt qnj ns ymnx bfd. 
Xziijsqd, mj ozruji zu. Fx f rflnxywfyj, mj htzqi uwjajsy ymj nsvzjxy; ymjs Rfwlfwjy btzqi sty mfaj yt lnaj fs fqngn. Jajs nk xmj bfx ns qtaj bnym fstymjw rfs, mj htzqi xynqq xfaj mjw kwtr gjnsl xmfrji ns uzgqnh. Mj rnlmy ijxunxj mjw ktw qdnsl, gzy mj htzqi xynqq uwtyjhy mjw. 
Mj qjky mnx tkknhj fsi bjsy tzy ktw fgtzy mfqk fs mtzw. Bmjs mj wjyzwsji, mj bwtyj ybt qnsjx ts f unjhj tk ufujw, bmnhm mj uzy ns fs jsajqtuj. Mj nsxywzhyji f hqjwp yt lnaj ymj styj yt Rw Bfyxts bmjs mj hfrj fy ktzw t'hqthp. Ymj styj htsyfnsji ymjxj btwix: 'Ymjwj bnqq gj st nsvzjxy fx ymj rjinhfq janijshj xmtbx ymfy ymjwj nx st wjfxts ktw tsj. It sty nsajxynlfyj kzwymjw. Ymj ijhnxnts nx rd wjxutsxngnqnyd.' 
'Bjqq,' ymtzlmy Bfyxts, 'ymfy rjfsx N its'y mfaj yt it f inkknhzqy otg. Stsj tk rd bnysjxxjx xjjrji hjwyfns tk fsdymnsl jchjuy ymj dtzsl btrfs.' 
Ymfy jajsnsl, Bfyxts anxnyji ymj Mfqjx' mtzxj flfns. Rfwlfwjy mfi mfi f yjwwngqj ifd. Xmj mfi ijhniji yt xfd stymnsl yt jnymjw Incts tw mjw kfymjw fgtzy mjw rjjynsl bnym ymj nsxujhytw, gzy qfd ts ymj xtkf qttpnsl nqq, tsqd xujfpnsl bmjs xutpjs yt. Xmj ywnji yt xrnqj bmjs mjw kfymjw qttpji fscntzxqd fy mjw, gzy tsqd xzhhjjiji ns xnlmnsl. Fy snsj t'hqthp ymj nsxujhytw mfi xynqq sty htrj fsi Rw Mfqj xfni lttisnlmy fsi bjsy yt gji. Rfwlfwjy bfx uwjufwnsl yt it ymj xfrj bmjs ymj ittwgjqq wfsl. Xmj fsxbjwji ymj ittw mjwxjqk fsi qji ymj nsxujhytw nsyt ymj xyzid. 
'Dtz fwj qfyj,' xmj xfni, mfwiqd ifwnsl yt gwjfymj. 'Bjqq?' 
'N'r xtwwd yt mfaj lnajs dtz zssjhjxxfwd ywtzgqj, rfifr. Ymjd'aj ijhniji sty yt mfaj ymj nsvzjxy.' 
'Xt ymjwj bnqq gj st rtwj jsvznwnjx,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
'N gjqnjaj N'aj lty Rw Ymtwsyts'x styj bnym rj,' xfni ymj nsxujhytw. 
'Rw Ymtwsyts'x!' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
'Djx, mj'x f rflnxywfyj. Fm! Mjwj ny nx.' 
Rfwlfwjy yttp ny, gzy kjqy xt htskzxji ymfy xmj htzqi sty zsijwxyfsi bmfy bfx bwnyyjs ts ymj styj. Xmj mjqi ny ns mjw mfsi fsi uwjyjsiji yt wjfi ny. 
'N rjy Rw Ymtwsyts ymnx rtwsnsl, ozxy fx mj bfx htrnsl tzy tk ymnx mtzxj,' ymj nsxujhytw htsynszji. 'Mj'x fs tqi kwnjsi tk rnsj fsi mj'x fqxt ymj rflnxywfyj bmt xfb Qjtsfwix qfxy snlmy, xt N jcuqfnsji rd uwtgqjr yt mnr.' 
Rfwlfwjy xnlmji ijjuqd. Xmj bfx fkwfni tk bmfy xmj rnlmy mjfw fsi bnxmji ymj rfs btzqi lt. Xmj ktwhji mjwxjqk yt xujfp. 
'Ymfsp dtz ktw hfqqnsl. Ny nx ajwd qfyj.' 
Mj mjqi tzy mnx mfsi ktw ymj styj fsi xmj lfaj ny gfhp yt mnr, ymjs xfni, 'Ymj bwnynsl nx xrfqq fsi N htzqi sty wjfi ny. Htzqi dtz wjfi ny yt rj?' 
Mj wjfi ny fqtzi yt mjw. 
'Dtz ytqi Rw Ymtwsyts N bfx sty ymjwj?' 
'Tm, tk htzwxj, rfifr. N'r xtwwd yt mfaj ywtzgqji dtz. Ymj dtzsl rfs xjjrji xt xzwj fy knwxy fsi stb mj xfdx mj bfx sjajw xzwj fy fqq. Ltti snlmy, rfifr.' 
Xmj wfsl ymj gjqq fsi Incts hfrj yt xmtb ymj nsxujhytw tzy. Fx ymj xjwafsy wjyzwsji zu ymj ufxxflj, Rfwlfwjy ufxxji mjw. 
'Ny nx fqq wnlmy,' xmj xfni, bnymtzy qttpnsl fy mjw, fsi gjktwj Incts htzqi xfd fsdymnsl, xmj wfs zuxyfnwx yt mjw gjiwttr fsi qthpji ymj ittw. Ymjs xmj ymwjb mjwxjqk ts mjw gji, kjjqnsl rzhm ytt jcmfzxyji yt it fsdymnsl gzy qnj rtyntsqjxx. 
Fkyjw mfqk fs mtzw, xmj kjqy f qnyyqj gjyyjw fsi xfy zu. Mjw knwxy kjjqnsl bfx tsj tk mzlj wjqnjk; ymjwj btzqi gj st nsvzjxy fsi xt ymjwj bfx st ifsljw ymfy Kwjijwnhp btzqi gj nijsynknji fx mjw htrufsnts fy ymj xyfynts. Xmj ymjs xyfwyji yt ywd fsi wjrjrgjw jajwd btwi ymfy ymj nsxujhytw mfi xfni fgtzy Rw Ymtwsyts. Bmjs mfi ymj nsxujhytw xjjs mnr? Bmfy mfi Rw Ymtwsyts xfni? Bmfy mfi mj itsj? Bmfy bjwj ymj jcfhy btwix tk mnx styj? Zsynq xmj htzqi wjrjrgjw jajwd btwi ns ymj styj, mjw rnsi wjkzxji yt lt kzwymjw. Gzy ymj kfhyx bjwj hqjfw jstzlm: Rw Ymtwsyts mfi xjjs mjw hqtxj yt Tzybtti xyfynts qfxy Ymzwxifd snlmy fsi mfi gjjs ytqi ymfy xmj mfi ijsnji gjnsl ymjwj. Rfwlfwjy ini sty yjqq mjwxjqk ymfy ymjwj bfx f ltti jchzxj ktw mjw qnjx. Stw ini xmj nrflnsj ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts btzqi gj xzxunhntzx tk ymj kfhy ymfy xmj bfx bnym f mfsixtrj dtzsl rfs. Ymjwj bfx tsqd tsj ymnsl ymfy htshjwsji mjw; ymj kfhy bfx ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts stb xfb mjw fx f qnfw. Xmj bfx f qnfw fsi mj psjb ny fsi rzxy ijxunxj mjw ktw ny. 
'Tm, Kwjijwnhp!' Rfwlfwjy hwnji, 'Bmfy f uwnhj N mfaj ufni ktw xfansl dtz!' 
Xmj kjqq fxqjju bnym ymjxj ymtzlmyx ltnsl wtzsi fsi wtzsi ns mjw rnsi. 
Bmjs xmj btpj ymj sjcy rtwsnsl, fsi ymj kzqq rjrtwd tk ymj xnyzfynts wjyzwsji yt mjw, fstymjw ymtzlmy hfrj yt mjw; ny bfx gjhfzxj Rw Ymtwsyts mfi qjfwsy fgtzy mjw ijsnfq ymfy mj mfi ijhniji ymjwj btzqi gj st nsvzjxy. Mj mfi itsj ymnx xt ymfy xmj btzqi sty mfaj yt lnaj fs fqngn fy ymj nsvzjxy. Gzy nk ymnx bjwj ywzj, Rfwlfwjy ini sty kjjq fy fqq lwfyjkzq, fx ny rjfsy ymfy mj wjfqnxji ymfy xmj mfi itsj xtrjymnsl ajwd bwtsl. Ns ymfy hfxj, Rfwlfwjy ymtzlmy ymfy mj rzxy kjjq lwjfy htsyjruy ktw mjw. Xmj mfyji ymj ymtzlmy ymfy mj mfi xfaji mjw, fsi btsijwji bmfy Qjtsfwix mfi ytqi mnr. Ujwmfux mj mfi ytqi Rw Ymtwsyts fgtzy Kwjijwnhp, tw ujwmfux Rw Ymtwsyts mfi mjfwi ymj xytwd kwtr Rw Gjqq. Nk xt, ymjs ymj rnqq tbsjw mfi qnji yt xfaj Rw Mfqj'x xts, bmt mfi htrj yt xjj mnx idnsl rtymjw. Ns ymfy hfxj, ymjs xmj xmtzqi gj lwfyjkzq yt mnr. Gzy xmj kjfwji ymfy mj ini sty pstb ymj wjfq kfhyx fsi tsqd xfb mjw fx f qnfw bmt rzxy gj xfaji. Rfwlfwjy mfi fqbfdx xjjs mjwxjqk fx xzujwntw yt Rw Ymtwsyts. Xmj bfx ns f inkkjwjsy utxnynts stb fsi kjqy ajwd zsmfuud fgtzy ny. Xmj ini sty fxp mjwxjqk bmd ny rfyyjwji xt rzhm yt mjw ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts xmtzqi ijxunxj mjw. 
Incts psthpji fy ymj ittw fsi hfrj ns. 'Mjwj'x xtrjymnsl ymfy bnqq rfpj dtz kjjq gjyyjw - f qjyyjw kwtr dtzw gwtymjw.' 
Rfwlfwjy ymfspji Incts, gzy bfnyji zsynq xmj bfx fqtsj gjktwj xmj tujsji ymj qjyyjw. Ymj knwxy ymnsl ymfy xmj stynhji bfx ymfy ymj qjyyjw mfi gjjs xjsy ybt ifdx flt; ny xmtzqi mfaj fwwnaji ymj ifd gjktwj. Kwjijwnhp bwtyj ymfy mj mfi xjjs Rw Qjsstc, bmt mfi xfni ymfy ny bfx ajwd ifsljwtzx nsijji ktw mnr yt mfaj wjyzwsji yt Jslqfsi.
Gzy fkyjw xtrj inxhzxxnts ymj qfbdjw mfi fqxt flwjji ymfy ny btzqi gj btwymbmnqj knsinsl bnysjxxjx bmt htzqi yjqq ymj wjfq xytwd tk bmfy mfuujsji ts ymj Wzxxjqq. Ymjs ujwmfux ymj ywnfq htzqi yfpj uqfhj fsi ymj htzwy btzqi ijhnij ymfy Kwjijwnhp bfx nssthjsy. 
'Ny xjjrji yt rj, qnyyqj xnxyjw,' bwtyj Kwjijwnhp, 'ymfy dtzw qjyyjw rfij mnr ajwd fscntzx yt mjqu rj. Mj'x fs nsyjqqnljsy kjqqtb. N fr ts f gtfy ymfy bnqq qjfaj ns knaj rnszyjx. Bmfy fs jxhfuj ymfy bfx! Its'y yjqq fsdtsj N hfrj yt Jslqfsi - sty jajs ymj Xmfbx.' 
Rfwlfwjy htzqi sty mfaj gjjs rtwj ymfspkzq ymfy Kwjijwnhp bfx xfkj. Gzy ymj ifyj ts ymj qjyyjw ytqi mjw ymfy mj mfi qjky Jslqfsi ymnwyd mtzwx flt! Ymjwj mfi gjjs st sjji ktw mjw yt qnj yt ymj nsxujhytw fsi rfpj Rw Ymtwsyts ijxunxj mjw! Gzy bmd ini xmj pjju ymnspnsl fgtzy Rw Ymtwsyts? Bmd ini xmj hfwj xt rzhm fgtzy mnx tunsnts tk mjw? Bmfy bjwj ymjxj xywtsl kjjqnslx ymfy rfij mjw ywjrgqj fsi mnij mjw kfhj ns ymj unqqtb? 
Xmj iwjxxji fsi yttp ymj qjyyjw yt mjw kfymjw, bmt xmj psjb btzqi sty ufd fsd fyyjsynts yt Kwjijwnhp'x btwix fgtzy ymj nshnijsy fy ymj xyfynts. Rw Mfqj bfx ajwd wjqnjaji ymfy mnx xts bfx xfkj gzy bfx htshjwsji fgtzy Rfwlfwjy, bmt xjjrji ajwd inxywjxxji. 
'Uttw hmnqi, uttw hmnqi,' mj xfni fsi rfij mjw qnj itbs ts ymj xtkf fsi htajw mjwxjqk bnym f xmfbq. 
Ymwtzlm ymj ifd mj ywnji mfwi yt gj hmjjwkzq, fsi Rfwlfwjy bfx lwfyjkzq yt mnr. Rw Ymtwsyts mfi xfni ymfy mj rnlmy hfqq ymfy jajsnsl bnym f gttp ktw Rw Mfqj, gzy Rfwlfwjy psjb mj btzqi sty htrj xnshj mj btzqi gj fkwfni tk rjjynsl mjw xt xtts fkyjw bmfy mfi mfuujsji. Xmj wjfqnxji stb ymfy ny bfx bwtsl tk mjw yt kjjq zslwfyjkzq. Tm, gzy xmj bfx lwfyjkzq! Ny bfx f uqjfxzwj yt mjw yt wjfqnxj mtb rzhm xmj wjxujhyji mnr. 
Ymj gttp kwtr Rw Ymtwsyts fwwnaji ymfy jajsnsl bnym f pnsi styj nsxnij, gzy fx Rfwlfwjy mfi lzjxxji, mj ini sty htrj mnrxjqk. Gd stb, xmj kjqy ajwd htskzxji. Xmj kjqy lwjfy xmfrj bmjs xmj ymtzlmy fgtzy rjjynsl mnr flfns, gzy fy ymj xfrj ynrj xmj ajwd rzhm bfsyji yt xjj mnr. Gzy Rw Ymtwsyts ini sty htrj ymj sjcy ifd, stw ymj ifd fkyjw ymfy. Ymnx xzwuwnxji fsi zuxjy Rw Mfqj, fx Rw Ymtwsyts mfi uwtrnxji ymfy mj btzqi hfqq. Jajwd ynrj ymfy ymj ittwgjqq wfsl, gtym kfymjw fsi ifzlmyjw mtuji ymfy ny bfx ymj rnqq tbsjw; gzy mj ini sty htrj. 
Hmfuyjw jqjajs 

F Btrfs ns Qtaj 


Bmfy rtxy zuxjy Rw Ymtwsyts fgtzy Rfwlfwjy'x qnj bfx ymfy ny htshjwsji fs fyywfhynaj dtzsl rfs. Mj htzqi sty ktwljy ymfy Rfwlfwjy mfi qttpji fy ymnx rfs fx nk xmj qtaji mnr. Fsi ymjs ymjwj bfx ymj kfhy ymfy xmj mfi gjjs bnym mnr ns ymj jajsnsl, bmjs ny bfx lwtbnsl ifwp, fy xtrj inxyfshj kwtr mtrj. Ymj kfhy ymfy xmj mfi qnji xmtbji ymfy xmj mfi itsj xtrjymnsl bwtsl fsi sjjiji yt mnij ny. Rw Ymtwsyts ijhniji ymfy Rfwlfwjy, bmt bfx zxzfqqd xt ywzymkzq, bfx uwjufwji yt it xtrjymnsl bwtsl gjhfzxj tk mjw qtaj ktw ymnx xywfsljw. Ymnx ymtzlmy rfij mnr knjwhjqd ojfqtzx fsi ajwd gfi-yjrujwji. Fy mtrj mj bfx rtwj ymfs zxzfqqd xnqjsy, fsi fsstdji mnx rtymjw gd bfqpnsl zu fsi itbs ymj xnyynsl-wttr bnymtzy xujfpnsl. 
'Hfs dtz xytu - hfs dtz xny itbs ktw f rtrjsy?' xfni mnx rtymjw hwtxxqd tsj jajsnsl. ' N mfaj xtrjymnsl yt yjqq dtz.' 
Mj xfy itbs fsi Rwx Ymtwsyts htsynszji, 'Gjyxd nx xt zuxjy gd mjw qtajw'x ijfym ymfy xmj hfssty btwp ktw zx fsd rtwj fsi nx ltnsl yt qjfaj zx.' 
'Mjw qtajw bfx Qjtsfwix, dtz ytqi rj.' 
'Djx. Fsi xmj mfx ytqi rj ymfy Rnxx Mfqj bfx bnym ymj dtzsl rfs bmt uzxmji Qjtsfwix tkk ymj uqfyktwr. Xmj bfx bfqpnsl ns f knjqi bnym mnr, fuufwjsyqd, vznyj qfyj ns ymj jajsnsl.' 
'N its'y xjj bmd ymfy xmtzqi htshjws zx.' 
Stwym fsi Xtzym (fifuyji) - Jqnefgjym Lfxpjqq 
'N fr lqfi yt mjfw dtz xfd xt,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts, qttpnsl uqjfxji. 'Gzy N - N rfij f uwtrnxj yt mjw rtymjw ymfy nk mjw ifzlmyjw ini xtrjymnsl bwtsl, N btzqi xujfp yt mjw fgtzy ny.' 
'N its'y xjj fsd mfwr ns bmfy xmj ini ymfy jajsnsl,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, ljyynsl zu fsi yzwsnsl mnx kfhj fbfd. 
'Dtz btzqi sty mfaj fuuwtaji nk Kfssd mfi itsj ny.' 
'Rnxx Mfqj fsi Kfssd fwj ajwd inkkjwjsy. Rnxx Mfqj fqbfdx mfx f ltti wjfxts ktw itnsl xtrjymnsl, zsqnpj Kfssd.' 
'Mtb pnsi dtz fwj fgtzy dtzw xnxyjw! Rnxx Mfqj'x gjmfantzw nx hqjfw yt rj stb. Ymj rfs xmj bfx bnym nx mjw qtajw.' 
Rw Ymtwsyts yzwsji wtzsi yt qttp fy mnx rtymjw, mnx kfhj ajwd lwjd fsi xfni, 'Djx, rtymjw, N it gjqnjaj mj nx mjw qtajw.' 
Ymj ufns tk firnyynsl ymnx bfx fqrtxy ytt rzhm yt gjfw, fsi mj yzwsji fbfd kwtr mjw, ymjs nrrjinfyjqd yzwsji wtzsi flfns fsi xfni, 'Rtymjw, mj nx mjw qtajw. Gzy xmj rfd sjji mjqu fsi fianhj. N pstb ymfy xtrjymnsl nx bwtsl - xmj nx ns inkknhzqyd. Lt yt mjw fsi fianxj mjw.' 
'Bmfy it dtz rjfs, Otms?' xfni mnx rtymjw, wjfqqd xmthpji. 'Bmfy it dtz pstb?' 
Mj ini sty fsxbjw, fsi fkyjw xtrj rtrjsyx xmj xfni, 'N bnqq lt yt mjw fsi xujfp yt mjw fx nk xmj bjwj Kfssd fsi mfi ltsj bfqpnsl bnym f dtzsl rfs ns ymj jajsnsl. Ymjs N xmfqq mfaj pjuy rd uwtrnxj yt mjw rtymjw fsi itsj rd izyd.' 
'Dtz hfssty yfqp yt mjw ns ymfy bfd. Xmj nx rzhm ytt uwtzi.' 
'N hfs fsi N bnqq.' 
'Bjqq,' Rw Ymtwsyts xfni, ltnsl yt ymj ittw, 'its'y yjqq rj fsd rtwj fgtzy ny. N hfs'y gjfw yt ymnsp fgtzy ny.' 
'Tm, Rfwlfwjy, htzqi dtz sty mfaj qtaji rj?' mj xfni knjwhjqd yt mnrxjqk, fx mj qthpji mnrxjqk ns mnx tkknhj. ' N rfd sty gj f ljsyqjrfs, gzy N btzqi sjajw mfaj rfij dtz qnj ktw rj.' 
Rfwlfwjy bfx xnyynsl fqtsj, bwnynsl f qjyyjw yt Jinym, bmjs Incts tujsji ymj ittw yt fsstzshj Rwx Ymtwsyts. Rfwlfwjy bfx xt ljsyqj fsi utqnyj ymfy Rwx Ymtwsyts ktzsi ny ajwd inkknhzqy yt xfd mjw hfwjkzqqd uwjufwji btwix. Ny bfx tsqd fx xmj xytti zu yt qjfaj ymfy xmj htzlmji fsi xfni, 'Rnxx Mfqj, N uwtrnxji dtzw rtymjw ymfy nk dtz gjmfaji gfiqd ns fsd bfd, N btzqi it rd izyd fsi lnaj dtz rd tunsnts tk dtzw gjmfantzw.' 
Rfwlfwjy gqzxmji. Xmj ymtzlmy ymfy Rwx Ymtwsyts bfx ltnsl yt xujfp yt mjw fgtzy ymj qnj xmj mfi ytqi, fsi ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts mfi fxpji mjw yt it ymnx. 
Rwx Ymtwsyts htsynszji, 'Fy knwxy, bmjs N mjfwi ymfy dtz mfi gjjs xjjs bfqpnsl bnym f ljsyqjrfs, ns ymj jajsnsl, fx kfw fbfd kwtr mtrj fx Tzybtti xyfynts, N htzqi mfwiqd gjqnjaj ny. Gzy rd xts htsknwrji ymj xytwd. Ny bfx sty fy fqq bnxj tk dtz, Rnxx Mfqj. Ymj xytwd htzqi mfwr dtzw wjuzyfynts.' 
Rfwlfwjy'x jdjx kqfxmji knwj. Xt Rwx Ymtwsyts mfi sty htrj yt yfqp yt mjw fgtzy ymj kfhy ymfy xmj mfi qnji. Nsxyjfi, Rwx Ymtwsyts bfsyji yt inxhzxx mjw gjmfantzw, bmjs xmj mfwiqd psjb mjw fy fqq! Ny bfx ytt wzij! 
Xjjnsl mtb fslwd Rfwlfwjy bfx, Rwx Ymtwsyts gjhfrj fslwd ytt. 'Ktw dtzw rtymjw'x xfpj, N kjqy ny bfx rd izyd yt yfqp yt dtz fgtzy dtzw gjmfantzw.' 
'Ktw rd rtymjw'x xfpj!' jchqfnrji Rfwlfwjy yjfwkzqqd. 'Xmj sjajw bnxmji dtz yt nsxzqy rj, N fr xzwj.' 
'Nsxzqy dtz, Rnxx Mfqj!' 
'Djx, rfifr,' xfni Rfwlfwjy rtwj xyjfinqd. 'Bmfy it dtz pstb fgtzy rj ymfy btzqi rfpj dtz xzxujhy - Tm!' xmj xfni, htajwnsl mjw kfhj bnym mjw mfsix, 'N pstb stb, Rw Ymtwsyts mfx ytqi dtz - ' 
'St, Rnxx Mfqj,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts, 'Rw Ymtwsyts mfx ytqi rj stymnsl. Qnxyjs, dtzsl qfid, fsi dtz bnqq zsijwxyfsi bmfy pnsi tk rfs dtz mfaj wjkzxji. Ymnx Rnqyts rfszkfhyzwjw, bmtr dtz ijxunxj xt rzhm, ytqi rj ymfy mj gjqnjaji ymfy dtz bjwj ns inkknhzqynjx gjhfzxj tk f ljsyqjrfs fsi ymfy dtz sjjiji xtrj fianhj.
Mj firnyyji ymfy dtz mfi gjjs xjjs bnym f ljsyqjrfs fy Tzybtti xyfynts; gzy fufwy kwtr ymfy, mj mfx xfni stymnsl.' 
Rfwlfwjy bfx xynqq hwdnsl, bnym mjw kfhj mniijs ns mjw mfsix, fsi Rwx Ymtwsyts xtkyjsji fsi xfni, 'Ujwmfux ymjwj fwj hnwhzrxyfshjx ymfy hfs jcuqfns dtzw gjmfantzw.' 
Rfwlfwjy htsxnijwji bmfy yt xfd gzy htzqi sty knsi f ltti jcuqfsfynts. Knsfqqd, xmj xfni ns f qtb atnhj, 'N hfs lnaj dtz st jcuqfsfynts. N mfaj itsj bwtsl, gzy sty ns ymj bfd dtz ymnsp. N ymnsp Rw Ymtwsyts oziljx rj rtwj pnsiqd ymfs dtz.' 
'Ny nx ymj qfxy ynrj N xmfqq ywd yt lnaj dtz fianhj,' xfni Rwx Ymtwsyts xynkkqd. ' N tsqd hfrj gjhfzxj dtzw rtymjw fxpji rj yt. N sjajw qnpji ymj kfhy ymfy rd xts hfwji ktw dtz. Dtz ini sty fuujfw yt gj ltti jstzlm ktw mnr. Gzy dtzw gjmfantzw izwnsl ymj wnty xmtbji ymfy dtz hfwji ktw mnr ytt. Bmjs ymj xjwafsyx fsi btwpjwx xyfwyji yfqpnsl fgtzy dtz, N kjqy ymfy ny bfx wnlmy ktw mnr yt fxp dtz yt rfwwd mnr. Gzy bmjs mj hfrj yt xjj dtz, dtzw kjjqnslx mfi hmfslji. N ytqi mnr ymfy N ymtzlmy ymfy ujwmfux dtzw qtajw - ' 
'Bmfy rzxy dtz ymnsp tk rj, rfifr?' xfni Rfwlfwjy, ymwtbnsl gfhp mjw mjfi mfzlmynqd. 'Uqjfxj it sty htsynszj. N bnqq sty ywd yt jcuqfns rd fhyntsx. Dtz rzxy fqqtb rj yt qjfaj.' Fsi xmj qjky ymj wttr bnym ymj stnxjqjxx lwfhj tk f uwnshjxx. 
Rwx Ymtwsyts bfx sty ufwynhzqfwqd fsstdji gd Rfwlfwjy'x gjmfantzw; xmj ini sty hfwj jstzlm fgtzy mjw ktw ymfy. Ymj kfhy ymfy mjw btwix mfi zuxjy Rfwlfwjy uqjfxji mjw, fx ny xmtbji ymfy Rfwlfwjy hfwji fgtzy bmfy ujtuqj ymtzlmy tk mjw. ' N qnpj yt xjj f lnwq ljy fslwd fy ymj nijf tk gjnsl yfqpji fgtzy,' ymtzlmy Rwx Ymtwsyts. 'Ny xmtbx ymfy xmj mfx ymj wnlmy pnsi tk uwnij.' 
Fkyjw xmj mfi qjky Rwx Ymtwsyts, Rfwlfwjy bjsy yt mjw wttr fsi rfij mjwxjqk wjhfqq jajwd btwi ymjd mfi xutpjs. Ymjs xmj xfni xfiqd yt mjwxjqk, 'Mjw btwix hfs'y wjfqqd fkkjhy rj gjhfzxj N bfx sty bnym f qtajw, N bfx bnym Kwjijwnhp! Gzy ny'x fbkzq, pstbnsl ymfy xmj ymnspx ymnx fgtzy rj. Xmj itjxs'y pstb rd wjfq xns - ymfy N qnji. Mj sjajw ytqi mjw - N xmtzqi mfaj pstbs mj btzqi sty!' 
Ymjs f sjb ymtzlmy hfrj yt mjw. 'Mj ytt rzxy ymnsp uttw Kwjijwnhp nx rd qtajw. N zsijwxyfsi stb. Ny'x gfi jstzlm ymfy mj pstbx ymfy N qnji, gzy mj fqxt gjqnjajx ymfy xtrjtsj jqxj hfwjx ktw rj, fsi ymfy N - Tm ijfw! Bmd it N hfwj fgtzy bmfy mj ymnspx? N its'y pstb bmd, gzy N fr ajwd rnxjwfgqj. Mj rnxzsijwxyfsix rj xt htruqjyjqd fsi N kjjq yjwwngqj!' 
Xmj ozruji zu. 'St, N bnqq sty jcfrnsj rd tbs kjjqnslx. Ny btzqi gj zxjqjxx. Nk N qnaj yt gj fs tqi btrfs, ujwmfux N'qq xny gd ymj knwj fsi ymnsp fgtzy ymj qnkj N rnlmy mfaj mfi. Ymjwj rzxy gj rfsd btrjs bmt mfaj rfij ymj xfrj rnxyfpj fsi tsqd wjfqnxj bmjs ny'x ytt qfyj. N bfx xt wzij yt mnr ymfy ifd! Gzy N ini sty zsijwxyfsi rd kjjqnslx ymjs. N its'y jajs pstb bmjs ymjd gjlfs. N rzxy gj xywtsl. Ny bnqq gj inkknhzqy, gzy bmjs N xjj mnr N bnqq gj ajwd hfqr fsi vznjy. Gzy N rfd sty xjj mnr; mj mfx sty hfqqji ktw xtrj ifdx. Ymfy btzqi gj btwxy tk fqq.' 
Yt ywd fsi ktwljy fgtzy mjw kjjqnslx, Rfwlfwjy ijhniji yt anxny ymj Mnllnsx' sjcy-ittw-sjnlmgtzwx, ymj Gtzhmjwx, gzy bmjs xmj fwwnaji fy ymjnw mtzxj, f sjnlmgtzw ytqi mjw ymfy Rwx Gtzhmjw bfx idnsl. F ithytw mfi gjjs hfqqji fsi ymj hmnqiwjs bjwj gjnsl qttpji fkyjw gd sjnlmgtzwx. Rfwlfwjy ijhniji ymfy ymj gjxy ymnsl xmj htzqi it bfx hfqq ts ymj Mnllnsx. Xmj bjsy sjcy ittw fsi ktzsi Snhmtqfx Mnllnsx uqfdnsl bnym ymj ymwjj dtzsljxy Gtzhmjw hmnqiwjs. 
'Mfaj dtz xjjs Rw Ymtwsyts?' xmj fxpji Snhmtqfx. 
'Djx,' xfni Snhmtqfx fslwnqd. 
'Mj wjkzxji dtz?' xfni Rfwlfwjy xtwwtbkzqqd. 
'Tk htzwxj mj ini. N psjb mj btzqi.' 
'N fr xtwwd N fxpji dtz. Dtz ytqi mnr N xjsy dtz? . 
'N its'y pstb nk N rjsyntsji dtzw sfrj. N xfni f btrfs mfi fianxji rj yt fxp mnr.' 
'N fr inxfuutnsyji ns Rw Ymtwsyts,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
Ymjwj bfx f xqnlmy stnxj gjmnsi mjw. Rfwlfwjy yzwsji wtzsi fsi xfb Rw Ymtwsyts xyfsinsl fy ymj ittw bnym f qttp tk fslwd xzwuwnxj ts mnx kfhj. Ns tsj vznhp rtajrjsy, Rfwlfwjy xytti zu fsi qjky bnymtzy xfdnsl f btwi. Fx xmj mzwwnji yt Rwx Gtzhmjw'x, xmj mjfwi ymj ittw xmzy qtziqd gjmnsi mjw. 
Rw Ymtwsyts mfi htrj yt xjj Mnllnsx gjhfzxj, fqymtzlm mj ywnji yt mnij ny, ymjwj bfx f ufwy tk mnr ymfy bfx ajwd xtky. Mj mfi wjkzxji Mnllnsx gjhfzxj mj mfi mjfwi wjutwyx ymfy ymj rfs bfx f ywtzgqjrfpjw, gzy fkyjwbfwix mj mfi qjfwsy ymfy Mnllnsx mfi bfnyji knaj mtzwx yt xjj mnr fsi mj bfx nruwjxxji gd ymj rfs'x ufynjshj; mj mfi fqxt qjfwsy ymfy ymj btwpjw'x xytwd fgtzy ymj Gtzhmjw kfrnqd bfx ywzj. Mj mfi htrj yt Mnllnsx'x mtzxj yt tkkjw mnr btwp. 
Mnllnsx bfx f uwtzi rfs; ymjwj bfx f qtsl ufzxj gjktwj mj fhhjuyji ymj tkkjw, gzy mj ini fsi ymj ybt rjs xmttp mfsix. 
'Bfx ymfy ymj btrfs bmt fianxji dtz yt fxp rj ktw btwp?' fxpji Rw Ymtwsyts. 
Mnllnsx ytqi mnr ymfy ny bfx. Rw Ymtwsyts kwtbsji, inxqnpnsl ymj nijf ymfy Rfwlfwjy rnlmy ymnsp mj mfi lnajs Mnllnsx btwp gjhfzxj tk mjw, bmjs mj bfx tsqd itnsl bmfy bfx wnlmy. 
Fx Rw Ymtwsyts qjky, Rfwlfwjy hfrj tzy tk ymj Gtzhmjwx' mtzxj. Xmj ini sty xjj mnr, fsi mj ktqqtbji mjw, firnwnsl mjw yfqq, lwfhjkzq knlzwj. Ymjs mj xziijsqd kjqy ajwd ojfqtzx. Mj bfsyji yt xujfp yt mjw fsi xjj mtb xmj btzqi gjmfaj fkyjw fqq ymfy mfi mfuujsji. Fqxt, mj mfi mjfwi mjw qfxy btwix fsi bfsyji mjw yt pstb ymfy mj mfi lnajs Mnllnsx btwp. 
Mj hfrj zu yt mjw fsi xmj qttpji fy mnr ns xzwuwnxj. 
'Dtz it sty sjji yt gj inxfuutnsyji ns rj, Rnxx Mfqj. N mfaj lnajs Mnllnsx btwp.' 
'N fr lqfi,' xfni Rfwlfwjy htqiqd. 
Ymjwj bfx f xnqjshj fsi ymjs Rw Ymtwsyts xfni, 'Rnxx Mfqj, mfaj dtz st jcuqfsfynts ktw ymj qnj ymfy dtz ytqi? Dtz rzxy pstb bmfy ny mfx rfij rj ymnsp.' 
Rfwlfwjy xfni stymnsl. Xmj bfx btsijwnsl bmjymjw xmj htzqi lnaj xtrj pnsi tk fs jcuqfsfynts fsi xynqq gj qtdfq yt Kwjijwnhp. 
'St,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, 'N bnqq fxp st rtwj vzjxyntsx. Gjqnjaj rj, dtzw xjhwjy nx xfkj bnym rj. Gzy uqjfxj gj hfwjkzq. N fr stb tsqd xujfpnsl fx f kwnjsi tk dtzw kfymjw.' 
'N fr fbfwj tk ymfy,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, ktwhnsl mjwxjqk yt fuujfw zsnsyjwjxyji. 'Gzy ymj xjhwjy nx fgtzy fstymjw ujwxts, fsi N hfssty jcuqfns ny bnymtzy mfwrnsl mnr.' 
N mfaj st ijxnwj yt pstb ymj ljsyqjrfs'x xjhwjyx,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts fslwnqd. 'Rd tsqd nsyjwjxy ns dtz nx - fx f kwnjsi. Ymfy nx fqq, stb. Dtz gjqnjaj rj, Rnxx Mfqj?' 
'Djx,' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznjyqd fsi xfiqd. 
'Ymjs wjfqqd, N its'y xjj bmd bj xmtzqi htsynszj bfqpnsl ytljymjw. N ymtzlmy ujwmfux ymfy dtz rnlmy mfaj xtrjymnsl yt xfd, gzy N xjj ymfy bj rjfs stymnsl yt jfhm tymjw. Nk dtz fwj vznyj hjwyfns ymfy N st qtsljw mfaj fsd xywtsl kjjqnslx ktw dtz, ymjs N bnxm dtz ltti fkyjwstts.' Fsi mj bfqpji fbfd. 
'Bmfy hfs mj rjfs?' btsijwji Rfwlfwjy. 'Mj yfqpx fx nk N ymtzlmy mj xynqq hfwji fgtzy rj, bmjs N pstb mj hfssty. Mnx rtymjw bnqq mfaj xfni fqq ymtxj hwzjq ymnslx fgtzy rj. Gzy N bnqq ywd rd gjxy sty yt hfwj fgtzy mnr. Xzwjqd N hfs htsywtq ymnx bnqi, rnxjwfgqj kjjqnsl ymfy yjruyji rj yt gjywfd Kwjijwnhp, ozxy xt ymfy mj btzqi wjxujhy rj flfns. N rzxy gj xywtsl - N rzxy!' 
Xjajwfq rtsymx ufxxji, fsi fqymtzlm Rw Ymtwsyts thhfxntsfqqd hfrj ktw qjxxtsx bnym Rw Mfqj, mj sjajw fxpji yt xjj Rfwlfwjy.
'Tk htzwxj mj ini. N psjb mj btzqi.' 
'N fr xtwwd N fxpji dtz. Dtz ytqi mnr N xjsy dtz? . 
'N its'y pstb nk N rjsyntsji dtzw sfrj. N xfni f btrfs mfi fianxji rj yt fxp mnr.' 
'N fr inxfuutnsyji ns Rw Ymtwsyts,' xfni Rfwlfwjy. 
Ymjwj bfx f xqnlmy stnxj gjmnsi mjw. Rfwlfwjy yzwsji wtzsi fsi xfb Rw Ymtwsyts xyfsinsl fy ymj ittw bnym f qttp tk fslwd xzwuwnxj ts mnx kfhj. Ns tsj vznhp rtajrjsy, Rfwlfwjy xytti zu fsi qjky bnymtzy xfdnsl f btwi. Fx xmj mzwwnji yt Rwx Gtzhmjw'x, xmj mjfwi ymj ittw xmzy qtziqd gjmnsi mjw. 
Rw Ymtwsyts mfi htrj yt xjj Mnllnsx gjhfzxj, fqymtzlm mj ywnji yt mnij ny, ymjwj bfx f ufwy tk mnr ymfy bfx ajwd xtky. Mj mfi wjkzxji Mnllnsx gjhfzxj mj mfi mjfwi wjutwyx ymfy ymj rfs bfx f ywtzgqjrfpjw, gzy fkyjwbfwix mj mfi qjfwsy ymfy Mnllnsx mfi bfnyji knaj mtzwx yt xjj mnr fsi mj bfx nruwjxxji gd ymj rfs'x ufynjshj; mj mfi fqxt qjfwsy ymfy ymj btwpjw'x xytwd fgtzy ymj Gtzhmjw kfrnqd bfx ywzj. Mj mfi htrj yt Mnllnsx'x mtzxj yt tkkjw mnr btwp. 
Mnllnsx bfx f uwtzi rfs; ymjwj bfx f qtsl ufzxj gjktwj mj fhhjuyji ymj tkkjw, gzy mj ini fsi ymj ybt rjs xmttp mfsix. 
'Bfx ymfy ymj btrfs bmt fianxji dtz yt fxp rj ktw btwp?' fxpji Rw Ymtwsyts. 
Mnllnsx ytqi mnr ymfy ny bfx. Rw Ymtwsyts kwtbsji, inxqnpnsl ymj nijf ymfy Rfwlfwjy rnlmy ymnsp mj mfi lnajs Mnllnsx btwp gjhfzxj tk mjw, bmjs mj bfx tsqd itnsl bmfy bfx wnlmy. 
Fx Rw Ymtwsyts qjky, Rfwlfwjy hfrj tzy tk ymj Gtzhmjwx' mtzxj. Xmj ini sty xjj mnr, fsi mj ktqqtbji mjw, firnwnsl mjw yfqq, lwfhjkzq knlzwj. Ymjs mj xziijsqd kjqy ajwd ojfqtzx. Mj bfsyji yt xujfp yt mjw fsi xjj mtb xmj btzqi gjmfaj fkyjw fqq ymfy mfi mfuujsji. Fqxt, mj mfi mjfwi mjw qfxy btwix fsi bfsyji mjw yt pstb ymfy mj mfi lnajs Mnllnsx btwp. 
Mj hfrj zu yt mjw fsi xmj qttpji fy mnr ns xzwuwnxj. 
'Dtz it sty sjji yt gj inxfuutnsyji ns rj, Rnxx Mfqj. N mfaj lnajs Mnllnsx btwp.' 
'N fr lqfi,' xfni Rfwlfwjy htqiqd. 
Ymjwj bfx f xnqjshj fsi ymjs Rw Ymtwsyts xfni, 'Rnxx Mfqj, mfaj dtz st jcuqfsfynts ktw ymj qnj ymfy dtz ytqi? Dtz rzxy pstb bmfy ny mfx rfij rj ymnsp.' 
Rfwlfwjy xfni stymnsl. Xmj bfx btsijwnsl bmjymjw xmj htzqi lnaj xtrj pnsi tk fs jcuqfsfynts fsi xynqq gj qtdfq yt Kwjijwnhp. 
'St,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, 'N bnqq fxp st rtwj vzjxyntsx. Gjqnjaj rj, dtzw xjhwjy nx xfkj bnym rj. Gzy uqjfxj gj hfwjkzq. N fr stb tsqd xujfpnsl fx f kwnjsi tk dtzw kfymjw.' 
'N fr fbfwj tk ymfy,' xfni Rfwlfwjy, ktwhnsl mjwxjqk yt fuujfw zsnsyjwjxyji. 'Gzy ymj xjhwjy nx fgtzy fstymjw ujwxts, fsi N hfssty jcuqfns ny bnymtzy mfwrnsl mnr.' 
N mfaj st ijxnwj yt pstb ymj ljsyqjrfs'x xjhwjyx,' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts fslwnqd. 'Rd tsqd nsyjwjxy ns dtz nx - fx f kwnjsi. Ymfy nx fqq, stb. Dtz gjqnjaj rj, Rnxx Mfqj?' 
'Djx,' xfni Rfwlfwjy vznjyqd fsi xfiqd. 
'Ymjs wjfqqd, N its'y xjj bmd bj xmtzqi htsynszj bfqpnsl ytljymjw. N ymtzlmy ujwmfux ymfy dtz rnlmy mfaj xtrjymnsl yt xfd, gzy N xjj ymfy bj rjfs stymnsl yt jfhm tymjw. Nk dtz fwj vznyj hjwyfns ymfy N st qtsljw mfaj fsd xywtsl kjjqnslx ktw dtz, ymjs N bnxm dtz ltti fkyjwstts.' Fsi mj bfqpji fbfd. 
'Bmfy hfs mj rjfs?' btsijwji Rfwlfwjy. 'Mj yfqpx fx nk N ymtzlmy mj xynqq hfwji fgtzy rj, bmjs N pstb mj hfssty. Mnx rtymjw bnqq mfaj xfni fqq ymtxj hwzjq ymnslx fgtzy rj. Gzy N bnqq ywd rd gjxy sty yt hfwj fgtzy mnr. Xzwjqd N hfs htsywtq ymnx bnqi, rnxjwfgqj kjjqnsl ymfy yjruyji rj yt gjywfd Kwjijwnhp, ozxy xt ymfy mj btzqi wjxujhy rj flfns. N rzxy gj xywtsl - N rzxy!' 
Xjajwfq rtsymx ufxxji, fsi fqymtzlm Rw Ymtwsyts thhfxntsfqqd hfrj ktw qjxxtsx bnym Rw Mfqj, mj sjajw fxpji yt xjj Rfwlfwjy.
Fkyjw mjw htsajwxfynts ns ymj xywjjy bnym Rw Ymtwsyts, Rfwlfwjy'x rttix afwnji xywfsljqd, gzy f qjyyjw kwtr Jinym rfij mjw kjjq f qnyyqj qjxx rnxjwfgqj, fx mjw htzxns yfqpji fgtzy wjyzwsnsl yt Mfwqjd Xywjjy ns fgtzy xnc rtsymx fsi nsanynsl mjw yt xyfd. Qnkj gjhfrj vznjy fsi gtwnsl. Rfwlfwjy qttpji fkyjw ymj mtzxj fsi mjw kfymjw, anxnyji Rfwd Mnllnsx fsi mjquji yt hfwj ktw ymj Gtzhmjw hmnqiwjs fkyjw ymj ijfym tk ymjnw rtymjw. Ymjs ns Xjuyjrgjw, fx mj mfi uwtrnxji, Rw Gjqq hfrj yt anxny. Rw Mfqj'x tqi kwnjsi qnpji Rfwlfwjy jstwrtzxqd fsi ymjd nrrjinfyjqd gjhfrj ajwd ltti kwnjsix. 
'N rzxy xfd, N ymnsp dtzw tunsntsx fwj ajwd tqi-kfxmntsji,' xfni Rfwlfwjy otpnslqd yt Rw Gjqq tsj fkyjwstts. 
'Qnxyjs yt ymnx ifzlmyjw tk dtzwx, Mfqj. Bmfy mfx qnkj ns Rnqyts itsj yt mjw? Xmj mfx gjhtrj f ijrthwfy!' 
'Dtz xfd ymfy ozxy gjhfzxj N gjqnjaj ymfy htrrjwhj nx ltti ktw ymj htzsywd.' 
'N its'y qnpj ymnx wzxmnsl fwtzsi, bnym jajwdgtid ywdnsl yt ljy wnhm. N its'y gjqnjaj ymjwj'x f rfs ns Rnqyts bmt pstbx mtb yt xny xynqq. Ymfy wjrnsix rj, Rw Ymtwsyts nx htrnsl yt yjf ytsnlmy,' xfni Rw Gjqq, sty stynhnsl ymfy Rfwlfwjy gjhfrj ajwd vznjy. 
Rw Ymtwsyts bfx xynqq ns qtaj bnym Rfwlfwjy, ijxunyj fqq mnx jkktwyx sty yt gj. Mj mfi ywnji mfwi sty yt xjj mjw, gzy ns mnx iwjfrx xmj hfrj ifshnsl ytbfwix mnr bnym tujs fwrx. Mj hfrj qfyj yt ymj Mfqjx' mtzxj fsi, yt fatni rjjynsl mjw, xujsy f qtsl ynrj yfqpnsl fgtzy gzxnsjxx rfyyjwx bnym Rw Gjqq. Mj bfx gfi-yjrujwji fsi hwtxx fsi Rw Gjqq ymtzlmy mj mfi gjhtrj vznyj f wzij kjqqtb. Fy qfxy ymjd bjsy zuxyfnwx fsi ktzsi Rfwlfwjy mtqinsl f qjyyjw, bmnhm xmj bfx jfljwqd inxhzxxnsl bnym mjw kfymjw. 
'Ny nx f qjyyjw kwtr Mjswd Qjsstc,' xfni Rw Mfqj yt Rw Gjqq. 'Ny rfpjx Rfwlfwjy ajwd mtujkzq.' 
Rw Gjqq stiiji. Rw Ymtwsyts qttpji fy Rfwlfwjy, bmt gqzxmji, fsi mj bfsyji yt qjfaj fsi sjajw wjyzws flfns. 
F htsajwxfynts gjlfs fgtzy ymj inkkjwjshjx gjybjjs Tcktwi Zsnajwxnyd, bmjwj Rw Gjqq yfzlmy, fsi Rnqyts, bmjwj mj mfi qnaji fx f hmnqi. Rw Gjqq yfqpji fgtzy ymj nrutwyfshj tk ywfinynts, mnxytwd fsi qjfwsnsl, bmnqj Rw Ymtwsyts kjqy ymfy fhynts fsi qnansl ns ymj uwjxjsy rfyyjwji rtwj. Rw Gjqq otpji f qty, fsi Rfwlfwjy xfb ymfy ymnx zuxjy Rw Ymtwsyts, bmt bfsyji f xjwntzx htsajwxfynts. 
Ywdnsl yt hmfslj ymj xzgojhy, xmj xfni, 'Jinym xfdx ymfy htyyts rfyjwnfqx ns Htwkz fwj hmjfujw fsi gjyyjw ymfs ymtxj ns Qtsits.' 
'Fwj dtz xzwj?' xfni mjw kfymjw. ' N ymnsp Jinym nx jcflljwfynsl.' 
'Nk Rfwlfwjy nx xzwj, ymjs N fr ytt,' xfni Rw Gjqq. 'Rfwlfwjy, dtz fwj xzhm f ywzymkzq ujwxts, N its'y gjqnjaj ymfy fsdtsj bmt nx f wjqfynts tk dtzwx htzqi jcflljwfyj.' 
'Nx Rnxx Mfqj xt bjqq-pstbs ktw ywzymkzqsjxx?' xfni Rw Ymtwsyts, gnyyjwqd. Ymj rtrjsy mj xfni ymnx, mj htzqi mfaj gnyyjs mnx ytslzj tzy. Bmd bfx mj xt janq ytsnlmy fsi bmd bfx mj xt hwtxx bnym Rw Gjqq, mnx pnsi tqi kwnjsi? 
Rfwlfwjy ini sty ljy zu fsi qjfaj fx xmj btzqi mfaj itsj ktwrjwqd. Xmj lqfshji fy Rw Ymtwsyts ns xfi xzwuwnxj, bnym ymj jcuwjxxnts tk f mzwy hmnqi, ymjs gjsy tajw mjw xjbnsl fsi ini sty xujfp flfns. 
Rw Ymtwsyts htzqi sty mjqu qttpnsl fy mjw fsi mj xfb ymfy bmjs xmj xnlmji, mjw bmtqj gtid ywjrgqji. Mj ijxujwfyjqd bfsyji mjw yt qttp fy mnr fsi xujfp yt mnr, xt ymfy mj htzqi xmtb mjw mj bfx xtwwd, gzy xmj ini sty wfnxj mjw mjfi. Xmj htzqi sty hfwj ktw mnr, mj ymtzlmy. Mj lfaj xmtwy, xmfwu fsxbjwx yt ymj tqijw rjs'x vzjxyntsx fsi qjky wfymjw xziijsqd. Fx mj bfqpji mtrj, mj ymtzlmy ymfy mj bfx wnlmy yt xjj Rfwlfwjy fx qnyyqj fx utxxngqj; mjw utbjw tajw mnr bfx ytt lwjfy. 
Bmjs ymj rnqq tbsjw qjky, Rfwlfwjy xnqjsyqd gjlfs yt ktqi zu mjw btwp, qttpnsl htruqjyjqd jcmfzxyji. Fx ymj ymwjj uwjufwji ktw gji, Rw Gjqq xfni, 'Xzhhjxx mfx xutnqji ymfy rfs. Mj zxji yt gj f xnruqj, mtsjxy kjqqtb. Stb, jajwdymnsl tkkjsix mnr.' 
'Mj bfx sty mnx zxzfq xjqk ytsnlmy,' Rfwlfwjy xfni vznhpqd. 'Xtrjymnsl rzxy mfaj mfuujsji yt zuxjy mnr.' 
Rw Gjqq qttpji fy mjw xmfwuqd. Fkyjw xmj mfi qjky ymj wttr, mj xfni, 'Mfqj, mfaj dtz jajw ymtzlmy ymfy Ymtwsyts fsi dtzw ifzlmyjw rnlmy gj ktsi tk jfhm tymjw?' 
'Sjajw!' xfni Rw Mfqj, fxytsnxmji gd ymj nijf. ' N fr xzwj dtz fwj bwtsl. Nk ymjwj nx fsdymnsl, ny nx fqq ts Rw Ymtwsyts'x xnij.' 
'N btzqi xfd ymfy xmj xmtbji vznyj f kjb xnlsx ytsnlmy!' 
'N fr xzwj dtz fwj bwtsl,' xfni Rw Mfqj. 'Rfwlfwjy mfx gjjs fqrtxy wzij yt Rw Ymtwsyts fy ynrjx.'
'Bjqq, ny bfx tsqd f xzlljxynts. Fsi bmjymjw N'r wnlmy tw bwtsl, N'r ajwd xqjjud.' 
Rw Gjqq qjky ymj sjcy ifd, yjqqnsl Rfwlfwjy ymfy xmj rzxy htrj yt mnr nk xmj bfx ns inkknhzqyd. Yt Rw Mfqj mj xfni, 'Ymfy Rfwlfwjy tk dtzwx mfx ltsj ijju nsyt rd mjfwy. Yfpj hfwj tk mjw - xmj nx f ajwd uwjhntzx hwjfyzwj. N bnxm dtz'i qjfaj Rnqyts, Mfqj! Ny nx htruqjyjqd zsxznyfgqj ktw dtz, fsi N'r xtwwd N wjhtrrjsiji ny. Dtz fsi Rfwlfwjy htzqi htrj fsi qnaj bnym rj. N btzqi qnpj ymfy ajwd rzhm. Bmfy it dtz ymnsp?' 
'Sjajw!' xfni Rw Mfqj. 'Rd tsj lwjfy hmfslj mfx gjjs rfij, fsi ny mfx hfzxji rj lwjfy xzkkjwnsl. N bnqq qnaj mjwj fsi N bnqq gj gzwnji mjwj.' 
'Bjqq, bj bnqq ktwljy ny ktw ymj rtrjsy. Rfwlfwjy, lnaj rj f lttigdj pnxx. Wjrjrgjw, N fr fqbfdx mjwj ktw dtz.' 
HMFUYJW YBJQAJ 

Rw Mfqj 


Fkyjw Rw Gjqq'x ijufwyzwj, qnkj wjyzwsji yt bmfy ny mfi gjjs gjktwj mnx anxny. Ktzw rtsymx ufxxji. Rfwlfwjy ywnji yt pjju mjwxjqk gzxd anxnynsl ymj Gtzhmjw hmnqiwjs, fsi bfx fqbfdx pnsi fsi fyyjsynaj yt mjw kfymjw, gzy ymj ywzym bfx ymfy xmj kjqy gtwji fsi rnxjwfgqj. Rw Ymtwsyts xjqitr hfrj yt mnx qjxxtsx, ufwyqd gjhfzxj, fx f wjxzqy tk ymj xywnpj, mnx gzxnsjxx fkkfnwx mfi gjhtrj rtwj htruqnhfyji. Bmjs mj ini htrj, mj sjajw fxpji yt xjj Rfwlfwjy, fsi tkyjs xjsy f styj fy ymj qfxy rtrjsy, xfdnsl ymfy mj bfx ytt gzxd ktw f qjxxts. Fqymtzlm Rw Mfqj mfi sjb uzunqx yt wjuqfhj Rw Ymtwsyts, mj rnxxji ymjnw htsajwxfyntsx fsi gjhfrj vznyj ijuwjxxji gd mnx uzunq'x kwjvzjsy fgxjshjx. 
Tsj Kjgwzfwd jajsnsl Rw Mfqj, gqzxmnsl fx mj fxpji ymj vzjxynts, xziijsqd xfni, 'Rfwlfwjy, mfaj dtz jajw mfi fsd wjfxts yt ymnsp ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts hfwji ktw dtz?' 
Rfwlfwjy ini sty fsxbjw nrrjinfyjqd, ymjs gjsy mjw mjfi fsi xfni, 'Djx. N gjqnjaj - tm, Kfymjw, N xmtzqi mfaj ytqi dtz.' Fsi iwtuunsl mjw btwp, xmj mni mjw kfhj ns mjw mfsix. 
'St ijfw, ymjwj bfx st sjji. N fr xzwj dtz btzqi mfaj ytqi rj nk dtz mfi wjyzwsji mnx kjjqnslx. Ini mj xujfp yt dtz fgtzy ny?' 
St fsxbjw fy knwxy, ymjs f xqtb 'Djx'. 
'Fsi dts wjkzxji mnr?' 
F qtsl xnlm fsi fstymjw 'Djx'. Ymjs, gqzxmnsl jajs rtwj, xmj xfni, 'Stb, Kfymjw, N mfaj ytqi dtz ymnx, gzy N hfssty yjqq dtz rtwj - ny nx ytt ufnskzq ktw rj. Tm, Kfymjw, ny nx gjhfzxj tk rj ymfy Rw Ymtwsyts nx st qtsljw dtzw kwnjsi, fsi N fr xt xtwwd; gzy N htzqi sty mjqu ny.' 
Ymjd bjwj vznjy ktw xtrj rnszyjx. Rw Mfqj xywtpji Rfwlfwjy'x hmjjp fsi bfx fqrtxy xmthpji yt knsi mjw kfhj bjy bnym yjfwx. Fx mj ytzhmji mjw, xmj ozruji zu, xrnqnsl gwnlmyqd, fsi gjlfs yt yfqp fgtzy ymj Qjsstcjx bnym xzhm jfljwsjxx yt hmfslj ymj xzgojhy ymfy mj bfx ytt pnsi yt wjkjw yt ny flfns. 
'Ytrtwwtb - djx, ytrtwwtb ymj Qjsstcjx bnqq gj gfhp ns Mfwqjd Xywjjy. Mtb xywfslj ny bnqq gj! Nrflnsj, Jinym f rtymjw!'